Ohio, session 136, HB15.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Ohio:
S 1. That sections 122.6511, 3313.372, 3313.373, 4905.03, 4906.01, 4906.03, 4906.06,
ECTION
4906.07, 4906.10, 4909.04, 4909.05, 4909.052, 4909.06, 4909.07, 4909.08, 4909.15, 4909.156,
4909.173, 4909.174, 4909.18, 4909.19, 4909.191, 4909.42, 4928.01, 4928.05, 4928.08, 4928.14,
4928.141, 4928.142, 4928.144, 4928.17, 4928.20, 4928.23, 4928.231, 4928.232, 4928.34, 4928.542,
4928.64, 4928.645, 4929.20, 4933.81, 4935.04, 5727.01, 5727.111, and 5727.75 be amended and
sections 122.161, 3313.377, 3313.378, 4903.27, 4905.23, 4905.311, 4905.321, 4905.331, 4909.041,
4909.042, 4909.159, 4909.181, 4909.192, 4909.193, 4909.421, 4928.041, 4928.101, 4928.102,
4928.103, 4928.104, 4928.105, 4928.149, 4928.1410, 4928.73, 4928.83, 4928.86, 4929.221,
4929.222, and 5727.76 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows:
Sec. 122.161. (A) As used in this section:
(1) "Subdivision" means a municipal corporation, township, or county.
(2) "Legislative authority" means the legislative authority of a municipal corporation, a
board of the township trustees, or a board of county commissioners.
(3) "Subdivision's territory" means, in the case of a municipal corporation, the territory of
the municipal corporation; in the case of a township, the unincorporated territory of the township; or,
in the case of a county, the unincorporated territory of the county.

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
2
(4) "Brownfield" has the same meaning as in section 122.6511 of the Revised Code.
(5) "Former coal mine" means a location that was, but is no longer, used in connection with
the extraction of coal from its natural deposit in the earth.
(6) "Qualifying property" has the same meaning as in section 5727.76 of the Revised Code.
(B) A legislative authority may adopt and certify to the director of development an ordinance
or resolution requesting that the director designate the site of a brownfield or former coal mine
within the subdivision's territory as a priority investment area. The ordinance or resolution shall
describe the boundaries of the proposed area and shall specify that qualifying property in the priority
investment area shall be exempt from taxation for five years pursuant to section 5727.76 of the
Revised Code.
The director, upon receipt of that certification, shall designate the proposed area as a priority
investment area if the director determines that the area meets the designation standards set forth in
rules adopted by the director. Those standards shall specify that the director must prioritize the
designation of areas negatively impacted by the decline of the coal industry.
The director shall notify the legislative authority of the director's decision within ninety days
after receiving the certified ordinance or resolution. If the director does not issue a decision within
those ninety days, the request for designation shall be considered approved by operation of law.
(C) The director of development shall immediately notify the public utilities commission, the
power siting board, and the tax commissioner if the director approves the designation of a priority
investment area under division (B) of this section or if the designation is approved by operation of
law.
Sec. 122.6511. (A) As used in this section and section 122.6512 of the Revised Code:
(1) "Brownfield" means an abandoned, idled, or under-used industrial, commercial, or
institutional property where expansion or redevelopment is complicated by known or potential
releases of hazardous substances or petroleum.
(2) "Lead entity" means a county, township, municipal corporation, port authority,
conservancy district, park district or other similar park authority, county land reutilization
corporation, or organization for profit.
(3) "Remediation" means any action to contain, remove, or dispose of hazardous substances
or petroleum at a brownfield. "Remediation" includes the acquisition of a brownfield, demolition
performed at a brownfield, and the installation or upgrade of the minimum amount of infrastructure
that is necessary to make a brownfield operational for economic development activity.
(4) "County land reutilization corporation" has the same meaning as in section 1724.01 of
the Revised Code.
(5) "Priority investment area eligible project" means some or all of the following activities
necessary or conducive for generating, transporting, storing, or transmitting electricity at the site of a
brownfield or former coal mine located in a priority investment area designated under section
122.161 of the Revised Code:

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
3
(a) Environmental or cultural resource site assessments;
(b) The monitoring, remediation, cleanup, or containment of land to remove any condition or
substance regulated by state or federal environmental laws or regulations, including hazardous
substances, hazardous wastes, solid wastes, or petroleum;
(c) The demolition and removal of existing structures, grading, or other site work necessary
to make a site or certain real property that includes a brownfield or former coal mine usable for
economic development;
(d) The development of a remediation and reuse plan;
(e) The development or operation of a site for energy generation or battery storage.
(B)(1) There is hereby created the brownfield remediation program to award grants for
priority investment area eligible projects and the remediation of brownfield sites throughout Ohio.
The program shall be administered by the director of development pursuant to this section and rules
adopted pursuant to division (B)(2) of this section.
(2) The director shall adopt rules, under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, for the
administration of the program. The rules shall include provisions for determining project and project
sponsor eligibility, program administration, and any other provisions the director finds necessary.
(3) The director shall not award a grant exceeding ten million dollars to a priority investment
area eligible project. Grants for such projects may not be used for the construction or operation of
electric generating infrastructure.
(C)(1) There is hereby created in the state treasury the brownfield remediation fund. The
fund shall consist of moneys appropriated to it by the general assembly, and investment earnings on
moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund.
The director shall reserve funds from each appropriation to the fund to each county in the
state. The amount reserved shall be one million dollars per county, or, if an appropriation is less than
eighty-eight million dollars, a proportionate amount to each county. Amounts reserved pursuant to
this section are reserved for one calendar year from the date of the appropriation. After one calendar
year, the funds shall be available pursuant to division (D) of this section.
(2) A lead entity may submit an initial grant application for the use of funds reserved under
division (C)(1) of this section to the director. The lead entity may later submit an amended
application to the director, and the director may accept and approve that application for use of funds
up to the amount reserved for that county.
(D) Funds from an appropriation not reserved under division (C)(1) of this section shall be
available for grants to projects located anywhere in the state, and grants from those funds shall be
awarded to qualifying projects on a first-come, first-served basis.
(E) The amendments to this section by this act H.B. 315 of the 135th general assembly apply
to new projects that are applied for and awarded funding by the director of development on and after
the effective date of this amendmentJuly 1, 2025. Projects that are applied for or were applied for
under this section prior to that date July 1, 2025, shall be governed by this section as it existed prior

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
4
to that dateJuly 1, 2025.
Sec. 3313.372. (A) As used in this section, "energy conservation measure" means an
installation or modification of an installation in, or remodeling of, a building, to reduce energy
consumption. It includes:
(1) Insulation of the building structure and systems within the building;
(2) Storm windows and doors, multiglazed windows and doors, heat absorbing or heat
reflective glazed and coated window and door systems, additional glazing, reductions in glass area,
and other window and door system modifications that reduce energy consumption;
(3) Automatic energy control systems;
(4) Heating, ventilating, or air conditioning system modifications or replacements;
(5) Caulking and weatherstripping;
(6) Replacement or modification of lighting fixtures to increase the energy efficiency of the
system without increasing the overall illumination of a facility, unless such increase in illumination
is necessary to conform to the applicable state or local building code for the proposed lighting
system;
(7) Energy recovery systems;
(8) Cogeneration systems that produce steam or forms of energy such as heat, as well as
electricity, for use primarily within a building or complex of buildings;
(9) Solar panels;
(10) Any other modification, installation, or remodeling approved by the Ohio facilities
construction commission as an energy conservation measure.
(B) A board of education of a city, exempted village, local, or joint vocational school district
may enter into an installment payment contract for the purchase and installation of energy
conservation measures. The provisions of such installment payment contracts dealing with interest
charges and financing terms shall not be subject to the competitive bidding requirements of section
3313.46 of the Revised Code, and shall be on the following terms:
(1) Not less than one-fifteenth of the costs thereof shall be paid within two years from the
date of purchase.
(2) The remaining balance of the costs thereof shall be paid within fifteen years from the
date of purchase.
The provisions of any installment payment contract entered into pursuant to this section shall
provide that all payments, except payments for repairs and obligations on termination of the contract
prior to its expiration, shall not exceed the calculated energy, water, or waste water cost savings,
avoided operating costs, and avoided capital costs attributable to the one or more measures over a
defined period of time. Those payments shall be made only to the extent that the savings described
in this division actually occur. The energy services company shall warrant and guarantee that the
energy conservation measures shall realize guaranteed savings and shall be responsible to pay an
amount equal to any savings shortfall.

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
5
An installment payment contract entered into by a board of education under this section shall
require the board to contract in accordance with division (A) of section 3313.46 of the Revised Code
for the installation, modification, or remodeling of energy conservation measures unless division (A)
of section 3313.46 of the Revised Code does not apply pursuant to division (B)(3) of that section, in
which case the contract shall be awarded through a competitive selection process pursuant to rules
adopted by the facilities construction commission.
An installment payment contract entered into by a board of education under this section may
include services for measurement and verification of energy savings associated with the guarantee.
The annual cost of measurement and verification services shall not exceed ten per cent of the
guaranteed savings in any year of the installment payment contract.
(C) If a board of education determines that a surety bond is necessary to secure energy,
water, or waste water cost savings guaranteed in a contract entered into by the board of education
under this section, the energy services company shall provide a surety bond that satisfies all of the
following requirements:
(1) The penal sum of the surety bond for the first guarantee year shall equal the amount of
savings included in the annual guaranteed savings amount that is measured and calculated in
accordance with the measurement and verification plan included in the contract, but may not include
guaranteed savings that are not measured or that are stipulated in the contract. The annual
guaranteed savings amount shall include only the savings guaranteed in the contract for the one-year
term that begins on the first day of the first savings guarantee year and may not include amounts
from subsequent years.
(2) The surety bond shall have a term of not more than one year unless renewed. At the
option of the board of education, the surety bond may be renewed for one or two additional terms,
each term not to exceed one year. The surety bond may not be renewed or extended so that it is in
effect for more than three consecutive years.
In the event of a renewal, the penal sum of the surety bond for each renewed year shall be
revised so that the penal sum equals the annual guaranteed savings amount for such renewal year
that is measured and calculated in accordance with the measurement and verification plan included
in the contract, but may not include guaranteed savings that are not measured or that are stipulated in
the contract. Regardless of the number of renewals of the bond, the aggregate liability under each
renewed bond may not exceed the penal sum stated in the renewal certificate for the applicable
renewal year.
(3) The surety bond for the first year shall be issued within thirty days of the commencement
of the first savings guarantee year under the contract.
In the event of renewal, the surety shall deliver to the board of education a renewal
certificate reflecting the revised penal sum within thirty days of the board of education's request. The
board of education shall deliver the request for renewal not less than thirty days prior to the
expiration date of the surety bond then in existence. A surety bond furnished pursuant to section

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
6
153.54 of the Revised Code shall not secure obligations related to energy, water, or waste water cost
savings as referenced in division (C) of this section.
(D) The board may issue the notes of the school district signed by the president and the
treasurer of the board and specifying the terms of the purchase and securing the deferred payments
provided in this section, payable at the times provided and bearing interest at a rate not exceeding
the rate determined as provided in section 9.95 of the Revised Code. The notes may contain an
option for prepayment and shall not be subject to Chapter 133. of the Revised Code. In the
resolution authorizing the notes, the board may provide, without the vote of the electors of the
district, for annually levying and collecting taxes in amounts sufficient to pay the interest on and
retire the notes, except that the total net indebtedness of the district without a vote of the electors
incurred under this and all other sections of the Revised Code, except section 3318.052 of the
Revised Code, shall not exceed one per cent of the district's tax valuation. Revenues derived from
local taxes or otherwise, for the purpose of conserving energy or for defraying the current operating
expenses of the district, may be applied to the payment of interest and the retirement of such notes.
The notes may be sold at private sale or given to the energy services company under the installment
payment contract authorized by division (B) of this section.
(E) Debt incurred under this section shall not be included in the calculation of the net
indebtedness of a school district under section 133.06 of the Revised Code.
(F) No school district board shall enter into an installment payment contract under division
(B) of this section unless it first obtains a report of the costs of the energy conservation measures and
the savings thereof as described under division (G)(1) of section 133.06 of the Revised Code as a
requirement for issuing energy securities, makes a finding that the amount spent on such measures is
not likely to exceed the amount of money it would save in energy costs and resultant operational and
maintenance costs as described in that division, except that that finding shall cover the ensuing
fifteen years, and the facilities construction commission determines that the district board's findings
are reasonable and approves the contract as described in that division.
The district board shall monitor the savings and maintain a report of those savings, which
shall be submitted to the commission in the same manner as required by division (G) of section
133.06 of the Revised Code in the case of energy securities.
(G) A board of education may apply to the Ohio facilities construction commission for a
loan from the school energy performance contracting loan fund, established by section 3313.378 of
the Revised Code, for purposes of paying for all or part of an installment contract under division (B)
of this section.
Sec. 3313.373. (A) As used in this section:
(1) "Energy saving measure" means both of the following:
(a) The acquisition and installation, by purchase, lease, lease purchase, lease with an option
to buy, or installment purchase, of an energy conservation measure as defined in section 3313.372 of
the Revised Code and any attendant architectural and engineering consulting services.

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
7
(b) Architectural and engineering consulting services related to energy conservation.
(2) "Shared-savings contract" means a contract for one or more energy savings measures,
which contract provides that all payments, except payments for maintenance and repairs and
obligations on termination of the contract prior to its expiration, are to be a stated percentage of
calculated savings of energy costs attributable to the energy saving measure over a defined period of
time and are to be made only to the extent that such savings occur. A contract that requires any
additional capital investment or contribution of funds, other than funds available from state or
federal energy grants, or that is for an initial term of longer than ten years is not a shared-savings
contract.
(B) The board of education of a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school
district may enter into a shared-savings contract with any person experienced in the design and
implementation of energy saving measures for buildings owned or rented by the board. Such
contract is not subject to section 3313.46 of the Revised Code. If the contract is for a term extending
beyond the fiscal year, it shall be considered to be a continuing contract within the meaning of
division (D) of section 5705.41 of the Revised Code. A board of education entering into an
installment contract under this section shall also comply with section 3313.372 of the Revised Code.
(C) In the case of a shared-savings contract running beyond the fiscal year in which it is
entered into, the board shall include in its annual appropriations measure for each subsequent year
any amounts payable under shared-savings contracts during such year and shall furnish the
certification required by section 5705.44 of the Revised Code, but the failure of a board to make
such an appropriation or furnish the certificates referred to in division (D) of section 5705.41, or
5705.412 or 5705.44 of the Revised Code, shall not affect the validity of the shared-savings contract
or the board's obligations under the contract.
(D) A board of education may apply to the Ohio facilities construction commission for a
loan from the school energy performance contracting loan fund, established by section 3313.378 of
the Revised Code, for purposes of paying for all or part of a shared-savings contract under this
section.
Sec. 3313.377. (A) As used in this section:
(1) "Energy conservation measure" has the same meaning as in section 3313.372 of the
Revised Code.
(2) "Energy saving measure" has the same meaning as in section 3313.373 of the Revised
Code.
(B) The Ohio facilities construction commission may issue a loan from funds in the school
energy performance contracting loan fund created in section 3313.378 of the Revised Code to a
board of education of a city, exempted village, local, or joint vocational school district that applies
for a loan under section 3313.372 or 3313.373 of the Revised Code.
(C) Nothing in this section prohibits a board of education that receives a loan under this
section from utilizing any other energy efficiency program.

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
8
(D) The terms of a loan issued under this section shall be as follows:
(1) Two per cent annual interest on the loan;
(2) The full loan amount, plus interest, shall be repaid in not more than ten years from the
issuance of the loan;
(3) Repayment on the loan begins six months after the installation of the energy conservation
measures is complete or the implementation of energy savings measures is completed;
(4) Any other provision considered appropriate by the commission.
(E) All repayment amounts for any loans issued under this section shall be made to the
commission. The commission shall deposit all repayment amounts received in the school energy
performance contracting loan fund created in section 3313.378 of the Revised Code.
(F) If the commission enters into an agreement with a board for a loan under this section, the
commission shall promptly direct the treasurer of state to remit money from the school energy
performance contracting loan fund to the board as provided in the terms of the agreement.
(G) The commission shall adopt rules to implement this section, including a loan application.
Sec. 3313.378. (A) The school energy performance contracting loan fund is created in the
custody of the treasurer of state, but is not part of the state treasury. The money in the fund shall be
used for purposes of funding loans issued under section 3313.377 of the Revised Code. The fund
shall consist of the funds transferred from the solar generation fund, repayments of loans from this
fund, interest on amounts in the school energy performance contracting loan fund, and any
appropriations, grants, or gifts made to the fund.
(B) The fund shall be administered by the Ohio facilities construction commission, and the
commission shall request the treasurer of state to create the account for the fund. The treasurer of
state shall distribute the money in the fund in accordance with directions provided by the
commission.
Sec. 4903.27. For all cases involving an application pursuant to section 4909.18 of the
Revised Code, the public utilities commission shall not permit any new discovery beginning not
later than two hundred fifteen days after the application is determined to be complete.
Sec. 4905.03. As used in this chapter, any person, firm, copartnership, voluntary association,
joint-stock association, company, or corporation, wherever organized or incorporated, is:
(A) A telephone company, when engaged in the business of transmitting telephonic
messages to, from, through, or in this state;
(B) A for-hire motor carrier, when engaged in the business of transporting persons or
property by motor vehicle for compensation, except when engaged in any of the operations in
intrastate commerce described in divisions (B)(1) to (9) of section 4921.01 of the Revised Code, but
including the carrier's agents, officers, and representatives, as well as employees responsible for
hiring, supervising, training, assigning, or dispatching drivers and employees concerned with the
installation, inspection, and maintenance of motor-vehicle equipment and accessories;
(C) An electric light company, when engaged in the business of supplying electricity for

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
9
light, heat, or power purposes to consumers within this state, including supplying electric
transmission service for electricity delivered to consumers in this state, but excluding a regional
transmission organization approved by the federal energy regulatory commission; .
An electric light company does not include a self-generator or mercantile customer self-
power system.
(D) A gas company, when engaged in the business of supplying artificial gas for lighting,
power, or heating purposes to consumers within this state or when engaged in the business of
supplying artificial gas to gas companies or to natural gas companies within this state, but a producer
engaged in supplying to one or more gas or natural gas companies, only such artificial gas as is
manufactured by that producer as a by-product of some other process in which the producer is
primarily engaged within this state is not thereby a gas company. All rates, rentals, tolls, schedules,
charges of any kind, or agreements between any gas company and any other gas company or any
natural gas company providing for the supplying of artificial gas and for compensation for the same
are subject to the jurisdiction of the public utilities commission.
(E) A natural gas company, when engaged in the business of supplying natural gas for
lighting, power, or heating purposes to consumers within this state. Notwithstanding the above,
neither the delivery nor sale of Ohio-produced natural gas or Ohio-produced raw natural gas liquids
by a producer or gatherer under a public utilities commission-ordered exemption, adopted before, as
to producers, or after, as to producers or gatherers, January 1, 1996, or the delivery or sale of Ohio-
produced natural gas or Ohio-produced raw natural gas liquids by a producer or gatherer of Ohio-
produced natural gas or Ohio-produced raw natural gas liquids, either to a lessor under an oil and gas
lease of the land on which the producer's drilling unit is located, or the grantor incident to a right-of-
way or easement to the producer or gatherer, shall cause the producer or gatherer to be a natural gas
company for the purposes of this section.
All rates, rentals, tolls, schedules, charges of any kind, or agreements between a natural gas
company and other natural gas companies or gas companies providing for the supply of natural gas
and for compensation for the same are subject to the jurisdiction of the public utilities commission.
The commission, upon application made to it, may relieve any producer or gatherer of natural gas,
defined in this section as a gas company or a natural gas company, of compliance with the
obligations imposed by this chapter and Chapters 4901., 4903., 4907., 4909., 4921., and 4923. of the
Revised Code, so long as the producer or gatherer is not affiliated with or under the control of a gas
company or a natural gas company engaged in the transportation or distribution of natural gas, or so
long as the producer or gatherer does not engage in the distribution of natural gas to consumers.
Nothing in division (E) of this section limits the authority of the commission to enforce
sections 4905.90 to 4905.96 of the Revised Code.
(F) A pipe-line company, when engaged in the business of transporting natural gas, oil, or
coal or its derivatives through pipes or tubing, either wholly or partly within this state, but not when
engaged in the business of the transport associated with gathering lines, raw natural gas liquids, or

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
10
finished product natural gas liquids;
(G) A water-works company, when engaged in the business of supplying water through
pipes or tubing, or in a similar manner, to consumers within this state;
(H) A heating or cooling company, when engaged in the business of supplying water, steam,
or air through pipes or tubing to consumers within this state for heating or cooling purposes;
(I) A messenger company, when engaged in the business of supplying messengers for any
purpose;
(J) A street railway company, when engaged in the business of operating as a common
carrier, a railway, wholly or partly within this state, with one or more tracks upon, along, above, or
below any public road, street, alleyway, or ground, within any municipal corporation, operated by
any motive power other than steam and not a part of an interurban railroad, whether the railway is
termed street, inclined-plane, elevated, or underground railway;
(K) A suburban railroad company, when engaged in the business of operating as a common
carrier, whether wholly or partially within this state, a part of a street railway constructed or
extended beyond the limits of a municipal corporation, and not a part of an interurban railroad;
(L) An interurban railroad company, when engaged in the business of operating a railroad,
wholly or partially within this state, with one or more tracks from one municipal corporation or point
in this state to another municipal corporation or point in this state, whether constructed upon the
public highways or upon private rights-of-way, outside of municipal corporations, using electricity
or other motive power than steam power for the transportation of passengers, packages, express
matter, United States mail, baggage, and freight. Such an interurban railroad company is included in
the term "railroad" as used in section 4907.02 of the Revised Code.
(M) A sewage disposal system company, when engaged in the business of sewage disposal
services through pipes or tubing, and treatment works, or in a similar manner, within this state.
As used in division (E) of this section, "natural gas" includes natural gas that has been
processed to enable consumption or to meet gas quality standards or that has been blended with
propane, hydrogen, biologically derived methane gas, or any other artificially produced or processed
gas.
As used in this section, "gathering lines" has the same meaning as in section 4905.90 of the
Revised Code, and "raw natural gas liquids" and "finished product natural gas liquids" have the
same meanings as in section 4906.01 of the Revised Code.
As used in this section, "self-generator" has the same meaning as in section 4928.01 of the
Revised Code, and "mercantile customer self-power system" has the same meaning as in section
4928.73 of the Revised Code.
Sec. 4905.23. (A) As used in this section, "base load electric generating facility" means an
electric generating plant and associated facilities located in this state that primarily uses a
nonrenewable fuel source to generate electricity, including natural gas and nuclear reaction, and that
is not owned or operated by a public utility, municipal corporation, or electric cooperative.

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
11
(B) No person shall enter into a settlement to abandon, close, or shut down either of the
following:
(1) A base load electric generating facility;
(2) A generating plant owned or operated by a public utility.
Sec. 4905.311. (A) As used in this section, "electric distribution utility" has the same
meaning as in section 4928.01 of the Revised Code.
(B) Notwithstanding any provision of the Revised Code to the contrary, an electric
distribution utility may supply behind the meter electric generation service, provided that any behind
the meter electric generation facilities that the utility intends to use to supply such service were filed
with the public utilities commission under section 4928.47 of the Revised Code, as that section
existed prior to its repeal by H.B. 15 of the 136th General Assembly, no later than March 31, 2025.
(C) No electric distribution utility shall recover any of the following costs through any rate,
charge, or recovery from retail electric service customers that are not receiving behind the meter
electric generation service from the utility:
(1) Costs associated with supplying behind the meter electric generation service;
(2) Costs associated with any behind the meter electric generation service facility;
(3) Stranded costs associated with the closing of any behind the meter electric generation
service facility or an end-use customer of the behind the meter electric generation service ceasing
operations.
(D) No electric distribution utility shall offer direct, associated inducements for contracting
with the utility for any behind the meter electric generation service.
(E) The public utilities commission shall periodically audit all electric distribution utilities
that provide any behind the meter electric generation service to ensure compliance with this section.
Sec. 4905.321. (A) Notwithstanding section 4905.32 of the Revised Code, all revenues
collected from customers by a public utility as part of a rider or rates that are later found to be
unreasonable, unlawful, or otherwise improper by the supreme court shall be subject to refund from
the date of the issuance of the supreme court's decision until the date when, on remand, the public
utilities commission makes changes to the rider or rates to implement the supreme court's decision.
(B) The commission shall order the payment of the refunds described in division (A) of this
section in a manner designed to allocate the refunds to customer classes in the same proportion as
the charges were originally collected.
(C) The commission shall determine how to allocate any remaining funds described in
division (A) of this section that cannot be refunded for whatever reason.
(D) The commission shall order the payment of the funds described in division (A) of this
section and shall determine how to allocate any remaining funds that cannot be refunded not more
than thirty days after the date of the issuance of the supreme court's decision.
Sec. 4905.331. (A) As used in this section:
(1) "Electric distribution utility" has the same meaning as in section 4928.01 of the Revised

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
12
Code.
(2) "Electric service" means any service involved in supplying or arranging for the supply of
electricity to ultimate consumers in this state. "Electric service" includes "retail electric service" as
defined in section 4928.01 of the Revised Code.
(3) "Proceeding" includes a proceeding relating to electric service under Chapters 4909. and
4928. of the Revised Code.
(B) No electric distribution utility or its affiliate may do either of the following to induce any
party to a public utilities commission proceeding to enter into a settlement of a matter pending
before the commission:
(1) Make a cash payment to that party;
(2) Enter into any agreement or any financial or private arrangement with that party that is
not made part of the public case record.
(C) Notwithstanding division (B) of this section, the commission may do any of the
following:
(1) Reasonably allocate costs among rate schedules;
(2) Reasonably design rates within a rate schedule;
(3) Approve reasonable rates designed for particular customers or classes of customers;
(4) Approve a resolution of a proceeding under section 4905.26 of the Revised Code;
(5) Approve payments to any governmental entity, nonprofit organization, or other
association for implementing low-income weatherization service programs, subject to the following
conditions:
(a) The payments are at a rate that is reasonably tailored to the costs of providing the
programs.
(b) The payments are for programs that are subject to an existing or new audit procedure.
(c) The payments are not for low-income weatherization education programs.
Sec. 4906.01. As used in Chapter 4906. of the Revised Code:
(A) "Person" means an individual, corporation, business trust, association, estate, trust, or
partnership or any officer, board, commission, department, division, or bureau of the state or a
political subdivision of the state, or any other entity.
(B)(1) "Major utility facility" means:
(a) Electric generating plant and associated facilities designed for, or capable of, operation at
a capacity of fifty megawatts or more;
(b) An electric transmission line and associated facilities of a design capacity of one hundred
kilovolts or more;
(c) A gas pipeline that is greater than five hundred feet in length, and its associated facilities,
is more than nine inches in outside diameter and is designed for transporting gas at a maximum
allowable operating pressure in excess of one hundred twenty-five pounds per square inch.
(2) "Major utility facility" does not include any of the following:

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
13
(a) Gas transmission lines over which an agency of the United States has exclusive
jurisdiction;
(b) Any solid waste facilities as defined in section 6123.01 of the Revised Code;
(c) Electric distributing lines and associated facilities as defined by the power siting board;
(d) Any manufacturing facility that creates byproducts that may be used in the generation of
electricity as defined by the power siting board;
(e) Gathering lines, gas gathering pipelines, and processing plant gas stub pipelines as those
terms are defined in section 4905.90 of the Revised Code and associated facilities;
(f) Any gas processing plant as defined in section 4905.90 of the Revised Code;
(g) Natural gas liquids finished product pipelines;
(h) Pipelines from a gas processing plant as defined in section 4905.90 of the Revised Code
to a natural gas liquids fractionation plant, including a raw natural gas liquids pipeline, or to an
interstate or intrastate gas pipeline;
(i) Any natural gas liquids fractionation plant;
(j) A production operation as defined in section 1509.01 of the Revised Code, including all
pipelines upstream of any gathering lines;
(k) Any compressor stations used by the following:
(i) A gathering line, a gas gathering pipeline, a processing plant gas stub pipeline, or a gas
processing plant as those terms are defined in section 4905.90 of the Revised Code;
(ii) A natural gas liquids finished product pipeline, a natural gas liquids fractionation plant,
or any pipeline upstream of a natural gas liquids fractionation plant; or
(iii) A production operation as defined in section 1509.01 of the Revised Code.
(C) "Commence to construct" means any clearing of land, excavation, or other action that
would adversely affect the natural environment of the site or route of a major utility facility, but does
not include surveying changes needed for temporary use of sites or routes for nonutility purposes, or
uses in securing geological data, including necessary borings to ascertain foundation conditions.
(D) "Certificate" means a certificate of environmental compatibility and public need issued
by the power siting board under section 4906.10 of the Revised Code or a construction certificate
issued by the board under rules adopted under division divisions (E) or (F)to (H) of section 4906.03
of the Revised Code.
(E) "Gas" means natural gas, flammable gas, or gas that is toxic or corrosive.
(F) "Natural gas liquids finished product pipeline" means a pipeline that carries finished
product natural gas liquids to the inlet of an interstate or intrastate finished product natural gas liquid
transmission pipeline, rail loading facility, or other petrochemical or refinery facility.
(G) "Large solar facility" means an electric generating plant that consists of solar panels and
associated facilities with a single interconnection to the electrical grid that is a major utility facility.
(H) "Large wind farm" means an electric generating plant that consists of wind turbines and
associated facilities with a single interconnection to the electrical grid that is a major utility facility.

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
14
(I) "Natural gas liquids fractionation plant" means a facility that takes a feed of raw natural
gas liquids and produces finished product natural gas liquids.
(J) "Raw natural gas" means hydrocarbons that are produced in a gaseous state from gas
wells and that generally include methane, ethane, propane, butanes, pentanes, hexanes, heptanes,
octanes, nonanes, and decanes, plus other naturally occurring impurities like water, carbon dioxide,
hydrogen sulfide, nitrogen, oxygen, and helium.
(K) "Raw natural gas liquids" means naturally occurring hydrocarbons contained in raw
natural gas that are extracted in a gas processing plant and liquefied and generally include mixtures
of ethane, propane, butanes, and natural gasoline.
(L) "Finished product natural gas liquids" means an individual finished product produced by
a natural gas liquids fractionation plant as a liquid that meets the specifications for commercial
products as defined by the gas processors association. Those products include ethane, propane, iso-
butane, normal butane, and natural gasoline.
(M) "Advanced transmission technologies" means software or hardware technologies that
increase the capacity, efficiency, reliability, or safety of an existing or new electric transmission
system, including grid-enhancing technologies such as dynamic line rating, advanced power flow
controllers, and topology optimization; advanced conductors; and other technologies designed to
reduce transmission congestion, or increase the capacity, efficiency, reliability, or safety of an
existing or new electric transmission system.
(N) "Advanced conductor" means a conductor with a direct current electrical resistance that
is at least ten per cent lower than existing conductors of a similar diameter on the electric
transmission system while simultaneously increasing the energy carrying capacity by at least
seventy-five per cent.
Sec. 4906.03. The power siting board shall:
(A) Require such information from persons subject to its jurisdiction as it considers
necessary to assist in the conduct of hearings and any investigations or studies it may undertake;
(B) Conduct any studies or investigations that it considers necessary or appropriate to carry
out its responsibilities under this chapter;
(C) Adopt rules establishing criteria for evaluating the effects on environmental values of
proposed and alternative sites, and projected needs for electric power, and such other rules as are
necessary and convenient to implement this chapter, including rules governing application fees,
supplemental application fees, and other reasonable fees to be paid by persons subject to the board's
jurisdiction. The board shall make an annual accounting of its collection and use of these fees and
shall issue an annual report of its accounting, in the form and manner prescribed by its rules, not
later than the last day of June of the year following the calendar year to which the report applies.
(D) Approve, disapprove, or modify and approve applications for certificates;
(E) Notwithstanding sections 4906.06 to 4906.14 of the Revised Code, the board may adopt
rules to provide for an accelerated review of an application for a construction certificate for

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
15
construction of a major utility facility related to a coal research and development project as defined
in section 1555.01 of the Revised Code, or to a coal development project as defined in section
1551.30 of the Revised Code, submitted to the Ohio coal development office for review under
division (B)(7) of section 1551.33 of the Revised Code. Applications for construction certificates for
construction of major utility facilities for Ohio coal research and development shall be filed with the
board on the same day as the proposed facility or project is submitted to the Ohio coal development
office for review.
The board shall render a decision on an application for a construction certificate within
ninety days after receipt of the application and all of the data and information it may require from
the applicant. In rendering a decision on an application for a construction certificate, the board shall
only consider the criteria and make the findings and determinations set forth in divisions (A)(2), (3),
(5), and (7) and division (B) of section 4906.10 of the Revised Code.
(F) Notwithstanding sections 4906.06 to 4906.14 of the Revised Code, the board shall adopt
rules to provide for an accelerated review of an application for a construction certificate for any of
the following:
(1) An electric transmission line that is:
(a) Not more than two miles in length;
(b) Primarily needed to attract or meet the requirements of a specific customer or specific
customers;
(c) Necessary to maintain reliable electric service as a result of the retirement or shutdown of
an electric generating facility located within the state; or
(d) A rebuilding of an existing transmission line.
(2) An electric generating facility that uses waste heat or natural gas and is primarily within
the current boundary of an existing industrial or electric generating facility;
(3) A gas pipeline that is not more than five miles in length or is primarily needed to meet
the requirements of a specific customer or specific customers.
The board shall adopt rules that provide for the automatic certification to any entity
described in this division when an application by any such entity is not suspended by the board, an
administrative law judge, or the chairperson or executive director of the board for good cause
shown, within ninety days of submission of the application. If an application is suspended, the board
shall approve, disapprove, or modify and approve the application not later than ninety days after the
date of the suspension.
(G) Notwithstanding sections 4906.06 to 4906.14 of the Revised Code, the board shall adopt
rules to provide for the accelerated review of an application for a construction certificate for any of
the following that are located in a priority investment area designated and approved under section
122.161 of the Revised Code:
(1) An electric generating plant and associated facilities;
(2) An electric transmission line and associated facilities;

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
16
(3) Gas pipeline infrastructure.
The chairperson of the board, not later than forty-five days after receipt of an application
submitted under division (G) of this section, shall determine if it complies with all application
requirements set by the public utilities commission by rule. If the chairperson does not issue a
determination within the time period required by this division, the application shall be deemed in
compliance by operation of law.
The board shall render a decision on an application submitted under this division not later
than forty-five days after the application is determined in compliance with all requirements set by
the commission. If the board does not render a decision within forty-five days, the application shall
be considered approved by operation of law, and the board shall issue a certificate to the applicant.
The board shall adopt rules to implement this division, including rules that prioritize
applications for construction on areas negatively impacted by the decline of the coal industry.
(H) Notwithstanding sections 4906.06 to 4906.14 of the Revised Code, the board shall adopt
rules to provide for the accelerated review of an application for a construction certificate for a major
utility facility if at the time the application is filed the construction will be located on the following:
(1) In whole, on property owned by, or under a lease with a term of twenty-five years or
more with, the applicant;
(2) In whole or in part, on an easement or right-of-way;
(3) On any combination of such property, easement, or right-of-way described in divisions
(H)(1) and (2) of this section.
No accelerated application shall be granted under the rules adopted under division (H) of this
section for construction of a major utility facility, in whole or in part, on property under a lease or an
easement or right-of-way, if additional consent for construction on the property, easement, or right-
of-way is required by any person or entity other than the power siting board.
The board shall render a decision on an application submitted under this division not later
than sixty days after receipt of the application. If the board does not render a decision within sixty
days, the application shall be considered approved by operation of law, and the board shall issue a
certificate to the applicant.
Sec. 4906.06. (A) An applicant for a certificate shall file with the office of the chairperson of
the power siting board an application, in such form as the board prescribes, containing the following
information:
(1) A description of the location and of the major utility facility;
(2) A summary of any studies that have been made by or for the applicant of the
environmental impact of the facility;
(3) A statement explaining the need for the facility;
(4) A statement of the reasons why the proposed location is best suited for the facility;
(5) A statement of how the facility fits into the applicant's forecast contained in the report
submitted under section 4935.04 of the Revised Code;

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
17
(6) Such other information as the applicant may consider relevant or as the board by rule or
order may require. Copies of the studies referred to in division (A)(2) of this section shall be filed
with the office of the chairperson, if ordered, and shall be available for public inspection.
(7) For an electric transmission line, a summary of any studies that have been made by or for
the applicant of cost-effective advanced transmission technologies that maximize the value, expand
the capacity, or improve the reliability of the facility.
The application shall be filed not more than five years prior to the planned date of
commencement of construction. The five-year period may be waived by the board for good cause
shown.
(B) Each application shall be accompanied by proof of service of a copy of such application
on the chief executive officer of each municipal corporation and county, and the head of each public
agency charged with the duty of protecting the environment or of planning land use, in the area in
which any portion of such facility is to be located.
(C) Each applicant within fifteen days after the date of the filing of the application shall give
public notice to persons residing in the municipal corporations and counties entitled to receive notice
under division (B) of this section, by the publication of a summary of the application in newspapers
of general circulation in such area. Proof of such publication shall be filed with the office of the
chairperson.
(D) Inadvertent failure of service on, or notice to, any of the persons identified in divisions
(B) and (C) of this section may be cured pursuant to orders of the board designed to afford them
adequate notice to enable them to participate effectively in the proceeding. In addition, the board,
after filing, may require the applicant to serve notice of the application or copies thereof or both
upon such other persons, and file proof thereof, as the board considers appropriate.
(E) An application for an amendment of a certificate shall be in such form and contain such
information as the board prescribes. Notice of such an application shall be given as required in
divisions (B) and (C) of this section.
(F) Each application for certificate or an amendment shall be accompanied by the application
fee prescribed by board rule. All application fees, supplemental application fees, and other fees
collected by the board shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the power siting board
fund, which is hereby created. The chairperson shall administer and authorize expenditures from the
fund for any of the purposes of this chapter. If the chairperson determines that moneys credited to
the fund from an applicant's fee are not sufficient to pay the board's expenses associated with its
review of the application, the chairperson shall request the approval of the controlling board to
assess a supplemental application fee upon an applicant to pay anticipated additional expenses
associated with the board's review of the application or an amendment to an application. If the
chairperson finds that an application fee exceeds the amount needed to pay the board's expenses for
review of the application, the chairperson shall cause a refund of the excess amount to be issued to
the applicant from the fund.

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
18
(G) The chairperson shall determine whether an application is in compliance with this
section not more than forty-five days after the application is filed. If the chairperson does not issue a
determination within the time period required by this division, the application is deemed in
compliance by operation of law.
Sec. 4906.07. (A) Upon the receipt of an application complying with section 4906.06 of the
Revised Code, the power siting board shall promptly fix a date for a public hearing thereon, not less
than sixty forty-five nor more than ninety sixty days after such receipt, and shall conclude the
proceeding as expeditiously as practicable.
(B) On an application for an amendment of a certificate, the board shall hold a hearing in the
same manner as a hearing is held on an application for a certificate if the proposed change in the
facility would result in any material increase in any environmental impact of the facility or a
substantial change in the location of all or a portion of such facility other than as provided in the
alternates set forth in the application.
(C) The chairperson of the power siting board shall cause each application filed with the
board to be investigated and shall, not less than fifteen days prior to the date any application is set
for hearing submit a written report to the board and to the applicant. A copy of such report shall be
made available to any person upon request. Such report shall set forth the nature of the investigation,
and shall contain recommended findings with regard to division (A) of section 4906.10 of the
Revised Code and shall become part of the record and served upon all parties to the proceeding.
Sec. 4906.10. (A) The power siting board shall render a decision upon the record either
granting or denying the application as filed, or granting it upon such terms, conditions, or
modifications of the construction, operation, or maintenance of the major utility facility as the board
considers appropriate. The certificate shall be subject to sections 4906.101, 4906.102, and 4906.103
of the Revised Code and conditioned upon the facility being in compliance with standards and rules
adopted under section 4561.32 and Chapters 3704., 3734., and 6111. of the Revised Code. An
applicant may withdraw an application if the board grants a certificate on terms, conditions, or
modifications other than those proposed by the applicant in the application.
The board shall not grant a certificate for the construction, operation, and maintenance of a
major utility facility, either as proposed or as modified by the board, unless it finds and determines
all of the following:
(1) The basis of the need for the facility if the facility is an electric transmission line or gas
pipeline;
(2) The nature of the probable environmental impact;
(3) That the facility represents the minimum adverse environmental impact, considering the
state of available technology and the nature and economics of the various alternatives, and other
pertinent considerations;
(4) In the case of an electric transmission line or generating facility, that the facility is
consistent with regional plans for expansion of the electric power grid of the electric systems serving

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
19
this state and interconnected utility systems and , that the facility will serve the interests of electric
system economy and reliability, and, in the case of an electric transmission line, that the facility
must consider implementing cost-effective advanced transmission technologies to maximize the
value, expand capacity, or improve the reliability of the facility;
(5) That the facility will comply with Chapters 3704., 3734., and 6111. of the Revised Code
and all rules and standards adopted under those chapters and under section 4561.32 of the Revised
Code. In determining whether the facility will comply with all rules and standards adopted under
section 4561.32 of the Revised Code, the board shall consult with the office of aviation of the
division of multi-modal planning and programs of the department of transportation under section
4561.341 of the Revised Code.
(6) That the facility will serve the public interest, convenience, and necessity;
(7) In addition to the provisions contained in divisions (A)(1) to (6) of this section and rules
adopted under those divisions, what its impact will be on the viability as agricultural land of any
land in an existing agricultural district established under Chapter 929. of the Revised Code that is
located within the site and alternative site of the proposed major utility facility. Rules adopted to
evaluate impact under division (A)(7) of this section shall not require the compilation, creation,
submission, or production of any information, document, or other data pertaining to land not located
within the site and alternative site.
(8) That the facility incorporates maximum feasible water conservation practices as
determined by the board, considering available technology and the nature and economics of the
various alternatives.
(B) If the board determines that the location of all or a part of the proposed facility should be
modified, it may condition its certificate upon that modification, provided that the municipal
corporations and counties, and persons residing therein, affected by the modification shall have been
given reasonable notice thereof.
(C) A copy of the decision and any opinion issued therewith shall be served upon each party.
(D) The board shall render a decision under this section not later than one hundred fifty days
after the date the application is determined to be complete. If the board does not render a decision
within the time period required by this division, the application shall be deemed approved by
operation of law, and the board shall issue a certificate to the applicant.
Sec. 4909.04. (A) The public utilities commission, for the purpose of ascertaining the
reasonableness and justice of rates and charges for the service rendered by public utilities or
railroads, or for any other purpose authorized by law, may investigate and ascertain the value of the
property of any public utility or railroad in this state used or useful for the service and convenience
of the public, using the same criteria that are set forth in section sections 4909.042 and 4909.05 of
the Revised Code. At the request of the legislative authority of any municipal corporation, the
commission, after hearing and determining that such a valuation is necessary, may also investigate
and ascertain the value of the property of any public utility used and useful for the service and

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
20
convenience of the public where the whole or major portion of such public utility is situated in such
municipal corporation.
(B) To assist the commission in preparing such a valuation, every public utility or railroad
shall:
(1) Furnish to the commission, or to its agents, as the commission requires, maps, profiles,
schedules of rates and tariffs, contracts, reports of engineers, and other documents, records, and
papers, or copies of any of them, in aid of any investigation and ascertainment of the value of its
property;
(2) Grant to the commission or its agents free access to all of its premises and property and
its accounts, records, and memoranda whenever and wherever requested by any such authorized
agent;
(3) Cooperate with and aid the commission and its agents in the work of the valuation of its
property in such further particulars and to such extent as the commission requires and directs.
(C) The commission may make all rules which seem necessary to ascertain the value of the
property and plant of each public utility or railroad.
Sec. 4909.041. As used in sections 4909.041, 4909.042, and 4909.05 of the Revised Code:
(A) A "lease purchase agreement" is an agreement pursuant to which a public utility leasing
property is required to make rental payments for the term of the agreement and either the utility is
granted the right to purchase the property upon the completion of the term of the agreement and
upon the payment of an additional fixed sum of money or title to the property vests in the utility
upon the making of the final rental payment.
(B) A "leaseback" is the sale or transfer of property by a public utility to another person
contemporaneously followed by the leasing of the property to the public utility on a long-term basis.
Sec. 4909.042. (A) With respect to an electric light company that chooses to file a forecasted
test period under section 4909.18 of the Revised Code, the public utilities commission shall
prescribe the form and details of the valuation report of the property of the utility. Such report shall
include all the kinds and classes of property, with the value of each, owned, held, or projected to be
owned or held during the test period, by the utility for the service and convenience of the public.
(B) Such report shall contain the following facts in detail:
(1) The original cost of each parcel of land owned in fee and projected to be owned in fee
and in use during the test period, determined by the commission; and also a statement of the
conditions of acquisition, whether by direct purchase, by donation, by exercise of the power of
eminent domain, or otherwise;
(2) The actual acquisition cost, not including periodic rental fees, of rights-of-way, trailways,
or other land rights projected to be held during the test period, by virtue of easements, leases, or
other forms of grants of rights as to usage;
(3) The original cost of all other kinds and classes of property projected to be used and
useful during the test period, in the rendition of service to the public. Such original costs of property,

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
21
other than land owned in fee, shall be the cost, as determined to be reasonable by the commission, to
the person that first dedicated or dedicates the property to the public use and shall be set forth in
property accounts and subaccounts as prescribed by the commission;
(4) The cost of property constituting all or part of a project projected to be leased to or used
by the utility during the test period, under Chapter 165., 3706., 6121., or 6123. of the Revised Code
and not included under division (B)(3) of this section exclusive of any interest directly or indirectly
paid by the utility with respect thereto whether or not capitalized;
(5) In the discretion of the commission, the cost to a utility, in an amount determined to be
reasonable by the commission, of property constituting all or part of a project projected to be leased
to the utility during the test period, under a lease purchase agreement or a leaseback and not included
under division (B)(3) of this section exclusive of any interest directly or indirectly paid by the utility
with respect thereto whether or not capitalized;
(6) The proper and adequate reserve for depreciation, as determined to be reasonable by the
commission;
(7) Any sums of money or property that the utility is projected to receive during the test
period, as total or partial defrayal of the cost of its property;
(8) The valuation of the property of the utility, which shall be the sum of the amounts
contained in the report pursuant to divisions (B)(1) to (5) of this section, less the sum of the amounts
contained in the report pursuant to divisions (B)(6) and (7) of this section.
(C) The report shall show separately the property projected to be used and useful to or held
by the utility during the test period, and such other items as the commission considers proper. The
commission may require an additional report showing the extent to which the property is projected
to be used and useful during the test period. Such reports shall be filed in the office of the
commission for the information of the governor and the general assembly.
(D) Any financial information required to be submitted by an electric light company under
this section shall be provided from the company's full books. The commission shall ensure
appropriate protections against the disclosure of the company's trade secrets or proprietary
information.
Sec. 4909.05. As used in this section:
(A) A "lease purchase agreement" is an agreement pursuant to which a public utility leasing
property is required to make rental payments for the term of the agreement and either the utility is
granted the right to purchase the property upon the completion of the term of the agreement and
upon the payment of an additional fixed sum of money or title to the property vests in the utility
upon the making of the final rental payment.
(B) A "leaseback" is the sale or transfer of property by a public utility to another person
contemporaneously followed by the leasing of the property to the public utility on a long-term basis.
(C) The With respect to every public utility, other than an electric light company that
chooses to file a forecasted test period under section 4909.18 of the Revised Code, the public

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
22
utilities commission shall prescribe the form and details of the valuation report of the property of
each public utility or railroad in the state. Such report shall include all the kinds and classes of
property, with the value of each, owned, held, or, with respect to a natural gas, water-works, or
sewage disposal system company, projected to be owned or held as of the date certain, by each
public utility or railroad used and useful, or, with respect to a natural gas, water-works, or sewage
disposal system company, projected to be used and useful as of the date certain, for the service and
convenience of the public. Such
(B) Such report shall contain the following facts in detail:
(1) The original cost of each parcel of land owned in fee and in use, or, with respect to a
natural gas, water-works, or sewage disposal system company, projected to be owned in fee and in
use as of the date certain, determined by the commission; and also a statement of the conditions of
acquisition, whether by direct purchase, by donation, by exercise of the power of eminent domain, or
otherwise;
(2) The actual acquisition cost, not including periodic rental fees, of rights-of-way, trailways,
or other land rights held, or, with respect to a natural gas, water-works, or sewage disposal system
company, projected to be held as of the date certain, by virtue of easements, leases, or other forms of
grants of rights as to usage;
(3) The original cost of all other kinds and classes of property used and useful, or, with
respect to a natural gas, water-works, or sewage disposal system company, projected to be used and
useful as of the date certain, in the rendition of service to the public. Subject to section 4909.052 of
the Revised Code, such original costs of property, other than land owned in fee, shall be the cost, as
determined to be reasonable by the commission, to the person that first dedicated or dedicates the
property to the public use and shall be set forth in property accounts and subaccounts as prescribed
by the commission. To the extent that the costs of property comprising a coal research and
development facility, as defined in section 1555.01 of the Revised Code, or a coal development
project, as defined in section 1551.30 of the Revised Code, have been allowed for recovery as Ohio
coal research and development costs under section 4905.304 of the Revised Code, none of those
costs shall be included as a cost of property under this division.
(4) The cost of property constituting all or part of a project leased to or used by the utility,
or, with respect to a natural gas, water-works, or sewage disposal system company, projected to be
leased to or used by the utility as of the date certain, under Chapter 165., 3706., 6121., or 6123. of
the Revised Code and not included under division (C)(3)(B)(3) of this section exclusive of any
interest directly or indirectly paid by the utility with respect thereto whether or not capitalized;
(5) In the discretion of the commission, the cost to a utility, in an amount determined to be
reasonable by the commission, of property constituting all or part of a project leased to the utility, or,
with respect to a natural gas, water-works, or sewage disposal system company, projected to be
leased to the utility as of the date certain, under a lease purchase agreement or a leaseback and not
included under division (C)(3)(B)(3) of this section exclusive of any interest directly or indirectly

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
23
paid by the utility with respect thereto whether or not capitalized;
(6) The cost of the replacement of water service lines incurred by a water-works company
under section 4909.173 of the Revised Code and the water service line replacement reimbursement
amounts provided to customers under section 4909.174 of the Revised Code;
(7) The proper and adequate reserve for depreciation, as determined to be reasonable by the
commission;
(8) Any sums of money or property that the company may have received, or, with respect to
a natural gas, water-works, or sewage disposal system company, is projected to receive as of the date
certain, as total or partial defrayal of the cost of its property;
(9) The valuation of the property of the company, which shall be the sum of the amounts
contained in the report pursuant to divisions (C)(1)(B)(1) to (6) of this section, less the sum of the
amounts contained in the report pursuant to divisions (C)(7)(B)(7) and (8) of this section.
(C) The report shall show separately the property used and useful to such public utility or
railroad in the furnishing of the service to the public, the property held by such public utility or
railroad for other purposes, and the property projected to be used and useful to or held by a natural
gas, water-works, or sewage disposal system company as of the date certain, and such other items as
the commission considers proper. The commission may require an additional report showing the
extent to which the property is used and useful, or, with respect to a natural gas, water-works, or
sewage disposal system company, projected to be used and useful as of the date certain. Such reports
shall be filed in the office of the commission for the information of the governor and the general
assembly.
Sec. 4909.052. Subject to a finding that such costs are just and reasonable, the public utilities
commission in evaluating a petition submitted under section 4905.481 of the Revised Code shall
accept the original cost, reported under division (C)(3) (B)(3) of section 4909.05 of the Revised
Code, of the acquisition of a municipal water-works or sewage disposal system company that is
acquired by a large water-works or sewage disposal system company, provided that the original cost
is determined according to all of the following requirements:
(A) The acquiring company has three appraisals performed on the property of the company
being acquired.
(B) The three appraisals are performed by three independent utility-valuation experts
mutually selected by the acquiring company and the company being acquired from the list
maintained under section 4909.054 of the Revised Code.
(C) The average of the three appraisals is used as the fair market value of the company being
acquired.
(D) Each utility-valuation expert does all of the following:
(1) Determines the fair market value of the company to be acquired by establishing the
amount for which the company would be sold in a voluntary transaction between a willing buyer and
a willing seller under no obligation to buy or sell;

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
24
(2) Determines the fair market value in compliance with the uniform standards of
professional appraisal practice;
(3) Employs the cost, market, and income approach to independently quantify the future
benefits of the company to be acquired;
(4) Incorporates the assessment described in division (D)(5) of this section into the appraisal
under the cost, market, and income approach;
(5) Engages one engineer who is licensed to prepare an assessment of the tangible assets of
the company to be acquired. The original source of funding for any part of the tangible assets shall
not be relevant to the determination of the value of those assets.
(E) The lesser of the purchase price or the fair market value, described in division (C) of this
section, is reported as the original cost under division (C)(3) (B)(3) of section 4909.05 of the
Revised Code of the company to be acquired.
Sec. 4909.06. The investigation and report required by section section 4909.042 or 4909.05
of the Revised Code shall show, when the public utilities commission deems it necessary, the
amounts, dates, and rates of interest of all bonds outstanding against each public utility or railroad,
the property upon which such bonds are a lien, the amounts paid for them, and, the original capital
stock and the moneys received by any such public utility or railroad by reason of any issue of stock,
bonds, or other securities. Such report shall also show the net and gross receipts of such public
utility or railroad and the method by which moneys were expended or paid out and the purpose of
such payments. The commission may prescribe the procedure to be followed in making the
investigation and valuation, the form in which the results of the ascertainment of the value of each
public utility or railroad shall be submitted, and the classifications of the elements that constitute the
ascertained value. Such investigation shall also show the value of the property of every public utility
or railroad as a whole, and if such property is in more than one county, the value of its property in
each of such counties.
"Valuation" and "value," as used in this section, may include, with :
(A) With respect to a public utility that is a natural gas, water-works, or sewage disposal
system company, projected valuation and value as of the date certain, if applicable because of a
future date certain under section 4909.15 of the Revised Code;
(B) With respect to an electric light company that chooses to file a forecasted test period
under section 4909.18 of the Revised Code, the valuation and value during the forecasted test period.
Sec. 4909.07. The public utilities commission, during the making of the valuation provided
for in sections 4909.04 to 4909.13 of the Revised Code, and after its completion, shall in like
manner keep itself informed through its engineers, experts, and other assistants of all extensions,
improvements, or other changes in the condition and value of the property of all public utilities or
railroads and shall ascertain the value of such extensions, improvements, and changes. The
commission shall, as is required for the proper regulation of such public utilities or railroads, revise
and correct its valuations of property, showing such revisions and corrections as a whole and as to

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
25
each county. Such revisions and corrections shall be filed in the same manner as original reports.
"Valuation" and "value," as used in this section, may include, with :
(A) With respect to a public utility that is a natural gas, water-works, or sewage disposal
system company, projected valuation and value as of the date certain, if applicable because of a
future date certain under section 4909.15 of the Revised Code;
(B) With respect to an electric light company that chooses to file a forecasted test period
under section 4909.18 of the Revised Code, the valuation and value during the forecasted test period.
Sec. 4909.08. When the public utilities commission has completed the valuation of the
property of any public utility or railroad and before such valuation becomes final, it shall give notice
by registered letter to such public utility or railroad, and if a substantial portion of said public utility
or railroad is situated in a municipal corporation, then to the mayor of such municipal corporation,
stating the valuations placed upon the several kinds and classes of property of such public utility or
railroad and upon the property as a whole and give such further notice by publication or otherwise as
it shall deem necessary to apprise the public of such valuation. If, within thirty days after such
notification, no protest has been filed with the commission, such valuation becomes final. If notice
of protest has been filed by any public utility or railroad, the commission shall fix a time for hearing
such protest and shall consider at such hearing any matter material thereto presented by such public
utility, railroad, or municipal corporation, in support of its protest or by any representative of the
public against such protest. If, after the hearing of any protest of any valuation so fixed, the
commission is of the opinion that its inventory is incomplete or inaccurate or that its valuation is
incorrect, it shall make such changes as are necessary and shall issue an order making such corrected
valuations final. A final valuation by the commission and all classifications made for the
ascertainment of such valuations shall be public and are prima-facie evidence relative to the value of
the property.
"Valuation" and "value," as used in this section, may include, with :
(A) With respect to a public utility that is a natural gas, water-works, or sewage disposal
system company, projected valuation and value as of the date certain, if applicable because of a
future date certain under section 4909.15 of the Revised Code;
(B) With respect to an electric light company that chooses to file a forecasted test period
under section 4909.18 of the Revised Code, the valuation and value during the forecasted test period.
Sec. 4909.15. (A) The public utilities commission, when fixing and determining just and
reasonable rates, fares, tolls, rentals, and charges, shall determine:
(1) The (1)(a) With respect to a public utility that is a natural gas, water-works, or sewage
disposal system company, or that is an electric light company that chooses not to file a forecasted
test period under section 4909.18 of the Revised Code, the valuation as of the date certain of the
property of the public utility that is used and useful or, with respect to a natural gas, water-works, or
sewage disposal system company, is projected to be used and useful as of the date certain, in
rendering the public utility service for which rates are to be fixed and determined. The

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
26
(b) With respect to an electric light company that chooses to file a forecasted test period
under section 4909.18 of the Revised Code, the valuation of the property of the utility that is
projected to be used and useful during the forecasted test period in rendering the public utility
service for which rates are to be fixed and determined.
(c) The valuation so determined under division (A)(1) of this section for any public utility
shall be the total value as set forth in division (C)(9)(B)(8) of section 4909.042 of the Revised Code
and division (B)(9) of section 4909.05 of the Revised Code, and a reasonable allowance for
materials and supplies and a reasonable allowance for cash working capital as determined by the
commission.
The commission, in its discretion, may include in the valuation a reasonable allowance for
construction work in progress but, in no event, may such an allowance be made by the commission
until it has determined that the particular construction project is at least seventy-five per cent
complete.
In determining the percentage completion of a particular construction project, the
commission shall consider, among other relevant criteria, the per cent of time elapsed in
construction; the per cent of construction funds, excluding allowance for funds used during
construction, expended, or obligated to such construction funds budgeted where all such funds are
adjusted to reflect current purchasing power; and any physical inspection performed by or on behalf
of any party, including the commission's staff.
A reasonable allowance for construction work in progress shall not exceed ten per cent of the
total valuation as stated in this division, not including such allowance for construction work in
progress.
Where the commission permits an allowance for construction work in progress, the dollar
value of the project or portion thereof included in the valuation as construction work in progress
shall not be included in the valuation as plant in service until such time as the total revenue effect of
the construction work in progress allowance is offset by the total revenue effect of the plant in
service exclusion. Carrying charges calculated in a manner similar to allowance for funds used
during construction shall accrue on that portion of the project in service but not reflected in rates as
plant in service, and such accrued carrying charges shall be included in the valuation of the property
at the conclusion of the offset period for purposes of division (C)(9) of section 4909.05 of the
Revised Code.
From and after April 10, 1985, no allowance for construction work in progress as it relates to
a particular construction project shall be reflected in rates for a period exceeding forty-eight
consecutive months commencing on the date the initial rates reflecting such allowance become
effective, except as otherwise provided in this division.
The applicable maximum period in rates for an allowance for construction work in progress
as it relates to a particular construction project shall be tolled if, and to the extent, a delay in the in-
service date of the project is caused by the action or inaction of any federal, state, county, or

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
27
municipal agency having jurisdiction, where such action or inaction relates to a change in a rule,
standard, or approval of such agency, and where such action or inaction is not the result of the
failure of the utility to reasonably endeavor to comply with any rule, standard, or approval prior to
such change.
In the event that such period expires before the project goes into service, the commission
shall exclude, from the date of expiration, the allowance for the project as construction work in
progress from rates, except that the commission may extend the expiration date up to twelve months
for good cause shown.
In the event that a utility has permanently canceled, abandoned, or terminated construction
of a project for which it was previously permitted a construction work in progress allowance, the
commission immediately shall exclude the allowance for the project from the valuation.
In the event that a construction work in progress project previously included in the valuation
is removed from the valuation pursuant to this division, any revenues collected by the utility from its
customers after April 10, 1985, that resulted from such prior inclusion shall be offset against future
revenues over the same period of time as the project was included in the valuation as construction
work in progress. The total revenue effect of such offset shall not exceed the total revenues
previously collected.
In no event shall the total revenue effect of any offset or offsets provided under division (A)
(1) of this section exceed the total revenue effect of any construction work in progress allowance.
(2) A fair and reasonable rate of return to the utility on the valuation as determined in
division (A)(1) of this section;
(3) The dollar annual return to which the utility is entitled by applying the fair and
reasonable rate of return as determined under division (A)(2) of this section to the valuation of the
utility determined under division (A)(1) of this section;
(4) The cost to the utility of rendering the public utility service for the test period used for
the determination under division (C)(1) of this section, less the total of any interest on cash or credit
refunds paid, pursuant to section 4909.42 of the Revised Code, by the utility during the test period.
(a) Federal, state, and local taxes imposed on or measured by net income may, in the
discretion of the commission, be computed by the normalization method of accounting, provided the
utility maintains accounting reserves that reflect differences between taxes actually payable and
taxes on a normalized basis, provided that no determination as to the treatment in the rate-making
process of such taxes shall be made that will result in loss of any tax depreciation or other tax benefit
to which the utility would otherwise be entitled, and further provided that such tax benefit as
redounds to the utility as a result of such a computation may not be retained by the company, used to
fund any dividend or distribution, or utilized for any purpose other than the defrayal of the operating
expenses of the utility and the defrayal of the expenses of the utility in connection with construction
work.
(b) The amount of any tax credits granted to an electric light company under section

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
28
5727.391 of the Revised Code for Ohio coal burned prior to January 1, 2000, shall not be retained by
the company, used to fund any dividend or distribution, or utilized for any purposes other than the
defrayal of the allowable operating expenses of the company and the defrayal of the allowable
expenses of the company in connection with the installation, acquisition, construction, or use of a
compliance facility. The amount of the tax credits granted to an electric light company under that
section for Ohio coal burned prior to January 1, 2000, shall be returned to its customers within three
years after initially claiming the credit through an offset to the company's rates or fuel component, as
determined by the commission, as set forth in schedules filed by the company under section 4905.30
of the Revised Code. As used in division (A)(4)(b) of this section, "compliance facility" has the
same meaning as in section 5727.391 of the Revised Code.
(B) The commission shall compute the gross annual revenues to which the utility is entitled
by adding the dollar amount of return under division (A)(3) of this section to the cost, for the test
period used for the determination under division (C)(1) of this section, of rendering the public utility
service under division (A)(4) of this section.
(C)(1) Except as provided in division (D) of this section, the revenues and expenses of the
utility shall be determined during a test period. The utility may as follows:
(a) Electric light companies may propose a forecasted test period. If the company proposes a
forecasted test period, the company shall propose annual base rates for three consecutive twelve-
month periods in a single forecasted test period application.
During the first twelve-month period, the company shall propose a reasonably forecasted
rate base using a thirteen-month average, revenues, and expenses for the first twelve months that
new base rates will be in effect.
During the second twelve-month period, the base rate revenue requirement shall be adjusted
for the return of, and return on, incremental rate base additions approved by the commission in the
initial application. During the third twelve-month period, the base rate revenue requirement shall be
adjusted for the return of and return on incremental rate base additions approved by the commission
in the initial application.
For each twelve-month period, forecasted plant investment, forecasted revenues, and
forecasted expenses versus actual investment, actual revenues, and actual expenses shall be trued up
via a cost recovery mechanism approved by the commission.
Each true-up process shall include an adjustment to actual for the rate of return that the
company is authorized to earn on the actual investments made. The company shall provide the
commission with actual financial information during the true-up process to ensure accuracy. As part
of the true-up process, the commission shall include only rate base components that have been found
by the commission to be used and useful in rendering public utility service.
At the end of the last test period, the company shall file for a rate case under section 4909.18
of the Revised Code.
(b) All utilities, except for electric light companies that choose to file under division (C)(1)

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
29
(a) of this section, shall propose a test period for this determination that is any twelve-month period
beginning not more than six months prior to the date the application is filed and ending not more
than nine months subsequent to that date. The test period for determining revenues and expenses of
the utility shall be the test period proposed by the utility, unless otherwise ordered by the
commission.
(2) The For utilities filing under division (C)(1)(b) of this section, the date certain shall be
not later than the date of filing, except that it shall be, for a natural gas, water-works, or sewage
disposal system company, not later than the end of the test period.
(D) A natural gas, water-works, or sewage disposal system company Utilities filing under
division (C)(1)(b) of this section may propose adjustments to the revenues and expenses to be
determined under division (C)(1) of this section for any changes that are, during the test period or
the twelve-month period immediately following the test period, reasonably expected to occur. The
natural gas, water-works, or sewage disposal system company utility shall identify and quantify,
individually, any proposed adjustments. The commission shall incorporate the proposed adjustments
into the determination if the adjustments are just and reasonable.
(E) When the commission is of the opinion, after hearing and after making the
determinations under divisions (A) and (B) of this section, that any rate, fare, charge, toll, rental,
schedule, classification, or service, or any joint rate, fare, charge, toll, rental, schedule, classification,
or service rendered, charged, demanded, exacted, or proposed to be rendered, charged, demanded, or
exacted, is, or will be, unjust, unreasonable, unjustly discriminatory, unjustly preferential, or in
violation of law, that the service is, or will be, inadequate, or that the maximum rates, charges, tolls,
or rentals chargeable by any such public utility are insufficient to yield reasonable compensation for
the service rendered, and are unjust and unreasonable, the commission shall:
(1) With due regard among other things to the value of all property of the public utility
actually used and useful for the convenience of the public as determined under division (A)(1) of
this section, excluding from such value the value of any franchise or right to own, operate, or enjoy
the same in excess of the amount, exclusive of any tax or annual charge, actually paid to any
political subdivision of the state or county, as the consideration for the grant of such franchise or
right, and excluding any value added to such property by reason of a monopoly or merger, with due
regard in determining the dollar annual return under division (A)(3) of this section to the necessity of
making reservation out of the income for surplus, depreciation, and contingencies, and;
(2) With due regard to all such other matters as are proper, according to the facts in each
case,
(a) Including a fair and reasonable rate of return determined by the commission with
reference to a cost of debt equal to the actual embedded cost of debt of such public utility,
(b) But not including the portion of any periodic rental or use payments representing that
cost of property that is included in the valuation report under divisions (C)(4)(B)(4) and (5) of
section 4909.042 of the Revised Code and divisions (B)(4) and (5) of section 4909.05 of the Revised

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
30
Code, fix and determine the just and reasonable rate, fare, charge, toll, rental, or service to be
rendered, charged, demanded, exacted, or collected for the performance or rendition of the service
that will provide the public utility the allowable gross annual revenues under division (B) of this
section, and order such just and reasonable rate, fare, charge, toll, rental, or service to be substituted
for the existing one. After such determination and order no change in the rate, fare, toll, charge,
rental, schedule, classification, or service shall be made, rendered, charged, demanded, exacted, or
changed by such public utility without the order of the commission, and any other rate, fare, toll,
charge, rental, classification, or service is prohibited.
(F) Upon application of any person or any public utility, and after notice to the parties in
interest and opportunity to be heard as provided in Chapters 4901., 4903., 4905., 4907., 4909.,
4921., and 4923. of the Revised Code for other hearings, has been given, the commission may
rescind, alter, or amend an order fixing any rate, fare, toll, charge, rental, classification, or service, or
any other order made by the commission. Certified copies of such orders shall be served and take
effect as provided for original orders.
Sec. 4909.156. In fixing the just, reasonable, and compensatory rates, joint rates, tolls,
classifications, charges, or rentals to be observed and charged for service by any public utility, the
public utilities commission shall, in action upon an application filed pursuant to section 4909.18 of
the Revised Code, require a public utility to file a report showing the proportionate amounts of the
valuation of the property of the utility, as determined under section 4909.042 or 4909.05 of the
Revised Code, and the proportionate amounts of the revenues and expenses of the utility that are
proposed to be considered as attributable to the service area involved in the application.
"Valuation," as used in this section, may include, with :
(A) With respect to a public utility that is a natural gas, water-works, or sewage disposal
system company, projected valuation as of the date certain, if applicable because of a future date
certain under section 4909.15 of the Revised Code;
(B) With respect to an electric light company that chooses to file a forecasted test period
under section 4909.18 of the Revised Code, the valuation and value during the forecasted test period.
Sec. 4909.159. An electric light company proposing a forecasted test period under division
(C)(1)(a) of section 4909.15 of the Revised Code shall provide any financial information required by
that section from the company's full books. The public utilities commission shall ensure appropriate
protections against the disclosure of the company's trade secrets or proprietary information.
Sec. 4909.173. (A) As used in this section and section 4909.174 of the Revised Code:
(1) "Customer-owned water service line" means the water service line connected to the
water-works company's water service line at the curb of a customer's property.
(2) "Water-works company" means an entity defined under division (G) of section 4905.03
of the Revised Code that is a public utility under section 4905.02 of the Revised Code.
(B) A water-works company may do any of the following:
(1) Replace lead customer-owned water service lines concurrently with a scheduled utility

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
31
main replacement project, an emergency replacement, or company-initiated lead water service line
replacement program;
(2) Replace lead customer-owned water service lines when mandated or ordered to replace
such lines by law or a state or federal regulatory agency;
(3) Replace customer-owned water service lines of other composition when mandated or
ordered to replace such lines by law or a state or federal regulatory agency.
(C) If a water-works company replaces customer-owned water service lines under this
section, then the company shall include the cost of the replacement of the water service lines,
including the cost of replacement of both company side and customer-owned water service lines and
the cost to evaluate customer-owned water service lines of unknown composition, in the valuation
report of the property of the company as required under division (C)(6)(B)(6) of section 4909.05 of
the Revised Code for inclusion in a rate case under this chapter.
(D) The water service customer who is responsible for the customer-owned water service
line that was replaced under this section shall hold legal title to the replaced water service line.
Sec. 4909.174. (A) A water-works company shall reimburse a customer who replaces the
customer's customer-owned water service line, if both of the following occur:
(1) The company confirms that the customer-owned water service line was composed of lead
or other composition that was mandated or ordered to be replaced by law or a state or federal
regulatory agency;
(2) The customer submits the reimbursement request to the company not later than twelve
months after the completion of the water line replacement.
(B) A water-works company that provides a reimbursement to a customer under this section
shall include the reimbursement amount in the valuation report of the property of the company as
required under division (C)(6)(B)(6) of section 4909.05 of the Revised Code for inclusion in a rate
case under this chapter.
Sec. 4909.18. Any public utility desiring to establish any rate, joint rate, toll, classification,
charge, or rental, or to modify, amend, change, increase, or reduce any existing rate, joint rate, toll,
classification, charge, or rental, or any regulation or practice affecting the same, shall file a written
application with the public utilities commission. Except for actions under section 4909.16 of the
Revised Code, no public utility may issue the notice of intent to file an application pursuant to
division (B) of section 4909.43 of the Revised Code to increase any existing rate, joint rate, toll,
classification, charge, or rental, until a final order under this section has been issued by the
commission on any pending prior application to increase the same rate, joint rate, toll, classification,
charge, or rental or until two hundred seventy-five days after filing such application, whichever is
sooner. Such application shall be verified by the president or a vice-president and the secretary or
treasurer of the applicant. Such application shall contain a schedule of the existing rate, joint rate,
toll, classification, charge, or rental, or regulation or practice affecting the same, a schedule of the
modification amendment, change, increase, or reduction sought to be established, and a statement of

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
32
the facts and grounds upon which such application is based. If such application proposes a new
service or the use of new equipment, or proposes the establishment or amendment of a regulation,
the application shall fully describe the new service or equipment, or the regulation proposed to be
established or amended, and shall explain how the proposed service or equipment differs from
services or equipment presently offered or in use, or how the regulation proposed to be established
or amended differs from regulations presently in effect. The application shall provide such additional
information as the commission may require in its discretion. If the commission determines that such
application is not for an increase in any rate, joint rate, toll, classification, charge, or rental, the
commission may permit the filing of the schedule proposed in the application and fix the time when
such schedule shall take effect. If it appears to the commission that the proposals in the application
may be unjust or unreasonable, the commission shall set the matter for hearing and shall give notice
of such hearing by sending written notice of the date set for the hearing to the public utility and
publishing notice of the hearing one time in a newspaper of general circulation in each county in the
service area affected by the application. At such hearing, the burden of proof to show that the
proposals in the application are just and reasonable shall be upon the public utility. After such
hearing, the commission shall, where practicable, issue an appropriate order within six months from
the date the application was filed.
If the commission determines that said application is for an increase in any rate, joint rate,
toll, classification, charge, or rental there shall also, unless otherwise ordered by the commission, be
filed with the application in duplicate the following exhibits:
(A) A report of its property used and useful, or, with respect to a natural gas, water-works, or
sewage disposal system company, projected to be used and useful, as of the date certain, or during
the forecasted test period, if the application is filed under division (C)(1)(a) of section 4909.15 of the
Revised Code, in rendering the service referred to in such application, as provided in section
sections 4909.042 and 4909.05 of the Revised Code;
(B) A complete operating statement of its last fiscal year, showing in detail all its receipts,
revenues, and incomes from all sources, all of its operating costs and other expenditures, and any
analysis such public utility deems applicable to the matter referred to in said application;
(C) A statement of the income and expense anticipated under the application filed;
(D) A statement of financial condition summarizing assets, liabilities, and net worth;
(E) Such other information as the commission may require in its discretion.
Sec. 4909.181. (A) As used in this section, "electric distribution utility" has the same
meaning as in section 4928.01 of the Revised Code.
(B) Not later than December 31, 2029, and at least every three years thereafter, each electric
distribution utility shall file a rate case application regarding distribution service under section
4909.18 of the Revised Code.
Sec. 4909.19. (A) Upon the filing of any application for increase provided for by section
4909.18 of the Revised Code the public utility shall forthwith publish notice of such application, in a

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
33
form approved by the public utilities commission, once a week for two consecutive weeks in a
newspaper published and in general circulation throughout the territory in which such public utility
operates and directly affected by the matters referred to in said application. The notice shall include
instructions for direct electronic access to the application or other documents on file with the public
utilities commission. The first publication of the notice shall be made in its entirety and may be
made in a preprinted insert in the newspaper. The second publication may be abbreviated if all of the
following apply:
(1) The abbreviated notice is at least one-fourth of the size of the notice in the first
publication.
(2) At the same time the abbreviated notice is published, the notice in the first publication is
posted in its entirety on the newspaper's web site, if the newspaper has a web site, and the
commission's web site.
(3) The abbreviated notice contains a statement of the web site posting or postings, as
applicable, and instructions for accessing the posting or postings.
(B) The commission shall determine a format for the content of all notices required under
this section, and shall consider costs and technological efficiencies in making that determination.
Defects in the publication of said notice shall not affect the legality or sufficiency of notices
published under this section provided that the commission has substantially complied with this
section, as described in section 4905.09 of the Revised Code.
(C) The commission shall at once cause an investigation to be made of the facts set forth in
said application and the exhibits attached thereto, and of the matters connected therewith. Within a
reasonable time as determined by the commission one hundred eighty days after the filing of such
application is determined to be complete, a written report shall be made and filed with the
commission, a copy of which shall be sent by certified mail to the applicant, the mayor of any
municipal corporation affected by the application, and to such other persons as the commission
deems interested. If no objection to such report is made by any party interested within thirty days
after such filing and the mailing of copies thereof, the commission shall fix a date within ten days
for the final hearing upon said application, giving notice thereof to all parties interested. At such
hearing the commission shall consider the matters set forth in said application and make such order
respecting the prayer thereof as to it seems just and reasonable.
If objections are filed with the commission, the commission shall cause a pre-hearing
conference to be held between all parties, intervenors, and the commission staff in all cases
involving more than one hundred thousand customers.
If objections are filed with the commission within thirty days after the filing of such report,
the application shall be promptly set down for hearing of testimony before the commission or be
forthwith referred to an attorney examiner designated by the commission to take all the testimony
with respect to the application and objections which may be offered by any interested party. The
commission shall also fix the time and place to take testimony giving ten days' written notice of such

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
34
time and place to all parties. The taking of testimony shall commence on the date fixed in said notice
and shall continue from day to day until completed. The attorney examiner may, upon good cause
shown, grant continuances for not more than three days, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and
holidays. The commission may grant continuances for a longer period than three days upon its order
for good cause shown. At any hearing involving rates or charges sought to be increased, the burden
of proof to show that the increased rates or charges are just and reasonable shall be on the public
utility.
When the taking of testimony is completed, a full and complete record of such testimony
noting all objections made and exceptions taken by any party or counsel, shall be made, signed by
the attorney examiner, and filed with the commission. Prior to the formal consideration of the
application by the commission and the rendition of any order respecting the prayer of the
application, a quorum of the commission shall consider the recommended opinion and order of the
attorney examiner, in an open, formal, public proceeding in which an overview and explanation is
presented orally. Thereafter, the commission shall make such order respecting the prayer of such
application as seems just and reasonable to it.
In all proceedings before the commission in which the taking of testimony is required,
except when heard by the commission, attorney examiners shall be assigned by the commission to
take such testimony and fix the time and place therefor, and such testimony shall be taken in the
manner prescribed in this section. All testimony shall be under oath or affirmation and taken down
and transcribed by a reporter and made a part of the record in the case. The commission may hear
the testimony or any part thereof in any case without having the same referred to an attorney
examiner and may take additional testimony. Testimony shall be taken and a record made in
accordance with such general rules as the commission prescribes and subject to such special
instructions in any proceedings as it, by order, directs.
Sec. 4909.191. (A) If the public utilities commission, under division (D) of section 4909.15
of the Revised Code, incorporated proposed adjustments to revenues and expenses into the
commission's determination under that section, the natural gas, water-works, or sewage disposal
system company public utility shall, not later than ninety days after actual data for all of the
incorporated adjustments becomes known, submit to the commission proposed rate or charge
adjustments that provide for the recalculation of rates or charges, reflective of customer-class
responsibility, corresponding to the differences, if any, between the incorporated adjustments to
revenues and expenses and the actual revenues and expenses associated with the incorporated
adjustments.
(B) If the commission incorporated projected value or valuation of property into the
commission's determination under division (A)(1)(A)(1)(a) of section 4909.15 of the Revised Code,
the natural gas, water-works, or sewage disposal system company shall, not later than ninety days
after data for the actual value or valuation as of the date certain becomes known, submit to the
commission proposed rate or charge adjustments that provide for the recalculation of rates or

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
35
charges, reflective of customer-class responsibility, corresponding to the differences, if any, between
the projected value or valuation incorporated into the commission's determination and the actual
value or valuation as of the date certain.
(C) The commission shall review the proposed rate or charge adjustments submitted under
divisions (A) and (B) of this section. The review shall not include a hearing unless the commission
finds that the proposed rate or charge adjustments may be unreasonable, in which case the
commission may, in its discretion, schedule the matter for a hearing.
(D) The commission shall issue, not later than one hundred fifty days after the date that any
proposed rate or charge adjustments are submitted under division (A) or (B) of this section, a final
order on the proposed rate or charge adjustments. Any rate or charge adjustments authorized under
this division shall be limited to amounts that are not greater than those consistent with the proposed
adjustments to revenues and expenses that were incorporated into the commission's determination
under division (D) of section 4909.15 of the Revised Code, and not greater than those consistent
with the incorporated projected value or valuation. In no event shall rate or charge adjustments
authorized under this division be upward.
After the commission has issued such a final order, the natural gas, water-works, or sewage
disposal system companypublic utility, if applicable, shall submit to the commission proposed
reconciliation adjustments that refund to customers the difference between the actual revenues
collected by the natural gas, water-works, or sewage disposal system company,utility under the rates
and charges determined by the commission under section 4909.15 of the Revised Code, and the rates
or charges recalculated under the adjustments authorized under this division. The reconciliation
adjustments shall be effective for a twelve-month period.
(E) The reconciliation adjustments ordered under division (D) of this section may be subject
to a final reconciliation by the commission. Any such final reconciliation shall occur after the
twelve-month period described in division (D) of this section.
Sec. 4909.192. When considering an application to increase rates under section 4909.18 of
the Revised Code, the public utilities commission may approve the following:
(A) Nondiscriminatory programs available for all energy-intensive customers to implement
economic development, job growth, job retention, or interruptible rates that enhance distribution and
transmission grid reliability and promote economic development.
(B) Nondiscriminatory programs available for all mercantile customers, as defined in section
4928.01 of the Revised Code, that align retail rate recovery with how transmission costs are incurred
by or charged to the electric distribution utility, as defined in section 4928.01 of the Revised Code,
or programs that allow customers to be billed directly for transmission service by a competitive
retail electric service provider.
Sec. 4909.193. (A) The public utilities commission shall determine whether an application
for an increase filed under section 4909.18 of the Revised Code is complete not more than forty-five
days after the application is filed. If the commission does not issue a determination within the time

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
36
period required by this section, the application shall be deemed complete by operation of law.
(B) For purposes of section 4909.421 of the Revised Code, the date of the commission order
determining that the application is complete, or the date the application is deemed complete by
operation of law, shall be deemed to be the date of the filing of the application.
Sec. 4909.42. If Except as provided for in section 4909.421 of the Revised Code, if the
proceeding on an application filed with the public utilities commission under section 4909.18 of the
Revised Code by any public utility requesting an increase on any rate, joint rate, toll, classification,
charge, or rental or requesting a change in a regulation or practice affecting the same has not been
concluded and an order entered pursuant to section 4909.19 of the Revised Code at the expiration of
two hundred seventy-five days from the date of filing the application, an increase not to exceed the
proposed increase shall go into effect upon the filing of a bond or a letter of credit by the public
utility. The bond or letter of credit shall be filed with the commission and shall be payable to the
state for the use and benefit of the customers affected by the proposed increase or change.
An affidavit attached to the bond or letter of credit must be signed by two of the officers of
the utility, under oath, and must contain a promise on behalf of the utility to refund any amounts
collected by the utility over the rate, joint rate, toll, classification, charge, or rental, as determined in
the final order of the commission. All refunds shall include interest at the rate stated in section
1343.03 of the Revised Code. The refund shall be in the form of a temporary reduction in rates
following the final order of the commission, and shall be accomplished in such manner as shall be
prescribed by the commission in its final order. The commission shall exercise continuing and
exclusive jurisdiction over such refunds.
If the public utilities commission has not entered a final order within five hundred forty-five
days from the date of the filing of an application for an increase in rates under section 4909.18 of the
Revised Code, a public utility shall have no obligation to make a refund of amounts collected after
the five hundred forty-fifth day which exceed the amounts authorized by the commission's final
order.
Nothing in this section shall be construed to mitigate any duty of the commission to issue a
final order under section 4909.19 of the Revised Code.
Sec. 4909.421. (A) If the proceeding on an application filed with the public utilities
commission under section 4909.18 of the Revised Code by an electric light company requesting an
increase on any rate, rate mechanism, joint rate, toll, classification, charge, or rental or requesting a
change in a regulation or practice affecting the same has not been concluded and an opinion and
order entered pursuant to section 4909.19 of the Revised Code at the expiration of two hundred
seventy-five days from the date of the filing of the application, the company may request a
temporary increase, and any party to the proceeding may request a temporary decrease, which shall
go into effect and remain in effect until modified in accordance with the commission's order based
upon the merits of the application.
(B) Not later than three hundred sixty days from the date of filing the application as

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
37
established by section 4909.193 of the Revised Code, the commission shall issue an order to
approve, deny, or modify an application filed under section 4909.18 of the Revised Code. If the
commission does not issue an order within three hundred sixty days after the date of filing of the
application, the application shall be deemed approved by operation of law. A temporary increase or
decrease under this section shall not exceed the midpoint of the rates recommended in the staff
report filed pursuant to section 4909.19 of the Revised Code and shall be subject to reconciliation
and refund.
(C) Nothing in this section shall be construed to mitigate any duty of the commission to
issue a final order under section 4909.19 of the Revised Code.
Sec. 4928.01. (A) As used in this chapter:
(1) "Ancillary service" means any function necessary to the provision of electric
transmission or distribution service to a retail customer and includes, but is not limited to,
scheduling, system control, and dispatch services; reactive supply from generation resources and
voltage control service; reactive supply from transmission resources service; regulation service;
frequency response service; energy imbalance service; operating reserve-spinning reserve service;
operating reserve-supplemental reserve service; load following; back-up supply service; real-power
loss replacement service; dynamic scheduling; system black start capability; and network stability
service.
(2) "Billing and collection agent" means a fully independent agent, not affiliated with or
otherwise controlled by an electric utility, electric services company, electric cooperative, or
governmental aggregator subject to certification under section 4928.08 of the Revised Code, to the
extent that the agent is under contract with such utility, company, cooperative, or aggregator solely
to provide billing and collection for retail electric service on behalf of the utility company,
cooperative, or aggregator.
(3) "Certified territory" means the certified territory established for an electric supplier under
sections 4933.81 to 4933.90 of the Revised Code.
(4) "Competitive retail electric service" means a component of retail electric service that is
competitive as provided under division (B) of this section.
(5) "Electric cooperative" means a not-for-profit electric light company that both is or has
been financed in whole or in part under the "Rural Electrification Act of 1936," 49 Stat. 1363, 7
U.S.C. 901, and owns or operates facilities in this state to generate, transmit, or distribute electricity,
or a not-for-profit successor of such company.
(6) "Electric distribution utility" means an electric utility that supplies at least retail electric
distribution service and does not own or operate an electric generating facility.
(7) "Electric light company" has the same meaning as in section 4905.03 of the Revised
Code and includes an electric services company, but excludes any self-generator to the extent that it
consumes electricity it so produces, sells that electricity for resale, or obtains electricity from a
generating facility it hosts on its premises.

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
38
(8) "Electric load center" has the same meaning as in section 4933.81 of the Revised Code.
(9) "Electric services company" means an electric light company that is engaged on a for-
profit or not-for-profit basis in the business of supplying or arranging for the supply of only a
competitive retail electric service in this state. "Electric services company" includes a power
marketer, power broker, aggregator, or independent power producer but excludes an electric
cooperative, municipal electric utility, governmental aggregator, or billing and collection agent.
(10) "Electric supplier" has the same meaning as in section 4933.81 of the Revised Code.
(11) "Electric utility" means an electric light company that has a certified territory and is
engaged on a for-profit basis either in the business of supplying at least a noncompetitive retail
electric service in this state or in the businesses of supplying both a noncompetitive and a
competitive retail electric service in this state. "Electric utility" excludes a municipal electric utility
or a billing and collection agent.
(12) "Firm electric service" means electric service other than nonfirm electric service.
(13) "Governmental aggregator" means a legislative authority of a municipal corporation, a
board of township trustees, or a board of county commissioners acting as an aggregator for the
provision of a competitive retail electric service under authority conferred under section 4928.20 of
the Revised Code.
(14) A person acts "knowingly," regardless of the person's purpose, when the person is
aware that the person's conduct will probably cause a certain result or will probably be of a certain
nature. A person has knowledge of circumstances when the person is aware that such circumstances
probably exist.
(15) "Level of funding for low-income customer energy efficiency programs provided
through electric utility rates" means the level of funds specifically included in an electric utility's
rates on October 5, 1999, pursuant to an order of the public utilities commission issued under
Chapter 4905. or 4909. of the Revised Code and in effect on October 4, 1999, for the purpose of
improving the energy efficiency of housing for the utility's low-income customers. The term
excludes the level of any such funds committed to a specific nonprofit organization or organizations
pursuant to a stipulation or contract.
(16) "Low-income customer assistance programs" means the percentage of income payment
plan program, the home energy assistance program, the home weatherization assistance program,
and the targeted energy efficiency and weatherization program.
(17) "Market development period" for an electric utility means the period of time beginning
on the starting date of competitive retail electric service and ending on the applicable date for that
utility as specified in section 4928.40 of the Revised Code, irrespective of whether the utility applies
to receive transition revenues under this chapter.
(18) "Market power" means the ability to impose on customers a sustained price for a
product or service above the price that would prevail in a competitive market.
(19) "Mercantile customer" means a commercial or industrial customer if the electricity

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
39
consumed is for nonresidential use and the customer consumes more than seven hundred thousand
kilowatt hours per year or is part of a national account involving multiple facilities in one or more
states.
(20) "Municipal electric utility" means a municipal corporation that owns or operates
facilities to generate, transmit, or distribute electricity.
(21) "Noncompetitive retail electric service" means a component of retail electric service
that is noncompetitive as provided under division (B) of this section.
(22) "Nonfirm electric service" means electric service provided pursuant to a schedule filed
under section 4905.30 of the Revised Code or pursuant to an arrangement under section 4905.31 of
the Revised Code, which schedule or arrangement includes conditions that may require the customer
to curtail or interrupt electric usage during nonemergency circumstances upon notification by an
electric utility.
(23) "Percentage of income payment plan arrears" means funds eligible for collection
through the percentage of income payment plan rider, but uncollected as of July 1, 2000.
(24) "Person" has the same meaning as in section 1.59 of the Revised Code.
(25) "Advanced energy project" means any technologies, products, activities, or
management practices or strategies that facilitate the generation or use of electricity or energy and
that reduce or support the reduction of energy consumption or support the production of clean,
renewable energy for industrial, distribution, commercial, institutional, governmental, research, not-
for-profit, or residential energy users, including, but not limited to, advanced energy resources and
renewable energy resources. "Advanced energy project" also includes any project described in
division (A), (B), or (C) of section 4928.621 of the Revised Code.
(26) "Regulatory assets" means the unamortized net regulatory assets that are capitalized or
deferred on the regulatory books of the electric utility, pursuant to an order or practice of the public
utilities commission or pursuant to generally accepted accounting principles as a result of a prior
commission rate-making decision, and that would otherwise have been charged to expense as
incurred or would not have been capitalized or otherwise deferred for future regulatory consideration
absent commission action. "Regulatory assets" includes, but is not limited to, all deferred demand-
side management costs; all deferred percentage of income payment plan arrears; post-in-service
capitalized charges and assets recognized in connection with statement of financial accounting
standards no. 109 (receivables from customers for income taxes); future nuclear decommissioning
costs and fuel disposal costs as those costs have been determined by the commission in the electric
utility's most recent rate or accounting application proceeding addressing such costs; the
undepreciated costs of safety and radiation control equipment on nuclear generating plants owned or
leased by an electric utility; and fuel costs currently deferred pursuant to the terms of one or more
settlement agreements approved by the commission.
(27) "Retail electric service" means any service involved in supplying or arranging for the
supply of electricity to ultimate consumers in this state, from the point of generation to the point of

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
40
consumption. For the purposes of this chapter, retail electric service includes one or more of the
following "service components": generation service, aggregation service, power marketing service,
power brokerage service, transmission service, distribution service, ancillary service, metering
service, and billing and collection service.
(28) "Starting date of competitive retail electric service" means January 1, 2001.
(29) "Customer-generator" means a user of a net metering system.
(30) "Net metering" means measuring the difference in an applicable billing period between
the electricity supplied by an electric service provider and the electricity generated by a customer-
generator that is fed back to the electric service provider.
(31) "Net metering system" means a facility for the production of electrical energy that does
all of the following:
(a) Uses as its fuel either solar, wind, biomass, landfill gas, or hydropower, or uses a
microturbine or a fuel cell;
(b) Is located on a customer-generator's premises;
(c) Operates in parallel with the electric utility's transmission and distribution facilities;
(d) Is intended primarily to offset part or all of the customer-generator's requirements for
electricity. For an industrial customer-generator with a net metering system that has a capacity of
less than twenty megawatts and uses wind as energy, this means the net metering system was sized
so as to not exceed one hundred per cent of the customer-generator's annual requirements for electric
energy at the time of interconnection.
(32) "Self-generator" means an entity in this state that owns or hosts on its premises property
the entity controls an electric generation facility that produces electricity primarily for the owner's
consumption and that may provide any such excess electricity to another entity, whether the and that
meets all of the following:
(a) The facility is installed or operated by the owner or by an agent a third party under a
contract, including a lease, purchase power agreement, or other service contract.
(b) The facility connects directly to the owner's side of the electric meter.
(c) The facility delivers electricity to the owner's side of the electric meter without the use of
an electric distribution utility's or electric cooperative's distribution system or transmission system.
(33) "Rate plan" means the standard service offer in effect on the effective date of the
amendment of this section by S.B. 221 of the 127th general assembly, July 31, 2008.
(34) "Advanced energy resource" means any of the following:
(a) Any method or any modification or replacement of any property, process, device,
structure, or equipment that increases the generation output of an electric generating facility to the
extent such efficiency is achieved without additional carbon dioxide emissions by that facility;
(b) Any distributed generation system consisting of customer cogeneration technology;
(c) Clean coal technology that includes a carbon-based product that is chemically altered
before combustion to demonstrate a reduction, as expressed as ash, in emissions of nitrous oxide,

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
41
mercury, arsenic, chlorine, sulfur dioxide, or sulfur trioxide in accordance with the American society
of testing and materials standard D1757A or a reduction of metal oxide emissions in accordance
with standard D5142 of that society, or clean coal technology that includes the design capability to
control or prevent the emission of carbon dioxide, which design capability the commission shall
adopt by rule and shall be based on economically feasible best available technology or, in the
absence of a determined best available technology, shall be of the highest level of economically
feasible design capability for which there exists generally accepted scientific opinion;
(d) Advanced nuclear energy technology consisting of generation III technology as defined
by the nuclear regulatory commission; other, later technology; or significant improvements to
existing facilities;
(e) Any fuel cell used in the generation of electricity, including, but not limited to, a proton
exchange membrane fuel cell, phosphoric acid fuel cell, molten carbonate fuel cell, or solid oxide
fuel cell;
(f) Advanced solid waste or construction and demolition debris conversion technology,
including, but not limited to, advanced stoker technology, and advanced fluidized bed gasification
technology, that results in measurable greenhouse gas emissions reductions as calculated pursuant to
the United States environmental protection agency's waste reduction model (WARM);
(g) Demand-side management and any energy efficiency improvement;
(h) Any new, retrofitted, refueled, or repowered generating facility located in Ohio,
including a simple or combined-cycle natural gas generating facility or a generating facility that uses
biomass, coal, modular nuclear, or any other fuel as its input;
(i) Any uprated capacity of an existing electric generating facility if the uprated capacity
results from the deployment of advanced technology.
"Advanced energy resource" does not include a waste energy recovery system that is, or has
been, included in an energy efficiency program of an electric distribution utility pursuant to
requirements under section 4928.66 of the Revised Code.
(35) "Air contaminant source" has the same meaning as in section 3704.01 of the Revised
Code.
(36) "Cogeneration technology" means technology that produces electricity and useful
thermal output simultaneously.
(37)(a) "Renewable energy resource" means any of the following:
(i) Solar photovoltaic or solar thermal energy;
(ii) Wind energy;
(iii) Power produced by a hydroelectric facility;
(iv) Power produced by a small hydroelectric facility, which is a facility that operates, or is
rated to operate, at an aggregate capacity of less than six megawatts;
(v) Power produced by a run-of-the-river hydroelectric facility placed in service on or after
January 1, 1980, that is located within this state, relies upon the Ohio river, and operates, or is rated

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
42
to operate, at an aggregate capacity of forty or more megawatts;
(vi) Geothermal energy;
(vii) Fuel derived from solid wastes, as defined in section 3734.01 of the Revised Code,
through fractionation, biological decomposition, or other process that does not principally involve
combustion;
(viii) Biomass energy;
(ix) Energy produced by cogeneration technology that is placed into service on or before
December 31, 2015, and for which more than ninety per cent of the total annual energy input is from
combustion of a waste or byproduct gas from an air contaminant source in this state, which source
has been in operation since on or before January 1, 1985, provided that the cogeneration technology
is a part of a facility located in a county having a population of more than three hundred sixty-five
thousand but less than three hundred seventy thousand according to the most recent federal
decennial census;
(x) Biologically derived methane gas;
(xi) Heat captured from a generator of electricity, boiler, or heat exchanger fueled by
biologically derived methane gas;
(xii) Energy derived from nontreated by-products of the pulping process or wood
manufacturing process, including bark, wood chips, sawdust, and lignin in spent pulping liquors.
"Renewable energy resource" includes, but is not limited to, any fuel cell used in the
generation of electricity, including, but not limited to, a proton exchange membrane fuel cell,
phosphoric acid fuel cell, molten carbonate fuel cell, or solid oxide fuel cell; a linear generator; wind
turbine located in the state's territorial waters of Lake Erie; methane gas emitted from an abandoned
or active coal mine; waste energy recovery system placed into service or retrofitted on or after the
effective date of the amendment of this section by S.B. 315 of the 129th general assembly,
September 10, 2012, except that a waste energy recovery system described in division (A)(38)(b) of
this section may be included only if it was placed into service between January 1, 2002, and
December 31, 2004; storage facility that will promote the better utilization of a renewable energy
resource; or distributed generation system used by a customer to generate electricity from any such
energy.
"Renewable energy resource" does not include a waste energy recovery system that is, or
was, on or after January 1, 2012, included in an energy efficiency program of an electric distribution
utility pursuant to requirements under section 4928.66 of the Revised Code.
(b) As used in division (A)(37) of this section, "hydroelectric facility" means a hydroelectric
generating facility that is located at a dam on a river, or on any water discharged to a river, that is
within or bordering this state or within or bordering an adjoining state and meets all of the following
standards:
(i) The facility provides for river flows that are not detrimental for fish, wildlife, and water
quality, including seasonal flow fluctuations as defined by the applicable licensing agency for the

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
43
facility.
(ii) The facility demonstrates that it complies with the water quality standards of this state,
which compliance may consist of certification under Section 401 of the "Clean Water Act of 1977,"
91 Stat. 1598, 1599, 33 U.S.C. 1341, and demonstrates that it has not contributed to a finding by this
state that the river has impaired water quality under Section 303(d) of the "Clean Water Act of
1977," 114 Stat. 870, 33 U.S.C. 1313.
(iii) The facility complies with mandatory prescriptions regarding fish passage as required
by the federal energy regulatory commission license issued for the project, regarding fish protection
for riverine, anadromous, and catadromous fish.
(iv) The facility complies with the recommendations of the Ohio environmental protection
agency and with the terms of its federal energy regulatory commission license regarding watershed
protection, mitigation, or enhancement, to the extent of each agency's respective jurisdiction over the
facility.
(v) The facility complies with provisions of the "Endangered Species Act of 1973," 87 Stat.
884, 16 U.S.C. 1531 to 1544, as amended.
(vi) The facility does not harm cultural resources of the area. This can be shown through
compliance with the terms of its federal energy regulatory commission license or, if the facility is
not regulated by that commission, through development of a plan approved by the Ohio historic
preservation office, to the extent it has jurisdiction over the facility.
(vii) The facility complies with the terms of its federal energy regulatory commission license
or exemption that are related to recreational access, accommodation, and facilities or, if the facility
is not regulated by that commission, the facility complies with similar requirements as are
recommended by resource agencies, to the extent they have jurisdiction over the facility; and the
facility provides access to water to the public without fee or charge.
(viii) The facility is not recommended for removal by any federal agency or agency of any
state, to the extent the particular agency has jurisdiction over the facility.
(c) The standards in divisions (A)(37)(b)(i) to (viii) of this section do not apply to a small
hydroelectric facility under division (A)(37)(a)(iv) of this section.
(38) "Waste energy recovery system" means any of the following:
(a) A facility that generates electricity through the conversion of energy from either of the
following:
(i) Exhaust heat from engines or manufacturing, industrial, commercial, or institutional sites,
except for exhaust heat from a facility whose primary purpose is the generation of electricity;
(ii) Reduction of pressure in gas pipelines before gas is distributed through the pipeline,
provided that the conversion of energy to electricity is achieved without using additional fossil fuels.
(b) A facility at a state institution of higher education as defined in section 3345.011 of the
Revised Code that recovers waste heat from electricity-producing engines or combustion turbines
and that simultaneously uses the recovered heat to produce steam, provided that the facility was

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
44
placed into service between January 1, 2002, and December 31, 2004;
(c) A facility that produces steam from recovered waste heat from a manufacturing process
and uses that steam, or transfers that steam to another facility, to provide heat to another
manufacturing process or to generate electricity.
(39) "Smart grid" means capital improvements to an electric distribution utility's distribution
infrastructure that improve reliability, efficiency, resiliency, or reduce energy demand or use,
including, but not limited to, advanced metering and automation of system functions.
(40) "Combined heat and power system" means the coproduction of electricity and useful
thermal energy from the same fuel source designed to achieve thermal-efficiency levels of at least
sixty per cent, with at least twenty per cent of the system's total useful energy in the form of thermal
energy.
(41) "Legacy generation resource" means all generating facilities owned directly or
indirectly by a corporation that was formed prior to 1960 by investor-owned utilities for the original
purpose of providing power to the federal government for use in the nation's defense or in
furtherance of national interests, including the Ohio valley electric corporation.
(42) "Prudently incurred costs related to a legacy generation resource" means costs,
including deferred costs, allocated pursuant to a power agreement approved by the federal energy
regulatory commission that relates to a legacy generation resource, less any revenues realized from
offering the contractual commitment for the power agreement into the wholesale markets, provided
that where the net revenues exceed net costs, those excess revenues shall be credited to customers.
Such costs shall exclude any return on investment in common equity and, in the event of a premature
retirement of a legacy generation resource, shall exclude any recovery of remaining debt. Such costs
shall include any incremental costs resulting from the bankruptcy of a current or former sponsor
under such power agreement or co-owner of the legacy generation resource if not otherwise
recovered through a utility rate cost recovery mechanism.
(43)(a) (41)(a) "Green energy" means any energy generated by using an energy resource that
does one or more of the following:
(i) Releases reduced air pollutants, thereby reducing cumulative air emissions;
(ii) Is more sustainable and reliable relative to some fossil fuels.
(b) "Green energy" includes energy generated using the following:
(i) Natural gas as a resource;
(ii) Nuclear reaction.
(42) "Energy storage" means electrical generation and storage performed by a distributed
energy system connected battery.
(43) "Linear generator" means an integrated system consisting of oscillators, cylinders,
electricity conversion equipment, and associated balance of plant components that meet the
following criteria:
(a) Converts the linear motion of oscillators directly into electricity without the use of a

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
45
flame or spark;
(b) Is dispatchable with the ability to vary power output across all loads;
(c) Can operate on multiple fuel types including renewable fuels such as hydrogen,
ammonia, and biogas.
(B) For the purposes of this chapter, a retail electric service component shall be deemed a
competitive retail electric service if the service component is competitive pursuant to a declaration
by a provision of the Revised Code or pursuant to an order of the public utilities commission
authorized under division (A) of section 4928.04 of the Revised Code. Otherwise, the service
component shall be deemed a noncompetitive retail electric service.
Sec. 4928.041. (A) Except as provided in sections 4928.141 and 4928.142 of the Revised
Code, no electric utility shall provide a competitive retail electric service in this state if that service
was deemed competitive or otherwise legally classified as competitive prior to the effective date of
this section.
(B) The standard service offer under section 4928.141 of the Revised Code shall continue to
be provided to consumers in this state by electric utilities.
Sec. 4928.05. (A)(1) On and after the starting date of competitive retail electric service, a A
competitive retail electric service supplied by an electric utility or electric services company, or by
an electric utility consistent with section 4928.141 of the Revised Code, shall not be subject to
supervision and regulation by a municipal corporation under Chapter 743. of the Revised Code or by
the public utilities commission under Chapters 4901. to 4909., 4933., 4935., and 4963. of the
Revised Code, except sections 4905.10 and 4905.31, division (B) of section 4905.33, and sections
4905.35 and 4933.81 to 4933.90; except sections 4905.06, 4935.03, 4963.40, and 4963.41 of the
Revised Code only to the extent related to service reliability and public safety; and except as
otherwise provided in this chapter. The commission's authority to enforce those excepted provisions
with respect to a competitive retail electric service shall be such authority as is provided for their
enforcement under Chapters 4901. to 4909., 4933., 4935., and 4963. of the Revised Code and this
chapter. Nothing in this division shall be construed to limit the commission's authority under
sections 4928.141 to , 4928.142, and 4928.144 of the Revised Code.
On and after the starting date of competitive retail electric service, a (2) A competitive retail
electric service supplied by an electric cooperative shall not be subject to supervision and regulation
by the commission under Chapters 4901. to 4909., 4933., 4935., and 4963. of the Revised Code,
except as otherwise expressly provided in sections 4928.01 to 4928.10 and 4928.16 of the Revised
Code.
(2) On and after the starting date of competitive retail electric service, a (B)(1) A
noncompetitive retail electric service supplied by an electric utility shall be subject to supervision
and regulation by the commission under Chapters 4901. to 4909., 4933., 4935., and 4963. of the
Revised Code and this chapter, to the extent that authority is not preempted by federal law. The
commission's authority to enforce those provisions with respect to a noncompetitive retail electric

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
46
service shall be the authority provided under those chapters and this chapter, to the extent the
authority is not preempted by federal law. Notwithstanding Chapters 4905. and 4909. of the Revised
Code, commission authority under this chapter shall include the authority to provide for the
recovery, through a reconcilable rider on an electric distribution utility's distribution rates, of all
transmission and transmission-related costs, including ancillary and congestion costs, imposed on or
charged to the utility by the federal energy regulatory commission or a regional transmission
organization, independent transmission operator, or similar organization approved by the federal
energy regulatory commission.
The commission shall adopt, for each electric distribution utility that provides customers
with a standard service offer in compliance with sections 4928.141 and 4928.142 of the Revised
Code, a nonbypassable cost recovery mechanism relating to transmission, ancillary, congestion, or
any related service required for such standard service offer that includes provisions for the recovery
of any cost of such service that the electric distribution utility incurs pursuant to the standard service
offer.
(2) The commission shall exercise its jurisdiction with respect to the delivery of electricity
by an electric utility in this state on or after the starting date of competitive retail electric service so
as to ensure that no aspect of the delivery of electricity by the utility to consumers in this state that
consists of a noncompetitive retail electric service is unregulated.
On and after that starting date, a (3) A noncompetitive retail electric service supplied by an
electric cooperative shall not be subject to supervision and regulation by the commission under
Chapters 4901. to 4909., 4933., 4935., and 4963. of the Revised Code, except sections 4933.81 to
4933.90 and 4935.03 of the Revised Code. The commission's authority to enforce those excepted
sections with respect to a noncompetitive retail electric service of an electric cooperative shall be
such authority as is provided for their enforcement under Chapters 4933. and 4935. of the Revised
Code.
(B) Nothing in this chapter affects the authority of the commission under Title XLIX of the
Revised Code to regulate an electric light company in this state or an electric service supplied in this
state prior to the starting date of competitive retail electric service.
Sec. 4928.08. (A) This section applies to an electric cooperative, or to a governmental
aggregator that is a municipal electric utility, only to the extent of a competitive retail electric
service it provides to a customer to whom it does not provide a noncompetitive retail electric service
through transmission or distribution facilities it singly or jointly owns or operates.
(B) (B)(1) No electric utility, electric services company, electric cooperative, or
governmental aggregator shall provide a competitive retail electric service to a consumer in this state
on and after the starting date of competitive retail electric service without first being certified by the
public utilities commission regarding its managerial, technical, and financial capability to provide
that service and providing a financial guarantee sufficient to protect customers and electric
distribution utilities from default. Certification shall be granted pursuant to procedures and standards

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
47
the commission shall prescribe in accordance with division (C) of this section, except that
certification or certification renewal shall be deemed approved thirty days after the filing of an
application with the commission unless the commission suspends that approval for good cause
shown. In the case of such a suspension, the commission shall act to approve or deny certification or
certification renewal to the applicant not later than ninety days after the date of the suspension.
(2) The public utilities commission shall establish rules to require an electric services
company to maintain financial assurances sufficient to protect customers and electric distribution
utilities from default. Such rules also shall specifically allow an electric distribution utility to set
reasonable standards for its security and the security of its customers through financial requirements
set in its tariffs.
(3) As used in division (B)(2) of this section, an "electric services company" has the same
meaning as in section 4928.01 of the Revised Code, but excludes a power broker or aggregator.
(C) Capability standards adopted in rules under division (B) of this section shall be sufficient
to ensure compliance with the minimum service requirements established under section 4928.10 of
the Revised Code and with section 4928.09 of the Revised Code. The standards shall allow
flexibility for voluntary aggregation, to encourage market creativity in responding to consumer
needs and demands, and shall allow flexibility for electric services companies that exclusively
provide installation of small electric generation facilities, to provide ease of market access. The rules
shall include procedures for biennially renewing certification.
(D) The commission may suspend, rescind, or conditionally rescind the certification of any
electric utility, electric services company, electric cooperative, or governmental aggregator issued
under this section if the commission determines, after reasonable notice and opportunity for hearing,
that the utility, company, cooperative, or aggregator has failed to comply with any applicable
certification standards or has engaged in anticompetitive or unfair, deceptive, or unconscionable acts
or practices in this state.
(E) No electric distribution utility on and after the starting date of competitive retail electric
service shall knowingly distribute electricity, to a retail consumer in this state, for any supplier of
electricity that has not been certified by the commission pursuant to this section.
(F) Notwithstanding any provision of section 121.95 of the Revised Code to the contrary, a
regulatory restriction contained in a rule adopted under section 4928.08 of the Revised Code is not
subject to sections 121.95 to 121.953 of the Revised Code.
Sec. 4928.101. (A) As used in this section and section 4928.102 of the Revised Code:
(1) "Small commercial customer" means any customer that receives electric service pursuant
to a nonresidential tariff if the customer's demand for electricity does not exceed twenty-five
kilowatts within the last twelve months.
(2) "Small commercial customer" excludes any customer that does one or both of the
following:
(a) Manages multiple electric meters and, within the last twelve months, the electricity

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
48
demand for at least one of the meters is twenty-five kilowatts or more;
(b) Has, at the customer's discretion, aggregated the demand for the customer-managed
meters.
(B) The consumer protections described in section 4928.10 of the Revised Code and the
rules adopted pursuant to that section apply to small commercial customers and to all other
customers as set forth in the rules.
Sec. 4928.102. (A) If a competitive retail electric service supplier offers a residential or
small commercial customer a contract for a fixed introductory rate that converts to a variable rate
upon the expiration of the fixed rate, the supplier shall send two notices to each residential and small
commercial customer that enters into such a contract. Each notice shall provide all of the following
information to the customer:
(1) The fixed rate that is expiring under the contract;
(2) The expiration date of the contract's fixed rate;
(3) The public utilities commission web site that, as a comparison tool, lists rates offered by
competitive retail electric service suppliers;
(4) A statement explaining that appearing on each customer's bill is a price-to-compare
notice that lists the utility's standard service offer price.
(B) The second notice shall include all the requirements as stated in division (A) of this
section and shall also identify the initial rate to be charged upon the contract's conversion to a
variable rate.
(C) The notices shall be sent by standard United States mail or electronically with a
customer's verifiable consent as follows:
(1) The supplier shall send the first notice not earlier than ninety days, and not later than
sixty days, prior to the expiration of the fixed rate.
(2) The supplier shall send the second notice not earlier than forty-five days, and not later
than fifteen days, prior to the expiration of the fixed rate.
(D) A competitive retail electric service supplier shall provide an annual notice, by standard
United States mail or electronically with a customer's verifiable consent, to each residential and
small commercial customer that has entered into a contract with the supplier that has converted to a
variable rate upon the expiration of the contract's fixed introductory rate. The notice shall inform the
customer that the customer is currently subject to a variable rate and that other fixed rate contracts
are available.
(E) Not later than one hundred fifty days after the effective date of this section, the
commission shall adopt rules in order to implement divisions (A) to (D) of this section. The rules, at
a minimum, shall include the following requirements regarding the notices required under divisions
(A) to (D) of this section:
(1) To use clear and unambiguous language in order to enable the customer to make an
informed decision;

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
49
(2) To design the notices in a way to ensure that they cannot be confused with marketing
materials.
(F) Notwithstanding any provision of section 121.95 of the Revised Code to the contrary, a
regulatory restriction contained in a rule adopted under section 4928.101 of the Revised Code is not
subject to sections 121.95 to 121.953 of the Revised Code.
Sec. 4928.103. (A) As used in this section, "customer account information" means a unique
electric distribution utility number or other customer identification number used by the utility to
identify a customer and the customer's account record.
(B) The public utilities commission shall adopt rules to ensure that an electric distribution
utility processes a customer's change in competitive retail electric supplier by using customer
account information. A customer who consents to a change of supplier shall not be required to
provide customer account information to the supplier if the customer provides a valid form of
government-issued identification issued to the customer or a sufficient alternative form of
identification that allows the supplier to establish the customer's identity accurately.
(C) Notwithstanding any provision of section 121.95 of the Revised Code to the contrary, a
regulatory restriction contained in a rule adopted under this section is not subject to sections 121.95
to 121.953 of the Revised Code.
Sec. 4928.104. (A) A competitive retail electric service supplier may offer alternative billing
and payment structures as agreed upon in a service contract with a mercantile customer, without
restriction to specific models, provided the supplier complies with applicable laws and regulations.
The alternative billing and payment structure may include any of the following:
(1) Daily, weekly, or milestone-based payments;
(2) Online-only billing and payment requirements;
(3) Prepayment-based service structures.
(B) The public utilities commission shall not prohibit a competitive retail electric service
supplier from requiring electronic payment methods as a condition of service under a non-traditional
billing agreement.
Sec. 4928.105. (A) Upon receiving a certified request from a competitive retail electric
service supplier under a service agreement that explicitly authorizes an expedited return to an
electric distribution utility's standard service offer, voluntarily entered into by a mercantile customer,
a utility shall complete the request within three business days.
(B) The electric distribution utility shall not be held liable for any disputes arising from the
expedited return to the utility's standard service offer, provided the utility acts in accordance with the
public utilities commission's rules.
(C) The commission shall establish rules governing the process for an expedited return to the
utility's standard service offer pursuant to this section, including the content of the certified request
and any notice to the affected customer, and permitting electric distribution utilities to recover the
administrative costs of processing requests under this section through reasonable fees assessed to

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
50
competitive retail electric service suppliers.
Sec. 4928.14. The (A) Except as provided in division (C) of this section, the failure of a
supplier to provide retail electric generation service to customers within the certified territory of an
electric distribution utility shall result in the supplier's customers, after reasonable notice, defaulting
to the utility's standard service offer under sections 4928.141, and 4928.142, and 4928.143 of the
Revised Code until the customer chooses an alternative supplier. A
(B) A supplier is deemed under this section to have failed to provide such retail electric
generation service if the commission finds, after reasonable notice and opportunity for hearing, that
any of the following conditions are met:
(A) (1) The supplier has defaulted on its contracts with customers, is in receivership, or has
filed for bankruptcy.
(B) (2) The supplier is no longer capable of providing the service.
(C) (3) The supplier is unable to provide delivery to transmission or distribution facilities for
such period of time as may be reasonably specified by commission rule adopted under division (A)
of section 4928.06 of the Revised Code.
(D) (4) The supplier's certification has been suspended, conditionally rescinded, or rescinded
under division (D) of section 4928.08 of the Revised Code.
(C) If an electric distribution utility has an electric security plan that was approved under
section 4928.143 of the Revised Code as that section existed prior to the amendments to this section
by this act, the failure of a supplier to provide retail electric generation service to customers within
the certified territory of that utility shall result in the supplier's customers, after reasonable notice,
defaulting to the utility's standard service offer under that electric security plan until the customer
chooses an alternative supplier or until the utility's standard service offer is authorized under section
4928.142 of the Revised Code.
Sec. 4928.141. (A) Beginning January 1, 2009, an (A)(1) An electric distribution utility shall
provide consumers, on a comparable and nondiscriminatory basis within its certified territory, a
standard service offer of all competitive retail electric services necessary to maintain essential
electric service to consumers, including a firm supply of electric generation service. To that end, the
electric distribution utility shall apply to the public utilities commission to establish the standard
service offer in accordance with section 4928.142 or 4928.143 of the Revised Code and, at its
discretion, may apply simultaneously under both sections, except that the utility's first standard
service offer application at minimum shall include a filing under section 4928.143 of the Revised
Code. Only Except as provided in division (A)(2) of this section, a standard service offer authorized
in accordance with section 4928.142 or 4928.143 of the Revised Code, shall serve as the utility's
standard service offer for the purpose of compliance with this section;, and that standard service
offer shall serve as the utility's default standard service offer for the purpose of section 4928.14 of
the Revised Code. Notwithstanding the foregoing provision, the rate
(2) An electric distribution utility's electric security plan of an electric distribution utility that

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
51
was approved under section 4928.143 of the Revised Code as that section existed prior to the
amendments to this section by this act shall continue for the purpose of the utility's compliance with
this division (A)(1) of this section until a standard service offer is first authorized to be effective
under section 4928.142 or 4928.143 of the Revised Code, and, as applicable, pursuant to division
(D) of section 4928.143 of the Revised Code, any rate . Each security plan that extends approved
before the effective date of the amendments to this section by this act shall extend beyond December
31, 2008, shall continue to be in effect for the subject electric distribution utility for the duration of
the plan's termthrough the final standard service offer auction delivery period approved by the public
utilities commission under the plan as of the effective date of the amendments to this section by this
act and thereafter shall terminate.
(3) A standard service offer under section 4928.142 or 4928.143 of the Revised Code shall
exclude any previously authorized allowances for transition costs, with such exclusion being
effective on and after the date that the allowance is scheduled to end under the utility's rate electric
security plan.
(B) The commission shall set the time for hearing of a filing under section 4928.142 or
4928.143 of the Revised Code, send written notice of the hearing to the electric distribution utility,
and publish notice in a newspaper of general circulation in each county in the utility's certified
territory. The commission shall adopt rules regarding filings under those sections the section.
Sec. 4928.142. (A) For the purpose of complying with section 4928.141 of the Revised Code
and subject to division (D) of this section and, as applicable, subject to the rate plan requirement
requirements of division (A) of section 4928.141 of the Revised Code, an electric distribution utility
may shall establish a standard service offer price for retail electric generation service that is
delivered to the utility under a market-rate offer.
(1) The market-rate offer shall be determined through a competitive bidding process that
provides for all of the following:
(a) Open, fair, and transparent competitive solicitation;
(b) Clear product definition;
(c) Standardized bid evaluation criteria;
(d) Oversight by an independent third party that shall design the solicitation, administer the
bidding, and ensure that the criteria specified in division divisions (A)(1)(a) to (c) of this section are
met;
(e) Evaluation of the submitted bids prior to the selection of the least-cost bid winner or
winners.
No generation supplier shall be prohibited from participating in the bidding process.
(2) The public utilities commission shall modify rules, or adopt new rules as necessary,
concerning the conduct of the competitive bidding process and the qualifications of bidders, which
rules shall foster supplier participation in the bidding process and shall be consistent with the
requirements of division (A)(1) of this section.

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
52
(B) Prior to initiating a competitive bidding process for a market-rate offer under division
(A) of this section, the electric distribution utility shall file an application with the commission. An
electric distribution utility may file its application with the commission prior to the effective date of
the commission rules required under division (A)(2) of this section, and, as the commission
determines necessary, the utility shall immediately conform its filing to the rules upon their taking
effect.
An application under this division shall detail the electric distribution utility's proposed
compliance with the requirements of division (A)(1) of this section and with commission rules under
division (A)(2) of this section and demonstrate that all of the following requirements are met:
(1) The electric distribution utility or its transmission service affiliate belongs to at least one
regional transmission organization that has been approved by the federal energy regulatory
commission; or there otherwise is comparable and nondiscriminatory access to the electric
transmission grid.
(2) Any such regional transmission organization has a market-monitor function and the
ability to take actions to identify and mitigate market power or the electric distribution utility's
market conduct; or a similar market monitoring function exists with commensurate ability to identify
and monitor market conditions and mitigate conduct associated with the exercise of market power.
(3) A published source of information is available publicly or through subscription that
identifies pricing information for traded electricity on- and off-peak energy products that are
contracts for delivery beginning at least two years from the date of the publication and is updated on
a regular basis.
The commission shall initiate a proceeding and, within ninety days after the application's
filing date, shall determine by order whether the electric distribution utility and its market-rate offer
meet all of the foregoing requirements. If the finding is positive, the electric distribution utility may
shall initiate its competitive bidding process. If the finding is negative as to one or more
requirements, the commission in the order shall direct the electric distribution utility regarding how
any deficiency may shall be timely remedied in a timely manner to the commission's satisfaction;
otherwise, the electric distribution utility shall withdraw the application. However, if such remedy is
made and the subsequent finding is positive and also if the electric distribution utility made a
simultaneous filing under this section and section 4928.143 of the Revised Code, the utility shall not
initiate its competitive bid until at least one hundred fifty days after the filing date of those
applications.
(C) Upon the completion of the competitive bidding process authorized by divisions (A) and
(B) of this section, including for the purpose of division (D) of this section, the commission shall
select the least-cost bid winner or winners of that process, and such selected bid or bids, as
prescribed as retail rates by the commission, shall be the electric distribution utility's standard
service offer unless the commission, by order issued before the third calendar day following the
conclusion of the competitive bidding process for the market rate offer, determines that one or more

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
53
of the following criteria were not met:
(1) Each portion of the bidding process was oversubscribed, such that the amount of supply
bid upon was greater than the amount of the load bid out.
(2) There were four or more bidders.
(3) At least twenty-five per cent of the load is bid upon by one or more persons other than
the electric distribution utility.
All costs incurred by the electric distribution utility as a result of or related to the
competitive bidding process or to procuring generation service to provide the standard service offer,
including the costs of energy and capacity and the costs of all other products and services procured
as a result of the competitive bidding process, shall be timely recovered through the standard service
offer price, and, for that purpose, the commission shall approve a reconciliation mechanism, other
recovery mechanism, or a combination of such mechanisms for the utility.
(D) The first application filed under this section by an electric distribution utility that, as of
July 31, 2008, directly owns, in whole or in part, operating electric generating facilities that had been
used and useful in this state shall require that a portion of that the utility's standard service offer load
for the first five years of the market rate offer be competitively bid under division (A) of this section
as follows: ten per cent of the load in year one, not more than twenty per cent in year two, thirty per
cent in year three, forty per cent in year four, and fifty per cent in year five. Consistent with those
percentages, the commission shall determine the actual percentages for each year of years one
through five. The standard service offer price for retail electric generation service under this first
application shall be a proportionate blend of the bid price and the generation service price for the
remaining standard service offer load, which latter price shall be equal to the electric distribution
utility's most recent standard service offer price, adjusted upward or downward as the commission
determines reasonable, relative to the jurisdictional portion of any known and measurable changes
from the level of any one or more of the following costs as reflected in that most recent standard
service offer price:
(1) The electric distribution utility's prudently incurred cost of fuel used to produce
electricity;
(2) Its prudently incurred purchased power costs;
(3) Its prudently incurred costs of satisfying the supply and demand portfolio requirements
of this state, including, but not limited to, renewable energy resource and energy efficiency
requirements;
(4) Its costs prudently incurred to comply with environmental laws and regulations, with
consideration of the derating of any facility associated with those costs.
In making any adjustment to the most recent standard service offer price on the basis of costs
described in division (D) of this section, the commission shall include the benefits that may become
available to the electric distribution utility as a result of or in connection with the costs included in
the adjustment, including, but not limited to, the utility's receipt of emissions credits or its receipt of

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
54
tax benefits or of other benefits, and, accordingly, the commission may impose such conditions on
the adjustment to ensure that any such benefits are properly aligned with the associated cost
responsibility. The commission shall also determine how such adjustments will affect the electric
distribution utility's return on common equity that may be achieved by those adjustments. The
commission shall not apply its consideration of the return on common equity to reduce any
adjustments authorized under this division unless the adjustments will cause the electric distribution
utility to earn a return on common equity that is significantly in excess of the return on common
equity that is earned by publicly traded companies, including utilities, that face comparable business
and financial risk, with such adjustments for capital structure as may be appropriate. The burden of
proof for demonstrating that significantly excessive earnings will not occur shall be on the electric
distribution utility.
Additionally, the commission may adjust the electric distribution utility's most recent
standard service offer price by such just and reasonable amount that the commission determines
necessary to address any emergency that threatens the utility's financial integrity or to ensure that the
resulting revenue available to the utility for providing the standard service offer is not so inadequate
as to result, directly or indirectly, in a taking of property without compensation pursuant to Section
19 of Article I, Ohio Constitution. The electric distribution utility has the burden of demonstrating
that any adjustment to its most recent standard service offer price is proper in accordance with this
division.
(E) Beginning in the second year of a blended price under division (D) of this section and
notwithstanding any other requirement of this section, the commission may alter prospectively the
proportions specified in that division to mitigate any effect of an abrupt or significant change in the
electric distribution utility's standard service offer price that would otherwise result in general or
with respect to any rate group or rate schedule but for such alteration. Any such alteration shall be
made not more often than annually, and the commission shall not, by altering those proportions and
in any event, including because of the length of time, as authorized under division (C) of this
section, taken to approve the market rate offer, cause the duration of the blending period to exceed
ten years as counted from the effective date of the approved market rate offer. Additionally, any
such alteration shall be limited to an alteration affecting the prospective proportions used during the
blending period and shall not affect any blending proportion previously approved and applied by the
commission under this division.
(F) An electric distribution utility that has received commission approval of its first
application under division (C) of this section shall not, nor ever shall be authorized or required by
the commission to, file an application under section 4928.143 of the Revised Code.
Sec. 4928.144. The public utilities commission by order may authorize any just and
reasonable phase-in of any electric distribution utility rate or price established under sections
4928.141 to 4928.143 and 4928.142 of the Revised Code, and inclusive of carrying charges, as the
commission considers necessary to ensure rate or price stability for consumers. If the commission's

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
55
order includes such a phase-in, the order also shall provide for the creation of regulatory assets
pursuant to generally accepted accounting principles, by authorizing the deferral of incurred costs
equal to the amount not collected, plus carrying charges on that amount. Further, the order shall
authorize the collection of those deferrals through a nonbypassable surcharge on any such rate or
price so established for the electric distribution utility by the commission.
Sec. 4928.149. No electric distribution utility may use any electric energy storage system to
participate in the wholesale market, if the utility purchased or acquired that system for distribution
service.
Sec. 4928.1410. If an electric distribution utility has an existing electric security plan under
which the commission had authorized the creation or continuation of riders, then, to the extent those
riders will cease to exist after termination of the electric security plan, the electric distribution utility
is authorized to create necessary regulatory assets or liabilities, along with carrying costs at the
utility's weighted average cost of debt, for the resolution of any outstanding under-collection or
over-collection of funds under such riders. The resolution of such regulatory assets or liabilities shall
be addressed in the first distribution rate case under section 4909.18 of the Revised Code that occurs
after the plan's expiration.
Sec. 4928.17. (A) Except as otherwise provided in sections 4928.141 or 4928.142 or
4928.143 or 4928.31 to 4928.40 of the Revised Code and beginning on the starting date of
competitive retail electric service, no electric utility shall engage in this state, either directly or
through an affiliate, in the businesses of supplying a noncompetitive retail electric service and
supplying a competitive retail electric service, or in the businesses of supplying a noncompetitive
retail electric service and supplying a product or service other than retail electric service, unless the
utility implements and operates under a corporate separation plan that is approved by the public
utilities commission under this section, is consistent with the policy specified in section 4928.02 of
the Revised Code, and achieves all of the following:
(1) The plan provides, at minimum, for the provision of the competitive retail electric service
or the nonelectric product or service through a fully separated affiliate of the utility, and the plan
includes separate accounting requirements, the code of conduct as ordered by the commission
pursuant to a rule it shall adopt under division (A) of section 4928.06 of the Revised Code, and such
other measures as are necessary to effectuate the policy specified in section 4928.02 of the Revised
Code.
(2) The plan satisfies the public interest in preventing unfair competitive advantage and
preventing the abuse of market power.
(3) The plan is sufficient to ensure that the utility will not extend any undue preference or
advantage to any affiliate, division, or part of its own business engaged in the business of supplying
the competitive retail electric service or nonelectric product or service, including, but not limited to,
utility resources such as trucks, tools, office equipment, office space, supplies, customer and
marketing information, advertising, billing and mailing systems, personnel, and training, without

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
56
compensation based upon fully loaded embedded costs charged to the affiliate; and to ensure that
any such affiliate, division, or part will not receive undue preference or advantage from any affiliate,
division, or part of the business engaged in business of supplying the noncompetitive retail electric
service. No such utility, affiliate, division, or part shall extend such undue preference.
Notwithstanding any other division of this section, a utility's obligation under division (A)(3) of this
section shall be effective January 1, 2000.
(B) The commission may approve, modify and approve, or disapprove a corporate separation
plan filed with the commission under division (A) of this section. As part of the code of conduct
required under division (A)(1) of this section, the commission shall adopt rules pursuant to division
(A) of section 4928.06 of the Revised Code regarding corporate separation and procedures for plan
filing and approval. The rules shall include limitations on affiliate practices solely for the purpose of
maintaining a separation of the affiliate's business from the business of the utility to prevent unfair
competitive advantage abuse of market power by virtue of that relationship. The rules also shall
include an opportunity for any person having a real and substantial interest in the corporate
separation plan to file specific objections to the plan and propose specific responses to issues raised
in the objections, which objections and responses the commission shall address in its final order.
Prior to commission approval of the plan, the commission shall afford a hearing upon those aspects
of the plan that the commission determines reasonably require a hearing. The commission may reject
and require refiling of a substantially inadequate plan under this section.
(C) The commission shall issue an order approving or modifying and approving a corporate
separation plan under this section, to be effective on the date specified in the order, only upon
findings that the plan reasonably complies with the requirements of division (A) of this section and
will provide for ongoing compliance with the policy specified in section 4928.02 of the Revised
Code. However, for good cause shown, the commission may issue an order approving or modifying
and approving a corporate separation plan under this section that does not comply with division (A)
(1) of this section but complies with such functional separation requirements as the commission
authorizes to apply for an interim period prescribed in the order, upon a finding that such alternative
plan will provide for ongoing compliance with the policy specified in section 4928.02 of the Revised
Code.
(D) Any party may seek an amendment to a corporate separation plan approved under this
section, and the commission, pursuant to a request from any party or on its own initiative, may order
as it considers necessary the filing of an amended corporate separation plan to reflect changed
circumstances.
(E) No electric distribution utility shall sell or transfer any generating asset it wholly or
partly owns at any time without obtaining prior commission approval.
Sec. 4928.20. (A) The legislative authority of a municipal corporation may adopt an
ordinance, or the board of township trustees of a township or the board of county commissioners of a
county may adopt a resolution, under which, on or after the starting date of competitive retail electric

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
57
service, it may aggregate in accordance with this section the retail electrical loads located,
respectively, within the municipal corporation, township, or unincorporated area of the county and,
for that purpose, may enter into service agreements to facilitate for those loads the sale and purchase
of electricity. The legislative authority or board also may exercise such authority jointly with any
other such legislative authority or board. For customers that are not mercantile customers, an
ordinance or resolution under this division shall specify whether the aggregation will occur only
with the prior, affirmative consent of each person owning, occupying, controlling, or using an
electric load center proposed to be aggregated or will occur automatically for all such persons
pursuant to the opt-out requirements of division (D) of this section. The aggregation of mercantile
customers shall occur only with the prior, affirmative consent of each such person owning,
occupying, controlling, or using an electric load center proposed to be aggregated. Nothing in this
division, however, authorizes the aggregation of the retail electric loads of an electric load center, as
defined in section 4933.81 of the Revised Code, that is located in the certified territory of a nonprofit
electric supplier under sections 4933.81 to 4933.90 of the Revised Code or an electric load center
served by transmission or distribution facilities of a municipal electric utility.
(B) If an ordinance or resolution adopted under division (A) of this section specifies that
aggregation of customers that are not mercantile customers will occur automatically as described in
that division, the ordinance or resolution shall direct the board of elections to submit the question of
the authority to aggregate to the electors of the respective municipal corporation, township, or
unincorporated area of a county at a special election on the day of the next primary or general
election in the municipal corporation, township, or county. The legislative authority or board shall
certify a copy of the ordinance or resolution to the board of elections not less than ninety days before
the day of the special election. No ordinance or resolution adopted under division (A) of this section
that provides for an election under this division shall take effect unless approved by a majority of the
electors voting upon the ordinance or resolution at the election held pursuant to this division.
(C) Upon the applicable requisite authority under divisions (A) and (B) of this section, the
legislative authority or board shall develop a plan of operation and governance for the aggregation
program so authorized. Before adopting a plan under this division, the legislative authority or board
shall hold at least two public hearings on the plan. Before the first hearing, the legislative authority
or board shall publish notice of the hearings once a week for two consecutive weeks in a newspaper
of general circulation in the jurisdiction or as provided in section 7.16 of the Revised Code. The
notice shall summarize the plan and state the date, time, and location of each hearing.
(D) No legislative authority or board, pursuant to an ordinance or resolution under divisions
(A) and (B) of this section that provides for automatic aggregation of customers that are not
mercantile customers as described in division (A) of this section, shall aggregate the electrical load
of any electric load center located within its jurisdiction unless it in advance clearly discloses to the
person owning, occupying, controlling, or using the load center that the person will be enrolled
automatically in the aggregation program and will remain so enrolled unless the person affirmatively

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
58
elects by a stated procedure not to be so enrolled. The disclosure shall state prominently the rates,
charges, and other terms and conditions of enrollment. The stated procedure shall allow any person
enrolled in the aggregation program the opportunity to opt out of the program every three years,
without paying a switching fee. Any such person that opts out before the commencement of the
aggregation program pursuant to the stated procedure shall default to the standard service offer
provided under section 4928.14 or division (D) of section 4928.35 of the Revised Code until the
person chooses an alternative supplier.
(E)(1) With respect to a governmental aggregation for a municipal corporation that is
authorized pursuant to divisions (A) to (D) of this section, resolutions may be proposed by initiative
or referendum petitions in accordance with sections 731.28 to 731.41 of the Revised Code.
(2) With respect to a governmental aggregation for a township or the unincorporated area of
a county, which aggregation is authorized pursuant to divisions (A) to (D) of this section, resolutions
may be proposed by initiative or referendum petitions in accordance with sections 731.28 to 731.40
of the Revised Code, except that:
(a) The petitions shall be filed, respectively, with the township fiscal officer or the board of
county commissioners, who shall perform those duties imposed under those sections upon the city
auditor or village clerk.
(b) The petitions shall contain the signatures of not less than ten per cent of the total number
of electors in, respectively, the township or the unincorporated area of the county who voted for the
office of governor at the preceding general election for that office in that area.
(F) A governmental aggregator under division (A) of this section is not a public utility
engaging in the wholesale purchase and resale of electricity, and provision of the aggregated service
is not a wholesale utility transaction. A governmental aggregator shall be subject to supervision and
regulation by the public utilities commission only to the extent of any competitive retail electric
service it provides and commission authority under this chapter.
(G) This section does not apply in the case of a municipal corporation that supplies such
aggregated service to electric load centers to which its municipal electric utility also supplies a
noncompetitive retail electric service through transmission or distribution facilities the utility singly
or jointly owns or operates.
(H) A governmental aggregator shall not include in its aggregation the accounts of any of the
following:
(1) A customer that has opted out of the aggregation;
(2) A customer in contract with a certified electric services company;
(3) A customer that has a special contract with an electric distribution utility;
(4) A customer that is not located within the governmental aggregator's governmental
boundaries;
(5) Subject to division (C) of section 4928.21 of the Revised Code, a customer who appears
on the "do not aggregate" list maintained under that section.

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
59
(I) Customers that are part of a governmental aggregation under this section shall be
responsible only for such portion of a surcharge under section 4928.144 of the Revised Code that is
proportionate to the benefits, as determined by the commission, that electric load centers within the
jurisdiction of the governmental aggregation as a group receive. The proportionate surcharge so
established shall apply to each customer of the governmental aggregation while the customer is part
of that aggregation. If a customer ceases being such a customer, the otherwise applicable surcharge
shall apply. Nothing in this section shall result in less than full recovery by an electric distribution
utility of any surcharge authorized under section 4928.144 of the Revised Code. Nothing in this
section shall result in less than the full and timely imposition, charging, collection, and adjustment
by an electric distribution utility, its assignee, or any collection agent, of the phase-in-recovery
charges authorized pursuant to a final financing order issued pursuant to sections 4928.23 to
4928.2318 of the Revised Code.
(J) On behalf of the customers that are part of a governmental aggregation under this section
and by filing written notice with the public utilities commission, the legislative authority that formed
or is forming that governmental aggregation may elect not to receive standby service within the
meaning of division (B)(2)(d) of section 4928.143 of the Revised Code from an electric distribution
utility in whose certified territory the governmental aggregation is located and that operates under an
approved electric security plan under that section. Upon the filing of that notice, the electric
distribution utility shall not charge any such customer to whom competitive retail electric generation
service is provided by another supplier under the governmental aggregation for the standby service.
Any such consumer that returns to the utility for competitive retail electric service shall pay the
market price of power incurred by the utility to serve that consumer plus any amount attributable to
the utility's cost of compliance with the renewable energy resource provisions of section 4928.64 of
the Revised Code to serve the consumer. Such market price shall include, but not be limited to,
capacity and energy charges; all charges associated with the provision of that power supply through
the regional transmission organization, including, but not limited to, transmission, ancillary services,
congestion, and settlement and administrative charges; and all other costs incurred by the utility that
are associated with the procurement, provision, and administration of that power supply, as such
costs may be approved by the commission. The period of time during which the market price and
renewable energy resource amount shall be so assessed on the consumer shall be from the time the
consumer so returns to the electric distribution utility until the expiration of the electric security
plan. However, if that period of time is expected to be more than two years, the commission may
reduce the time period to a period of not less than two years.
(K) The commission shall adopt rules and issue orders in proceedings under sections
4928.141 and 4928.142 of the Revised Code to encourage and promote large-scale governmental
aggregation in this state. For that purpose, the commission shall conduct an immediate review of any
rules it has adopted for the purpose of this section that are in effect on the effective date of the
amendment of this section by S.B. 221 of the 127th general assembly, July 31, 2008. Further, within

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
60
the context of an electric security plan under section 4928.143 of the Revised Code, the The
commission shall consider the effect on large-scale governmental aggregation of any nonbypassable
generation charges, however collected, that would be established under that plan, except any
nonbypassable generation charges that relate to any cost incurred by the review each application
filed under section 4928.142 of the Revised Code by an electric distribution utility, to ensure that the
deferral of which has been authorized by the commission prior to the effective date of application
and the amendment of this section by S.B. 221 of the 127th general assembly, July 31, 2008
resulting market rate offer shall not contain any rate, price, term, condition, or provision that would
have an adverse effect on large-scale governmental aggregation in this state.
Sec. 4928.23. As used in sections 4928.23 to 4928.2318 of the Revised Code:
(A) "Ancillary agreement" means any bond insurance policy, letter of credit, reserve
account, surety bond, swap arrangement, hedging arrangement, liquidity or credit support
arrangement, or other similar agreement or arrangement entered into in connection with the issuance
of phase-in-recovery bonds that is designed to promote the credit quality and marketability of the
bonds or to mitigate the risk of an increase in interest rates.
(B) "Assignee" means any person or entity to which an interest in phase-in-recovery
property is sold, assigned, transferred, or conveyed, other than as security, and any successor to or
subsequent assignee of such a person or entity.
(C) "Bond" includes debentures, notes, certificates of participation, certificates of beneficial
interest, certificates of ownership or other evidences of indebtedness or ownership that are issued by
an electric distribution utility or an assignee under a final financing order, the proceeds of which are
used directly or indirectly to recover, finance, or refinance phase-in costs and financing costs, and
that are secured by or payable from revenues from phase-in-recovery charges.
(D) "Bondholder" means any holder or owner of a phase-in-recovery bond.
(E) "Financing costs" means any of the following:
(1) Principal, interest, and redemption premiums that are payable on phase-in-recovery
bonds;
(2) Any payment required under an ancillary agreement;
(3) Any amount required to fund or replenish a reserve account or another account
established under any indenture, ancillary agreement, or other financing document relating to phase-
in-recovery bonds;
(4) Any costs of retiring or refunding any existing debt and equity securities of an electric
distribution utility in connection with either the issuance of, or the use of proceeds from, phase-in-
recovery bonds;
(5) Any costs incurred by an electric distribution utility to obtain modifications of or
amendments to any indenture, financing agreement, security agreement, or similar agreement or
instrument relating to any existing secured or unsecured obligation of the electric distribution utility
in connection with the issuance of phase-in-recovery bonds;

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
61
(6) Any costs incurred by an electric distribution utility to obtain any consent, release,
waiver, or approval from any holder of an obligation described in division (E)(5) of this section that
are necessary to be incurred for the electric distribution utility to issue or cause the issuance of
phase-in-recovery bonds;
(7) Any taxes, franchise fees, or license fees imposed on phase-in-recovery revenues;
(8) Any costs related to issuing or servicing phase-in-recovery bonds or related to obtaining
a financing order, including servicing fees and expenses, trustee fees and expenses, legal,
accounting, or other professional fees and expenses, administrative fees, placement fees,
underwriting fees, capitalized interest and equity, and rating-agency fees;
(9) Any other similar costs that the public utilities commission finds appropriate.
(F) "Financing order" means an order issued by the public utilities commission under section
4928.232 of the Revised Code that authorizes an electric distribution utility or an assignee to issue
phase-in-recovery bonds and recover phase-in-recovery charges.
(G) "Final financing order" means a financing order that has become final and has taken
effect as provided in section 4928.233 of the Revised Code.
(H) "Financing party" means either of the following:
(1) Any trustee, collateral agent, or other person acting for the benefit of any bondholder;
(2) Any party to an ancillary agreement, the rights and obligations of which relate to or
depend upon the existence of phase-in-recovery property, the enforcement and priority of a security
interest in phase-in-recovery property, the timely collection and payment of phase-in-recovery
revenues, or a combination of these factors.
(I) "Financing statement" has the same meaning as in section 1309.102 of the Revised Code.
(J) "Phase-in costs" means costs, inclusive of carrying charges incurred before, on, or after
the effective date of this section March 22, 2012, authorized by the commission before, on, or after
the effective date of this section March 22, 2012, to be securitized or deferred as regulatory assets in
proceedings under section 4909.18 of the Revised Code, sections 4928.141 to 4928.143, 4928.142,
or 4928.144 of the Revised Code, or section 4928.14 of the Revised Code as it existed prior to July
31, 2008, or section 4928.143 of the Revised Code as it existed prior to the effective date of the
amendments to this section by this act pursuant to a final order for which appeals have been
exhausted. "Phase-in costs" excludes the following:
(1) With respect to any electric generating facility that, on and after the effective date of this
section March 22, 2012, is owned, in whole or in part, by an electric distribution utility applying for
a financing order under section 4928.231 of the Revised Code, costs that are authorized under
division (B)(2)(b) or (c) of section 4928.143 of the Revised Code as that section existed prior to the
effective date of the amendments to this section by this act;
(2) Costs incurred after the effective date of this section March 22, 2012, related to the
ongoing operation of an electric generating facility, but not environmental clean-up or remediation
costs incurred by an electric distribution utility because of its ownership or operation of an electric

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
62
generating facility prior to the effective date of this section March 22, 2012, which such clean-up or
remediation costs are imposed or incurred pursuant to federal or state law, rules, or regulations and
for which the commission approves or approved recovery in accordance with section 4909.18 of the
Revised Code, sections 4928.141 to 4928.143, 4928.142, or 4928.144 of the Revised Code, or
section 4928.14 of the Revised Code as it existed prior to July 31, 2008, or section 4928.143 of the
Revised Code as it existed prior to the effective date of the amendments to this section by this act.
(K) "Phase-in-recovery property" means the property, rights, and interests of an electric
distribution utility or an assignee under a final financing order, including the right to impose, charge,
and collect the phase-in-recovery charges that shall be used to pay and secure the payment of phase-
in-recovery bonds and financing costs, and including the right to obtain adjustments to those
charges, and any revenues, receipts, collections, rights to payment, payments, moneys, claims, or
other proceeds arising from the rights and interests created under the final financing order.
(L) "Phase-in-recovery revenues" means all revenues, receipts, collections, payments,
moneys, claims, or other proceeds arising from phase-in-recovery property.
(M) "Successor" means, with respect to any entity, another entity that succeeds by operation
of law to the rights and obligations of the first legal entity pursuant to any bankruptcy,
reorganization, restructuring, or other insolvency proceeding, any merger, acquisition, or
consolidation, or any sale or transfer of assets, regardless of whether any of these occur as a result of
a restructuring of the electric power industry or otherwise.
Sec. 4928.231. (A) An electric distribution utility may apply to the public utilities
commission for a financing order that authorizes the following:
(1) The issuance of phase-in-recovery bonds, in one or more series, to recover uncollected
phase-in costs;
(2) The imposition, charging, and collection of phase-in- recovery charges, in accordance
with the adjustment mechanism approved by the commission under section 4928.232 of the Revised
Code, and consistent with the commission's authority regarding governmental aggregation as
provided in division (I) of section 4928.20 of the Revised Code, to recover both of the following:
(a) Uncollected phase-in costs;
(b) Financing costs.
(3) The creation of phase-in-recovery property under the financing order.
(B) The application shall include all of the following:
(1) A description of the uncollected phase-in costs that the electric distribution utility seeks
to recover through the issuance of phase-in-recovery bonds;
(2) An estimate of the date each series of phase-in-recovery bonds are expected to be issued;
(3) The expected term during which the phase-in costs associated with the issuance of each
series of phase-in-recovery bonds are expected to be recovered;
(4) An estimate of the financing costs, as described in section 4928.23 of the Revised Code,
associated with the issuance of each series of phase-in-recovery bonds;

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
63
(5) An estimate of the amount of phase-in-recovery charges necessary to recover the phase-
in costs and financing costs set forth in the application and the calculation for that estimate, which
calculation shall take into account the estimated date or dates of issuance and the estimated principal
amount of each series of phase-in-recovery bonds;
(6) For phase-in-recovery charges not subject to allocation according to an existing order, a
proposed methodology for allocating phase-in-recovery charges among customer classes, including
a proposed methodology for allocating such charges to governmental aggregation customers based
upon the proportionate benefit determination made under division (I) of section 4928.20 of the
Revised Code;
(7) A description of a proposed adjustment mechanism for use as described in division (A)
(2) of this section;
(8) A description and valuation of how the issuance of the phase-in-recovery bonds,
including financing costs, will both result in cost savings to customers and mitigate rate impacts to
customers when compared to the use of other financing mechanisms or cost-recovery methods
available to the electric distribution utility;
(9) Any other information required by the commission.
(C) The electric distribution utility may restate or incorporate by reference in the application
any information required under division (B)(9) of this section that the electric distribution utility
filed with the commission under section 4909.18 or sections 4928.141 to 4928.144 of the Revised
Code or , section 4928.14 of the Revised Code as it existed prior to July 31, 2008, or section
4928.143 of the Revised Code as it existed prior to the amendments to this section by this act.
Sec. 4928.232. (A) Proceedings before the public utilities commission on an application
submitted by an electric distribution utility under section 4928.231 of the Revised Code shall be
governed by Chapter 4903. of the Revised Code, but only to the extent that chapter is not
inconsistent with this section or section 4928.233 of the Revised Code. Any party that participated in
the proceeding in which phase-in costs were approved under section 4909.18 or sections 4928.141 to
4928.144 of the Revised Code or , section 4928.14 of the Revised Code as it existed prior to July 31,
2008, or section 4928.143 of the Revised Code as it existed prior to the amendments to this section
by this act shall have standing to participate in proceedings under sections 4928.23 to 4928.2318 of
the Revised Code.
(B) When reviewing an application for a financing order pursuant to sections 4928.23 to
4928.2318 of the Revised Code, the commission may hold such hearings, make such inquiries or
investigations, and examine such witnesses, books, papers, documents, and contracts as the
commission considers proper to carry out these sections. Within thirty days after the filing of an
application under section 4928.231 of the Revised Code, the commission shall publish a schedule of
the proceeding.
(C)(1) Not later than one hundred thirty-five days after the date the application is filed, the
commission shall issue either a financing order, granting the application in whole or with

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
64
modifications, or an order suspending or rejecting the application.
(2) If the commission suspends an application for a financing order, the commission shall
notify the electric distribution utility of the suspension and may direct the electric distribution utility
to provide additional information as the commission considers necessary to evaluate the application.
Not later than ninety days after the suspension, the commission shall issue either a financing order,
granting the application in whole or with modifications, or an order rejecting the application.
(D)(1) The commission shall not issue a financing order under division (C) of this section
unless the commission determines that the financing order is consistent with section 4928.02 of the
Revised Code.
(2) Except as provided in division (D)(1) of this section, the commission shall issue a
financing order under division (C) of this section if, at the time the financing order is issued, the
commission finds that the issuance of the phase-in-recovery bonds and the phase-in-recovery
charges authorized by the order results in, consistent with market conditions, both measurably
enhancing cost savings to customers and mitigating rate impacts to customers as compared with
traditional financing mechanisms or traditional cost-recovery methods available to the electric
distribution utility or, if the commission previously approved a recovery method, as compared with
that recovery method.
(E) The commission shall include all of the following in a financing order issued under
division (C) of this section:
(1) A determination of the maximum amount and a description of the phase-in costs that may
be recovered through phase-in-recovery bonds issued under the financing order;
(2) A description of phase-in-recovery property, the creation of which is authorized by the
financing order;
(3) A description of the financing costs that may be recovered through phase-in-recovery
charges and the period over which those costs may be recovered;
(4) For phase-in-recovery charges not subject to allocation according to an existing order, a
description of the methodology and calculation for allocating phase-in-recovery charges among
customer classes, including the allocation of such charges, if any, to governmental aggregation
customers based upon the proportionate benefit determination made under division (I) of section
4928.20 of the Revised Code;
(5) A description of the adjustment mechanism for use in the imposition, charging, and
collection of the phase-in-recovery charges;
(6) The maximum term of the phase-in-recovery bonds;
(7) Any other provision the commission considers appropriate to ensure the full and timely
imposition, charging, collection, and adjustment, pursuant to an approved adjustment mechanism, of
the phase-in-recovery charges described in divisions (E)(3) to (5) of this section.
(F) The commission may, in a financing order, afford the electric distribution utility
flexibility in establishing the terms and conditions for the phase-in-recovery bonds to accommodate

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
65
changes in market conditions, including repayment schedules, interest rates, financing costs,
collateral requirements, required debt service and other reserves, and the ability of the electric
distribution utility, at its option, to effect a series of issuances of phase-in-recovery bonds and
correlated assignments, sales, pledges, or other transfers of phase-in-recovery property. Any changes
made under this section to terms and conditions for the phase-in-recovery bonds shall be in
conformance with the financing order.
(G) A financing order may provide that the creation of phase-in-recovery property shall be
simultaneous with the sale of that property to an assignee as provided in the application and the
pledge of the property to secure phase-in-recovery bonds.
(H) The commission shall, in a financing order, require that after the final terms of each
issuance of phase-in-recovery bonds have been established, and prior to the issuance of those bonds,
the electric distribution utility shall determine the resulting phase-in-recovery charges in accordance
with the adjustment mechanism described in the financing order. These phase-in-recovery charges
shall be final and effective upon the issuance of the phase-in-recovery bonds, without further
commission action.
Sec. 4928.34. (A) The public utilities commission shall not approve or prescribe a transition
plan under division (A) or (B) of section 4928.33 of the Revised Code unless the commission first
makes all of the following determinations:
(1) The unbundled components for the electric transmission component of retail electric
service, as specified in the utility's rate unbundling plan required by division (A)(1) of section
4928.31 of the Revised Code, equal the tariff rates determined by the federal energy regulatory
commission that are in effect on the date of the approval of the transition plan under sections
4928.31 to 4928.40 of the Revised Code, as each such rate is determined applicable to each
particular customer class and rate schedule by the commission. The unbundled transmission
component shall include a sliding scale of charges under division (B) of section 4905.31 of the
Revised Code to ensure that refunds determined or approved by the federal energy regulatory
commission are flowed through to retail electric customers.
(2) The unbundled components for retail electric distribution service in the rate unbundling
plan equal the difference between the costs attributable to the utility's transmission and distribution
rates and charges under its schedule of rates and charges in effect on the effective date of this
section, based upon the record in the most recent rate proceeding of the utility for which the utility's
schedule was established, and the tariff rates for electric transmission service determined by the
federal energy regulatory commission as described in division (A)(1) of this section.
(3) All other unbundled components required by the commission in the rate unbundling plan
equal the costs attributable to the particular service as reflected in the utility's schedule of rates and
charges in effect on the effective date of this section.
(4) The unbundled components for retail electric generation service in the rate unbundling
plan equal the residual amount remaining after the determination of the transmission, distribution,

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
66
and other unbundled components, and after any adjustments necessary to reflect the effects of the
amendment of section 5727.111 of the Revised Code by Sub. S.B. No. 3 of the 123rd general
assembly.
(5) All unbundled components in the rate unbundling plan have been adjusted to reflect any
base rate reductions on file with the commission and as scheduled to be in effect by December 31,
2005, under rate settlements in effect on the effective date of this section. However, all earnings
obligations, restrictions, or caps imposed on an electric utility in a commission order prior to the
effective date of this section are void.
(6) Subject to division (A)(5) of this section, the total of all unbundled components in the
rate unbundling plan are capped and shall equal during the market development period, except as
specifically provided in this chapter, the total of all rates and charges in effect under the applicable
bundled schedule of the electric utility pursuant to section 4905.30 of the Revised Code in effect on
the day before the effective date of this section, including the transition charge determined under
section 4928.40 of the Revised Code, adjusted for any changes in the taxation of electric utilities and
retail electric service under Sub. S.B. No. 3 of the 123rd General Assembly, the universal service
rider authorized by section 4928.51 of the Revised Code, and the temporary rider authorized by
section 4928.61 of the Revised Code. For the purpose of this division, the rate cap applicable to a
customer receiving electric service pursuant to an arrangement approved by the commission under
section 4905.31 of the Revised Code is, for the term of the arrangement, the total of all rates and
charges in effect under the arrangement. For any rate schedule filed pursuant to section 4905.30 of
the Revised Code or any arrangement subject to approval pursuant to section 4905.31 of the Revised
Code, the initial tax-related adjustment to the rate cap required by this division shall be equal to the
rate of taxation specified in section 5727.81 of the Revised Code and applicable to the schedule or
arrangement. To the extent such total annual amount of the tax-related adjustment is greater than or
less than the comparable amount of the total annual tax reduction experienced by the electric utility
as a result of the provisions of Sub. S.B. No. 3 of the 123rd general assembly, such difference shall
be addressed by the commission through accounting procedures, refunds, or an annual surcharge or
credit to customers, or through other appropriate means, to avoid placing the financial responsibility
for the difference upon the electric utility or its shareholders. Any adjustments in the rate of taxation
specified in section 5727.81 of the Revised Code section shall not occur without a corresponding
adjustment to the rate cap for each such rate schedule or arrangement. The department of taxation
shall advise the commission and self-assessors under section 5727.81 of the Revised Code prior to
the effective date of any change in the rate of taxation specified under that section, and the
commission shall modify the rate cap to reflect that adjustment so that the rate cap adjustment is
effective as of the effective date of the change in the rate of taxation. This division shall be applied,
to the extent possible, to eliminate any increase in the price of electricity for customers that
otherwise may occur as a result of establishing the taxes contemplated in section 5727.81 of the
Revised Code.

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
67
(7) The rate unbundling plan complies with any rules adopted by the commission under
division (A) of section 4928.06 of the Revised Code.
(8) The corporate separation plan required by division (A)(2) of section 4928.31 of the
Revised Code complies with section 4928.17 of the Revised Code and any rules adopted by the
commission under division (A) of section 4928.06 of the Revised Code.
(9) Any plan or plans the commission requires to address operational support systems and
any other technical implementation issues pertaining to competitive retail electric service comply
with any rules adopted by the commission under division (A) of section 4928.06 of the Revised
Code.
(10) The employee assistance plan required by division (A)(4) of section 4928.31 of the
Revised Code sufficiently provides severance, retraining, early retirement, retention, outplacement,
and other assistance for the utility's employees whose employment is affected by electric industry
restructuring under this chapter.
(11) The consumer education plan required under division (A)(5) of section 4928.31 of the
Revised Code complies with former section 4928.42 of the Revised Code and any rules adopted by
the commission under division (A) of section 4928.06 of the Revised Code.
(12) The transition revenues for which an electric utility is authorized a revenue opportunity
under sections 4928.31 to 4928.40 of the Revised Code are the allowable transition costs of the
utility as such costs are determined by the commission pursuant to section 4928.39 of the Revised
Code, and the transition charges for the customer classes and rate schedules of the utility are the
charges determined pursuant to section 4928.40 of the Revised Code.
(13) Any independent transmission plan included in the transition plan filed under section
4928.31 of the Revised Code reasonably complies with section 4928.12 of the Revised Code and
any rules adopted by the commission under division (A) of section 4928.06 of the Revised Code,
unless the commission, for good cause shown, authorizes the utility to defer compliance until an
order is issued under division (G) of section 4928.35 of the Revised Code.
(14) The utility is in compliance with sections 4928.01 to 4928.11 of the Revised Code and
any rules or orders of the commission adopted or issued under those sections.
(15) All unbundled components in the rate unbundling plan have been adjusted to reflect the
elimination of the tax on gross receipts imposed by section 5727.30 of the Revised Code.
In addition, a transition plan approved by the commission under section 4928.33 of the
Revised Code but not containing an approved independent transmission plan shall contain the
express conditions that the utility will comply with an order issued under division (G) of section
4928.35 of the Revised Code.
(B) Subject to division (E) of section 4928.17 of the Revised Code, if If the commission
finds that any part of the transition plan would constitute an abandonment under sections 4905.20
and 4905.21 of the Revised Code, the commission shall not approve that part of the transition plan
unless it makes the finding required for approval of an abandonment application under section

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
68
4905.21 of the Revised Code. Sections 4905.20 and 4905.21 of the Revised Code otherwise shall not
apply to a transition plan under sections 4928.31 to 4928.40 of the Revised Code.
Sec. 4928.542. The winning bid or bids selected through the competitive procurement
process established under section 4928.54 of the Revised Code shall meet all of the following
requirements:
(A) Be designed to provide reliable competitive retail electric service to percentage of
income payment plan program customers;
(B) Reduce the cost of the percentage of income payment plan program relative to the
otherwise applicable standard service offer established under sections 4928.141, and 4928.142, and
4928.143 of the Revised Code;
(C) Result in the best value for persons paying the universal service rider under section
4928.52 of the Revised Code.
Sec. 4928.64. (A)(1) As used in this section, "qualifying renewable energy resource" means
a renewable energy resource, as defined in section 4928.01 of the Revised Code that:
(a) Has a placed-in-service date on or after January 1, 1998;
(b) Is any run-of-the-river hydroelectric facility that has an in-service date on or after
January 1, 1980;
(c) Is a small hydroelectric facility;
(d) Is created on or after January 1, 1998, by the modification or retrofit of any facility
placed in service prior to January 1, 1998; or
(e) Is a mercantile customer-sited renewable energy resource, whether new or existing, that
the mercantile customer commits for integration into the electric distribution utility's demand-
response, energy efficiency, or peak demand reduction programs as provided under division (A)(2)
(c) of section 4928.66 of the Revised Code, including, but not limited to, any of the following:
(i) A resource that has the effect of improving the relationship between real and reactive
power;
(ii) A resource that makes efficient use of waste heat or other thermal capabilities owned or
controlled by a mercantile customer;
(iii) Storage technology that allows a mercantile customer more flexibility to modify its
demand or load and usage characteristics;
(iv) Electric generation equipment owned or controlled by a mercantile customer that uses a
renewable energy resource.
(2) For the purpose of this section and as it considers appropriate, the public utilities
commission may classify any new technology as such a qualifying renewable energy resource.
(B)(1) By the end of 2026, an electric distribution utility shall have provided from qualifying
renewable energy resources, including, at its discretion, qualifying renewable energy resources
obtained pursuant to an electricity supply contract, a portion of the electricity supply required for its
standard service offer under section sections 4928.141 and 4928.142 of the Revised Code, and an

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
69
electric services company shall have provided a portion of its electricity supply for retail consumers
in this state from qualifying renewable energy resources, including, at its discretion, qualifying
renewable energy resources obtained pursuant to an electricity supply contract. That portion shall
equal eight and one-half per cent of the total number of kilowatt hours of electricity sold by the
subject utility or company to any and all retail electric consumers whose electric load centers are
served by that utility and are located within the utility's certified territory or, in the case of an electric
services company, are served by the company and are located within this state. However, nothing in
this section precludes a utility or company from providing a greater percentage.
(2) Subject to section 4928.642 of the Revised Code, the The portion required under division
(B)(1) of this section shall be generated from renewable energy resources in accordance with the
following benchmarks:
1 2 3
A By end of year Renewable energy resources Solar energy resources
B 2009 0.25% 0.004%
C 2010 0.50% 0.010%
D 2011 1% 0.030%
E 2012 1.5% 0.060%
F 2013 2% 0.090%
G 2014 2.5% 0.12%
H 2015 2.5% 0.12%
I 2016 2.5% 0.12%
J 2017 3.5% 0.15%
K 2018 4.5% 0.18%
L 2019 5.5% 0.22%
M 2020 5.5% 0%

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
70
N 2021 6% 0%
O 2022 6.5% 0%
P 2023 7% 0%
Q 2024 7.5% 0%
R 2025 8% 0%
S 2026 8.5% 0%
(3) The qualifying renewable energy resources implemented by the utility or company shall
be met either:
(a) Through facilities located in this state; or
(b) With resources that can be shown to be deliverable into this state.
(C)(1) The commission annually shall review an electric distribution utility's or electric
services company's compliance with the most recent applicable benchmark under division (B)(2) of
this section and, in the course of that review, shall identify any undercompliance or noncompliance
of the utility or company that it determines is weather-related, related to equipment or resource
shortages for qualifying renewable energy resources as applicable, or is otherwise outside the
utility's or company's control.
(2) Subject to the cost cap provisions of division (C)(3) of this section, if the commission
determines, after notice and opportunity for hearing, and based upon its findings in that review
regarding avoidable undercompliance or noncompliance, but subject to division (C)(4) of this
section, that the utility or company has failed to comply with any such benchmark, the commission
shall impose a renewable energy compliance payment on the utility or company.
(a) The compliance payment pertaining to the solar energy resource benchmarks under
division (B)(2) of this section shall be an amount per megawatt hour of undercompliance or
noncompliance in the period under review, as follows:
(i) Three hundred dollars for 2014, 2015, and 2016;
(ii) Two hundred fifty dollars for 2017 and 2018;
(iii) Two hundred dollars for 2019.
(b) The compliance payment pertaining to the renewable energy resource benchmarks under
division (B)(2) of this section shall equal the number of additional renewable energy credits that the
electric distribution utility or electric services company would have needed to comply with the
applicable benchmark in the period under review times an amount that shall begin at forty-five
dollars and shall be adjusted annually by the commission to reflect any change in the consumer price
index as defined in section 101.27 of the Revised Code, but shall not be less than forty-five dollars.

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
71
As used in this division, "consumer price index" means the consumer price index prepared by the
United States bureau of labor statistics (U.S. city average for urban wage earners and clerical
workers: all items, 1982-1984=100), or, if that index is no longer published, a generally available
comparable index.
(c) The compliance payment shall not be passed through by the electric distribution utility or
electric services company to consumers. The compliance payment shall be remitted to the
commission, for deposit to the credit of the advanced energy fund created under section 4928.61 of
the Revised Code. Payment of the compliance payment shall be subject to such collection and
enforcement procedures as apply to the collection of a forfeiture under sections 4905.55 to 4905.60
and 4905.64 of the Revised Code.
(3) An electric distribution utility or an electric services company need not comply with a
benchmark under division (B)(2) of this section to the extent that its reasonably expected cost of that
compliance exceeds its reasonably expected cost of otherwise producing or acquiring the requisite
electricity by three per cent or more. The cost of compliance shall be calculated as though any
exemption from taxes and assessments had not been granted under section 5727.75 of the Revised
Code.
(4)(a) An electric distribution utility or electric services company may request the
commission to make a force majeure determination pursuant to this division regarding all or part of
the utility's or company's compliance with any minimum benchmark under division (B)(2) of this
section during the period of review occurring pursuant to division (C)(2) of this section. The
commission may require the electric distribution utility or electric services company to make
solicitations for renewable energy resource credits as part of its default service before the utility's or
company's request of force majeure under this division can be made.
(b) Within ninety days after the filing of a request by an electric distribution utility or
electric services company under division (C)(4)(a) of this section, the commission shall determine if
qualifying renewable energy resources are reasonably available in the marketplace in sufficient
quantities for the utility or company to comply with the subject minimum benchmark during the
review period. In making this determination, the commission shall consider whether the electric
distribution utility or electric services company has made a good faith effort to acquire sufficient
qualifying renewable energy or, as applicable, solar energy resources to so comply, including, but
not limited to, by banking or seeking renewable energy resource credits or by seeking the resources
through long-term contracts. Additionally, the commission shall consider the availability of
qualifying renewable energy or solar energy resources in this state and other jurisdictions in the PJM
interconnection regional transmission organization, L.L.C., or its successor and the midcontinent
independent system operator or its successor.
(c) If, pursuant to division (C)(4)(b) of this section, the commission determines that
qualifying renewable energy or solar energy resources are not reasonably available to permit the
electric distribution utility or electric services company to comply, during the period of review, with

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
72
the subject minimum benchmark prescribed under division (B)(2) of this section, the commission
shall modify that compliance obligation of the utility or company as it determines appropriate to
accommodate the finding. Commission modification shall not automatically reduce the obligation
for the electric distribution utility's or electric services company's compliance in subsequent years. If
it modifies the electric distribution utility or electric services company obligation under division (C)
(4)(c) of this section, the commission may require the utility or company, if sufficient renewable
energy resource credits exist in the marketplace, to acquire additional renewable energy resource
credits in subsequent years equivalent to the utility's or company's modified obligation under
division (C)(4)(c) of this section.
(5) The commission shall establish a process to provide for at least an annual review of the
renewable energy resource market in this state and in the service territories of the regional
transmission organizations that manage transmission systems located in this state. The commission
shall use the results of this study to identify any needed changes to the amount of the renewable
energy compliance payment specified under divisions (C)(2)(a) and (b) of this section. Specifically,
the commission may increase the amount to ensure that payment of compliance payments is not used
to achieve compliance with this section in lieu of actually acquiring or realizing energy derived from
qualifying renewable energy resources. However, if the commission finds that the amount of the
compliance payment should be otherwise changed, the commission shall present this finding to the
general assembly for legislative enactment.
(D) The commission annually shall submit to the general assembly in accordance with
section 101.68 of the Revised Code a report describing all of the following:
(1) The compliance of electric distribution utilities and electric services companies with
division (B) of this section;
(2) The average annual cost of renewable energy credits purchased by utilities and
companies for the year covered in the report;
(3) Any strategy for utility and company compliance or for encouraging the use of qualifying
renewable energy resources in supplying this state's electricity needs in a manner that considers
available technology, costs, job creation, and economic impacts.
The commission shall begin providing the information described in division (D)(2) of this
section in each report submitted after September 10, 2012. The commission shall allow and consider
public comments on the report prior to its submission to the general assembly. Nothing in the report
shall be binding on any person, including any utility or company for the purpose of its compliance
with any benchmark under division (B) of this section, or the enforcement of that provision under
division (C) of this section.
(E) All costs incurred by an electric distribution utility in complying with the requirements
of this section shall be bypassable by any consumer that has exercised choice of supplier under
section 4928.03 of the Revised Code.
Sec. 4928.645. (A) An electric distribution utility or electric services company may use, for

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
73
the purpose of complying with the requirements under divisions (B)(1) and (2) of section 4928.64 of
the Revised Code, renewable energy credits any time in the five calendar years following the date of
their purchase or acquisition from any entity, including, but not limited to, the following:
(1) A mercantile customer;
(2) An owner or operator of a hydroelectric generating facility that is located at a dam on a
river, or on any water discharged to a river, that is within or bordering this state or within or
bordering an adjoining state, or that produces power that can be shown to be deliverable into this
state;
(3) A seller of compressed natural gas that has been produced from biologically derived
methane gas, provided that the seller may only provide renewable energy credits for metered
amounts of gas.
(B)(1) The public utilities commission shall adopt rules specifying that one unit of credit
shall equal one megawatt hour of electricity derived from renewable energy resources, except that,
for a generating facility of seventy-five megawatts or greater that is situated within this state and has
committed by December 31, 2009, to modify or retrofit its generating unit or units to enable the
facility to generate principally from biomass energy by June 30, 2013, each megawatt hour of
electricity generated principally from that biomass energy shall equal, in units of credit, the product
obtained by multiplying the actual percentage of biomass feedstock heat input used to generate such
megawatt hour by the quotient obtained by dividing the then existing unit dollar amount used to
determine a renewable energy compliance payment as provided under division (C)(2)(b) of section
4928.64 of the Revised Code by the then existing market value of one renewable energy credit, but
such megawatt hour shall not equal less than one unit of credit. Renewable energy resources do not
have to be converted to electricity in order to be eligible to receive renewable energy credits. The
rules shall specify that, for purposes of converting the quantity of energy derived from biologically
derived methane gas to an electricity equivalent, one megawatt hour equals 3,412,142 British
thermal units.
(2) The rules also shall provide for this state a system of registering renewable energy credits
by specifying which of any generally available registries shall be used for that purpose and not by
creating a registry. That selected system of registering renewable energy credits shall allow a
hydroelectric generating facility to be eligible for obtaining renewable energy credits and shall allow
customer-sited projects or actions the broadest opportunities to be eligible for obtaining renewable
energy credits.
(C) Beginning January 1, 2020, a qualifying solar resource as defined in section 3706.40 of
the Revised Code is not eligible to obtain a renewable energy credit under this section for any
megawatt hour for which the resource has been issued a solar energy credit under section 3706.45 of
the Revised Code.
(D) Except for compressed natural gas that has been produced from biologically derived
methane gas, energy generated by using natural gas as a resource is not eligible to obtain a

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
74
renewable energy credit under this section.
Sec. 4928.73. (A) As used in this section:
(1) "Mercantile customer member" means a mercantile customer connected to a mercantile
customer self-power system.
(2) "Mercantile customer self-power system" means one or more electric generation
facilities, electric storage facilities, or both, along with any associated facilities, that meet all of the
following:
(a) Produce electricity primarily for the consumption of a mercantile customer member or a
group of mercantile customer members;
(b) Connect directly to the mercantile customer member's side of the electric meter;
(c) Deliver electricity to the mercantile customer member's side of the electric meter without
the use of an electric distribution utility's or electric cooperative's distribution system or transmission
system;
(d) Is located on either of the following:
(i) A property owned or controlled by a mercantile customer member or the entity that owns
or operates the mercantile customer self-power system;
(ii) Land adjacent to a mercantile customer member if the facilities connect directly with the
customer.
(B) The mercantile customer self-power system may be owned or operated by a mercantile
customer member, group of mercantile customer members, or an entity that is not a mercantile
customer member.
(C) A mercantile customer self-power system may provide electric generation service to one
or more mercantile customers.
(D) The public utilities commission shall adopt rules to implement this section that are
applicable to electric distribution utilities.
(E) Nothing in this section prohibits an electric distribution utility or an electric cooperative
from charging a mercantile customer for distribution or transmission service used by a mercantile
customer.
Sec. 4928.83. (A) Not later than May 31, 2026, every electric distribution utility in the state
shall develop and publicly share distribution system hosting capacity maps. The utility shall ensure
that the maps are available on the utility's web site and shall be updated at least once per quarter.
(B) The maps described in division (A) of this section shall include, at a minimum:
(1) Total available distribution hosting capacity, expressed in megawatts, for new loads;
(2) Separate hosting capacity availability for distributed energy resources or a separate
distributed energy resource specific map;
(3) Geographic locations and voltage levels of circuits and substations;
(4) Total, existing, and queued loads or generation exceeding one megawatt per circuit and
substation;

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
75
(5) Available substation and circuit capacity expressed in megawatts.
(C) The public utilities commission shall hold at least two stakeholder meetings annually to
receive input on map design, data accuracy, and usability. In addition, the commission shall establish
uniform reporting standards to ensure consistency across all electric distribution utilities. The
commission may also require utilities to include additional data points as necessary to improve
transparency and planning.
(D) Each electric distribution utility shall publish annual reliability reports, including the
following metrics, identified per circuit:
(1) The system average interruption frequency index, representing the average number of
interruptions per customer;
(2) The customer average interruption duration index, representing the average interruption
duration or average time to restore service per interrupted customer;
(3) Customers experiencing multiple interruptions, which identifies customers experiencing
at least five interruptions annually divided by the total number of customers served;
(4) Customers experiencing long interruption durations, which identifies customers that
experienced outages of one or more hours in duration divided by the total number of customers
served;
(5) Average outage frequency and duration per circuit and substation;
(6) Identification of circuits and substations with persistent reliability issues;
(7) Planned and completed upgrades to enhance grid reliability.
(E) The commission shall review and publish a statewide reliability report annually,
summarizing trends and recommending grid modernization measures.
Sec. 4928.86. (A) Except as provided in division (C) of this section, each entity that owns or
controls transmission facilities located in this state and is not a regional transmission organization
shall create a heat map that includes both of the following:
(1) For major transmission lines and substations, the additional power load the lines and
substations can take at the time that the map is created, accounting for all signed electric service
agreements;
(2) The amount of localized generation that can be hosted on each transmission line.
(B) If a heat map created under this section is not critical electric infrastructure information,
then the entity that created the map shall publish the map on the entity's web site.
(C) The following entities are exempt from the requirements of this section:
(1) An electric utility owned or operated by a municipal corporation;
(2) An electric cooperative.
Sec. 4929.20. (A)(A)(1) No governmental aggregator as defined in division (K)(1) of section
4929.01 of the Revised Code or no retail natural gas supplier shall provide a competitive retail
natural gas service on or after thirteen months following the effective date of this section June 26,
2001, to a consumer in this state without first being certified by the public utilities commission

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
76
regarding its managerial, technical, and financial capability to provide that service and providing
reasonable financial assurances sufficient to protect customers and natural gas companies from
default. In addition, a retail natural gas supplier may be required to provide a performance bond
sufficient to protect customers and natural gas companies from default. Certification shall be granted
pursuant to procedures and standards the commission shall prescribe in accordance with rules
adopted under section 4929.10 of the Revised Code. However, certification or certification renewal
shall be deemed approved thirty days after the filing of an application with the commission unless
the commission suspends that approval for good cause shown. In the case of such a suspension, the
commission shall act to approve or deny certification or certification renewal to the applicant not
later than ninety days after the date of the suspension.
(2) The commission shall establish rules to require a competitive retail natural gas supplier
to maintain financial assurances sufficient to protect customers and natural gas companies from
default. Such rules also shall specifically allow a natural gas company to set reasonable standards for
its security and the security of its customers through financial requirements set in its tariffs.
(3) As used in division (A)(2) of this section, "retail natural gas supplier" has the same
meaning as in section 4929.01 of the Revised Code, but excludes a broker or aggregator.
(B) Capability standards adopted in rules pursuant to division (A) of this section shall be
sufficient to ensure compliance with section 4929.22 of the Revised Code and with the minimum
service requirements established under section 4929.23 of the Revised Code. The standards shall
allow flexibility for voluntary aggregation, to encourage market creativity in responding to
consumer needs and demands. The rules shall include procedures for biennially renewing
certification.
(C)(1) The commission may suspend, rescind, or conditionally rescind the certification of
any retail natural gas supplier or governmental aggregator issued under this section if the
commission determines, after reasonable notice and opportunity for hearing, that the retail natural
gas supplier or governmental aggregator has failed to comply with any applicable certification
standards prescribed in rules adopted pursuant to this section or section 4929.22 of the Revised
Code.
(2) An affected natural gas company may file an application with the commission for
approval of authority to recover in accordance with division (C)(2) of this section incremental costs
reasonably and prudently incurred by the company in connection with the commission's
continuation, suspension, rescission, or conditional rescission of a particular retail natural gas
supplier's certification under division (C)(1) of this section. Upon the filing of such an application,
the commission shall conduct an audit of such incremental costs as are specified in the application.
Cost recovery shall be through a rider on the base rates of customers of the company for which there
is a choice of supplier of commodity sales service as a result of revised schedules approved under
division (C) of section 4929.29 of the Revised Code, a rule or order adopted or issued by the
commission under Chapter 4905. of the Revised Code, or an exemption granted by the commission

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
77
under sections 4929.04 to 4929.08 of the Revised Code. The rider shall take effect ninety days after
the date of the application's filing unless the commission, based on the audit results and for good
cause shown, sets the matter for hearing. After the hearing, the commission shall approve the
application, and authorize such cost recovery rider effective on the date specified in the order, only
for such incremental costs as the commission determines were reasonably and prudently incurred by
the company in connection with the continuation, suspension, rescission, or conditional rescission of
a retail natural gas supplier's certification under division (C)(1) of this section. Any proceeding
under division (C)(2) of this section shall be governed by Chapter 4903. of the Revised Code.
(D) No natural gas company, on and after thirteen months following the effective date of this
section June 26, 2001, shall knowingly distribute natural gas, to a retail consumer in this state, for
any governmental aggregator, as defined in division (K)(1) of section 4929.01 of the Revised Code,
or retail natural gas supplier, that has not been certified by the commission pursuant to this section.
(E) Notwithstanding any provision of section 121.95 of the Revised Code to the contrary, a
regulatory restriction contained in a rule adopted under section 4929.20 of the Revised Code is not
subject to sections 121.95 to 121.953 of the Revised Code.
Sec. 4929.221. (A) If a competitive retail natural gas service supplier offers a residential
customer or non-mercantile commercial customer a contract for a fixed introductory rate that
converts to a variable rate upon the expiration of the fixed rate, the supplier shall send two notices to
each residential customer and non-mercantile commercial customer that enters into such a contract.
Each notice shall provide all of the following information to the customer:
(1) The fixed rate that is expiring under the contract;
(2) The expiration date of the contract's fixed rate;
(3) The public utilities commission web site that, as a comparison tool, lists rates offered by
competitive retail natural gas service suppliers.
(B) The second notice shall include all the information required under division (A) of this
section and shall also identify the initial rate to be charged upon the contract's conversion to a
variable rate.
(C) The notices shall be sent by standard United States mail or electronically with a
customer's verifiable consent as follows:
(1) The supplier shall send the first notice not earlier than ninety days and not later than sixty
days prior to the expiration of the fixed rate.
(2) The supplier shall send the second notice not earlier than forty-five days and not later
than fifteen days prior to the expiration of the fixed rate.
(D) A competitive retail natural gas service supplier shall provide an annual notice, by
standard United States mail or electronically with a customer's verifiable consent, to each residential
customer and non-mercantile commercial customer that has entered into a contract with the supplier
that has converted to a variable rate upon the expiration of the contract's fixed introductory rate. The
notice shall inform the customer that the customer is currently subject to a variable rate and that

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
78
other fixed rate contracts are available.
(E) Not later than one hundred fifty days after the effective date of this section, the
commission shall adopt rules in order to implement divisions (A) to (D) of this section. The rules, at
a minimum, shall include the following requirements regarding the notices required under divisions
(A) to (D) of this section:
(1) To use clear and unambiguous language in order to enable the customer to make an
informed decision;
(2) To design the notices in a way to ensure that they cannot be confused with marketing
materials.
(F) Notwithstanding any provision of section 121.95 of the Revised Code to the contrary, a
regulatory restriction contained in a rule adopted under section 4929.221 of the Revised Code is not
subject to sections 121.95 to 121.953 of the Revised Code.
Sec. 4929.222. (A) As used in this section, "customer account information" means a unique
natural gas company number or other customer identification number used by the company to
identify a customer and the customer's account record.
(B) The public utilities commission shall adopt rules to ensure that a natural gas company
processes a customer's change in competitive retail natural gas supplier by using customer account
information. A customer who consents to a change of supplier shall not be required to provide
customer account information to the supplier if the customer provides a valid form of government-
issued identification issued to the customer or a sufficient alternative form of identification that
allows the supplier to establish the customer's identity accurately.
(C) Notwithstanding any provision of section 121.95 of the Revised Code to the contrary, a
regulatory restriction contained in a rule adopted under this section is not subject to sections 121.95
to 121.953 of the Revised Code.
Sec. 4933.81. As used in sections 4933.81 to 4933.90 of the Revised Code:
(A) "Electric supplier" means any electric light company as defined in section 4905.03 of the
Revised Code, including electric light companies organized as nonprofit corporations, but not
including municipal corporations or other units of local government that provide electric service.
(B) "Adequate facilities" means distribution lines or facilities having sufficient capacity to
meet the maximum estimated electric service requirements of its existing customers and of any new
customer occurring during the year following the commencement of permanent electric service, and
to assure all such customers of reasonable continuity and quality of service. Distribution facilities
and lines of an electric supplier shall be considered "adequate facilities" if such supplier offers to
undertake to make its distribution facilities and lines meet such service requirements and, in the
determination of the public utilities commission, can do so within a reasonable time.
(C) "Distribution line" means any electric line that is being or has been used primarily to
provide electric service directly to electric load centers by the owner of such line.
(D) "Existing distribution line" means any distribution line of an electric supplier which was

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
79
in existence on January 1, 1977, or under construction on that date.
(E) "Electric load center" means all the electric-consuming facilities of any type or character
owned, occupied, controlled, or used by a person at a single location, which facilities have been, are,
or will be connected to and served at a metered point of delivery and to which electric service has
been, is, or will be rendered.
(F) "Electric service" means retail electric service furnished to an electric load center for
ultimate consumption, but excludes furnishing electric power or energy at wholesale for resale. In
the case of a for-profit electric supplier and beginning on the starting date of competitive retail
electric service as defined in section 4928.01 of the Revised Code, "electric service" also excludes a
competitive retail electric service. , and, starting after the effective date of amendments to this
section by this act, excludes:
(1) Retail electric service provided to a mercantile customer member by a mercantile
customer self-power system connected to that mercantile customer member as those terms are
defined in section 4928.73 of the Revised Code;
(2) Retail electric service provided to an electric load center to the extent the center is acting
as a self-generator as defined in section 4928.01 of the Revised Code.
In the case of a not-for-profit electric supplier and beginning on that competitive retail
electric service starting date, "electric service" also excludes any service component of competitive
retail electric service that is specified in an irrevocable filing the electric supplier makes with the
public utilities commission for informational purposes only to eliminate permanently its certified
territory under sections 4933.81 to 4933.90 of the Revised Code as to that service component and
further excludes any new electric load centers going into service after the effective date of
amendments to this section by this act that use retail electric service described in division (F)(1) or
(2) of this section. The filing shall specify the date on which such territory is so eliminated.
Notwithstanding division (B) of section 4928.01 of the Revised Code, such a service component
may include retail ancillary, metering, or billing and collection service irrespective of whether that
service component has or has not been declared competitive under section 4928.04 of the Revised
Code. Upon receipt of the filing by the commission, the not-for-profit electric supplier's certified
territory shall be eliminated permanently as to the service component specified in the filing as of the
date specified in the filing. As used in this division, "competitive retail electric service" and "retail
electric service" have the same meanings as in section 4928.01 of the Revised Code.
(G) "Certified territory" means a geographical area the boundaries of which have been
established pursuant to sections 4933.81 to 4933.90 of the Revised Code within which an electric
supplier is authorized and required to provide electric service.
(H) "Other unit of local government" means any governmental unit or body that may come
into existence after July 12, 1978, with powers and authority similar to those of a municipal
corporation, or that is created to replace or exercise the relevant powers of any one or more
municipal corporations.

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
80
Sec. 4935.04. (A) As used in this chapter:
(1) "Major utility facility" means:
(a) An electric transmission line and associated facilities of a design capacity of one hundred
twenty-five kilovolts or more;
(b) A gas or natural gas transmission line and associated facilities designed for, or capable
of, transporting gas or natural gas at pressures in excess of one hundred twenty-five pounds per
square inch.
"Major utility facility" does not include electric, gas, or natural gas distributing lines and gas
or natural gas gathering lines and associated facilities as defined by the public utilities commission;
facilities owned or operated by industrial firms, persons, or institutions that produce or transmit gas
or natural gas, or electricity primarily for their own use or as a byproduct of their operations; gas or
natural gas transmission lines and associated facilities over which an agency of the United States has
certificate jurisdiction; facilities owned or operated by a person furnishing gas or natural gas directly
to fifteen thousand or fewer customers within this state.
(2) "Person" has the meaning set forth in section 4906.01 of the Revised Code.
(3) "Advanced transmission technologies" has the same meaning as in section 4906.01 of the
Revised Code.
(B) Each person owning or operating a gas or natural gas transmission line and associated
facilities within this state over which an agency of the United States has certificate jurisdiction shall
furnish to the commission a copy of the energy information filed by the person with that agency of
the United States.
(C) Each person owning or operating a major utility facility within this state, or furnishing
gas, natural gas, or electricity directly to more than fifteen thousand customers within this state shall
furnish a report to the commission for its review. The report shall be furnished annually, except that
for a gas or natural gas company the report shall be furnished every three years. The report shall be
termed the long-term forecast report and shall contain:
(1) A year-by-year, ten-year forecast of annual energy demand, peak load, reserves, and a
general description of the resource planning projections to meet demand;
(2) A range of projected loads during the period;
(3) A description of major utility facilities planned to be added or taken out of service in the
next ten years, including, to the extent the information is available, prospective sites for transmission
line locations;
(4) For gas and natural gas, a projection of anticipated supply, supply prices, and sources of
supply over the forecast period;
(5) A description of proposed changes in the transmission system planned for the next five
years;
(6) A month-by-month forecast of both energy demand and peak load for electric utilities,
and gas sendout for gas and natural gas utilities, for the next two years. The report shall describe the

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
81
major utility facilities that, in the judgment of such person, will be required to supply system
demands during the forecast period. The report from a gas or natural gas utility shall cover the ten-
and five-year periods next succeeding the date of the report, and the report from an electric utility
shall cover the twenty-, ten-, and five-year periods next succeeding the date of the report. Each
report shall be made available to the public and furnished upon request to municipal corporations
and governmental agencies charged with the duty of protecting the environment or of planning land
use. The report shall be in such form and shall contain such information as may be prescribed by the
commission.
Each person not owning or operating a major utility facility within this state and serving
fifteen thousand or fewer gas or natural gas, or electric customers within this state shall furnish such
information as the commission requires.
(7) For electric transmission, a person shall include an evaluation and report of the potential
use of, or investment in, one or more advanced transmission technologies to enable the electric
utility to safely, reliably, efficiently, and cost-effectively meet electric system demand through its
major utility facilities.
The report shall identify which advanced transmission technologies were considered as a
part of the review of the major utility facilities for the next five years. A person shall also include a
cost evaluation comparing costs of traditional transmission investments and costs of advanced
transmission technologies for the projects considered on the major utility facilities applied
individually, together, or in sequence. The report shall also include an advanced transmission
technology congestion mitigation study to cost-effectively maximize the delivery of energy
resources in the near term that:
(a) Identifies locations on the entity's transmission system where congestion has occurred for
a total of fifty hours per year or more during the last three years or is likely to occur during the next
five years, including due to planned transmission outages or other factors;
(b) Estimates the frequency of congestion at each location and the increased cost to
ratepayers resulting from the substitution of higher-priced electricity;
(c) Evaluates the technical feasibility and estimates the cost of installing one or more
advanced transmission technologies to address each instance of grid congestion identified in division
(C)(7)(a) of this section and projects the grid-enhancing technology's efficacy in reducing
congestion;
(d) Analyzes the cost-effectiveness of installing grid-enhancing technologies to address each
instance of congestion identified in division (C)(7)(a) of this section by using the information
developed in division (C)(7)(c) of this section to calculate the payback period of each installation,
using a methodology developed by the commission;
(e) Proposes an implementation plan, including a schedule and cost estimate, to install grid-
enhancing technologies at each congestion point at which the payback period is less than or equal to
a value determined by the commission, in order to maximize transmission system capacity, and

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
82
explains the entity's current line rating methodology.
(D) The commission shall:
(1) Review and comment on the reports filed under division (C) of this section, and make the
information contained in the reports readily available to the public and other interested government
agencies;
(2) Compile and publish each year the general locations of proposed and existing
transmission line routes within its jurisdiction as identified in the reports filed under division (C) of
this section, identifying the general location of such sites and routes and the approximate year when
construction is expected to commence, and to make such information readily available to the public,
to each newspaper of daily or weekly circulation within the area affected by the proposed site and
route, and to interested federal, state, and local agencies;
(3) Hold a public hearing upon the showing of good cause to the commission by an
interested party.
If a hearing is held, the commission shall fix a time for the hearing, which shall be not later
than ninety days after the report is filed, and publish notice of the date, time of day, and location of
the hearing in a newspaper of general circulation in each county in which the person furnishing the
report has or intends to locate a major utility facility and will provide service during the period
covered by the report. The notice shall be published not less than fifteen nor more than thirty days
before the hearing and shall state the matters to be considered.
(4) Require such information from persons subject to its jurisdiction as necessary to assist in
the conduct of hearings and any investigation or studies it may undertake;
(5) Conduct any studies or investigations that are necessary or appropriate to carry out its
responsibilities under this section.
(6) Review and evaluate that advanced transmission technologies were properly reported in
accordance with division (C)(7) of this section and allow stakeholders to provide comments.
(7) Approve advanced transmission technology congestion mitigation implementation plans,
including cost recovery.
(E)(1) The scope of the hearing held under division (D)(3) of this section shall be limited to
issues relating to forecasting. The power siting board, the office of consumers' counsel, and all other
persons having an interest in the proceedings shall be afforded the opportunity to be heard and to be
represented by counsel. The commission may adjourn the hearing from time to time.
(2) The hearing shall include, but not be limited to, a review of:
(a) The projected loads and energy requirements for each year of the period;
(b) The estimated installed capacity and supplies to meet the projected load requirements.
(F) Based upon the report furnished pursuant to division (C) of this section and the hearing
record, the commission, within ninety days from the close of the record in the hearing, shall
determine if:
(1) All information relating to current activities, facilities agreements, and published energy

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
83
policies of the state has been completely and accurately represented;
(2) The load requirements are based on substantially accurate historical information and
adequate methodology;
(3) The forecasting methods consider the relationships between price and energy
consumption;
(4) The report identifies and projects reductions in energy demands due to energy
conservation measures in the industrial, commercial, residential, transportation, and energy
production sectors in the service area;
(5) Utility company forecasts of loads and resources are reasonable in relation to population
growth estimates made by state and federal agencies, transportation, and economic development
plans and forecasts, and make recommendations where possible for necessary and reasonable
alternatives to meet forecasted electric power demand;
(6) The report considers plans for expansion of the regional power grid and the planned
facilities of other utilities in the state;
(7) All assumptions made in the forecast are reasonable and adequately documented.
(G) The commission shall adopt rules under section 111.15 of the Revised Code to establish
criteria for evaluating the long-term forecasts of needs for gas and electric transmission service, to
conduct hearings held under this section, to establish reasonable fees to defray the direct cost of the
hearings and the review process, and such other rules as are necessary and convenient to implement
this section.
(H) The hearing record produced under this section and the determinations of the
commission shall be introduced into evidence and shall be considered in determining the basis of
need for power siting board deliberations under division (A)(1) of section 4906.10 of the Revised
Code. The hearing record produced under this section shall be introduced into evidence and shall be
considered by the commission in its initiation of programs, examinations, and findings under section
4905.70 of the Revised Code, and shall be considered in the commission's determinations with
respect to the establishment of just and reasonable rates under section 4909.15 of the Revised Code
and financing utility facilities and authorizing issuance of all securities under sections 4905.40,
4905.401, 4905.41, and 4905.42 of the Revised Code. The forecast findings also shall serve as the
basis for all other energy planning and development activities of the state government where electric
and gas data are required.
(I)(1) No court other than the supreme court shall have power to review, suspend, or delay
any determination made by the commission under this section, or enjoin, restrain, or interfere with
the commission in the performance of official duties. A writ of mandamus shall not be issued against
the commission by any court other than the supreme court.
(2) A final determination made by the commission shall be reversed, vacated, or modified by
the supreme court on appeal, if, upon consideration of the record, such court is of the opinion that
such determination was unreasonable or unlawful.

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
84
The proceeding to obtain such reversal, vacation, or modification shall be by notice of
appeal, filed with the commission by any party to the proceeding before it, against the commission,
setting forth the determination appealed from and errors complained of. The notice of appeal shall be
served, unless waived, upon the commission by leaving a copy at the office of the chairperson of the
commission at Columbus. The court may permit an interested party to intervene by cross-appeal.
(3) No proceeding to reverse, vacate, or modify a determination of the commission is
commenced unless the notice of appeal is filed within sixty days after the date of the determination.
Sec. 5727.01. As used in this chapter:
(A) "Public utility" means each person referred to as a telephone company, telegraph
company, electric company, natural gas company, pipe-line company, water-works company, water
transportation company, heating company, rural electric company, railroad company, combined
company, or energy company.
(B) "Gross receipts" means the entire receipts for business done by any person from
operations as a public utility, or incidental thereto, or in connection therewith, including any receipts
received under Chapter 4928. of the Revised Code. The gross receipts for business done by an
incorporated company engaged in operation as a public utility includes the entire receipts for
business done by such company under the exercise of its corporate powers, whether from the
operation as a public utility or from any other business.
(C) "Rural electric company" means any nonprofit corporation, organization, association, or
cooperative engaged in the business of supplying electricity to its members or persons owning an
interest therein in an area the major portion of which is rural. "Rural electric company" excludes an
energy company.
(D) Any person:
(1) Is a telegraph company when engaged in the business of transmitting telegraphic
messages to, from, through, or in this state;
(2) Is a telephone company when primarily engaged in the business of providing local
exchange telephone service, excluding cellular radio service, in this state;
(3) Is an electric company when engaged in the business of generating, transmitting, or
distributing electricity within this state for use by others, but excludes a rural electric company or an
energy company;
(4) Is a natural gas company when engaged in the business of supplying or distributing
natural gas for lighting, power, or heating purposes to consumers within this state, excluding a
person that is a governmental aggregator or retail natural gas supplier as defined in section 4929.01
of the Revised Code;
(5) Is a pipe-line company when engaged in the business of transporting natural gas, oil, or
coal or its derivatives through pipes or tubing, either wholly or partially within this state;
(6) Is a water-works company when engaged in the business of supplying water through
pipes or tubing, or in a similar manner, to consumers within this state;

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
85
(7) Is a water transportation company when engaged in the transportation of passengers or
property, by boat or other watercraft, over any waterway, whether natural or artificial, from one
point within this state to another point within this state, or between points within this state and points
without this state;
(8) Is a heating company when engaged in the business of supplying water, steam, or air
through pipes or tubing to consumers within this state for heating purposes;
(9) Is a railroad company when engaged in the business of owning or operating a railroad
either wholly or partially within this state on rights-of-way acquired and held exclusively by such
company, or otherwise, and includes a passenger, street, suburban, or interurban railroad company;
(10) Is an energy company when engaged in the business of generating, transmitting, storing
and releasing, or distributing electricity within this state for use by others solely from an energy
facility with an aggregate nameplate capacity in excess of two hundred fifty kilowatts.
As used in division (D)(2) of this section, "local exchange telephone service" means making
available or furnishing access and a dial tone to all persons within a local calling area for use in
originating and receiving voice grade communications over a switched network operated by the
provider of the service within the area and for gaining access to other telecommunication services.
(E) "Taxable property" means the property required by section 5727.06 of the Revised Code
to be assessed by the tax commissioner, but does not include either of the following:
(1) An item of tangible personal property that for the period subsequent to the effective date
of an air, water, or noise pollution control certificate and continuing so long as the certificate is in
force, has been certified as part of the pollution control facility with respect to which the certificate
has been issued;
(2) An item of tangible personal property that during the construction of a plant or facility
and until the item is first capable of operation, whether actually used in operation or not, is
incorporated in or being held exclusively for incorporation in that plant or facility.
Notwithstanding section 5701.03 of the Revised Code, for tax year 2006 and thereafter,
"taxable property" includes patterns, jigs, dies, and drawings of an electric company or a combined
company for use in the activity of an electric company.
(F) "Taxing district" means a municipal corporation or township, or part thereof, in which
the aggregate rate of taxation is uniform.
(G) "Telecommunications service" has the same meaning as in division (AA) of section
5739.01 of the Revised Code.
(H) "Interexchange telecommunications company" means a person that is engaged in the
business of transmitting telephonic messages to, from, through, or in this state, but that is not a
telephone company.
(I) "Sale and leaseback transaction" means a transaction in which a public utility or
interexchange telecommunications company sells any tangible personal property to a person other
than a public utility or interexchange telecommunications company and leases that property back

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
86
from the buyer.
(J) "Production equipment" means all taxable steam, nuclear, hydraulic, renewable resource,
clean coal technology, and other production plant equipment used to generate or store and release
electricity. For tax years prior to 2001, "production equipment" includes taxable station equipment
that is located at a production plant.
(K) "Tax year" means the year for which property or gross receipts are subject to assessment
under this chapter. This division does not limit the tax commissioner's ability to assess and value
property or gross receipts outside the tax year.
(L) "Combined company" means any person engaged in the activity of an electric company
or rural electric company that is also engaged in the activity of a heating company or a natural gas
company, or any combination thereof.
(M) "Public utility property lessor" means any person, other than a public utility or an
interexchange telecommunications company, that leases personal property, other than in a sale and
leaseback transaction, to a public utility, other than a railroad, water transportation, telephone, or
telegraph company if the property would be taxable property if owned by the public utility. A public
utility property lessor is subject to this chapter only for the purposes of reporting and paying tax on
taxable property it leases to a public utility other than a telephone or telegraph company. A public
utility property lessor that leases property to a public utility other than a telephone or telegraph
company is not a public utility, but it shall report its property and be assessed in the same manner as
the utility to which it leases the property.
(N) "Energy resource" means any of the following:
(1) "Renewable energy resource" as defined in section 4928.01 of the Revised Code;
(2) "Clean coal technology" as described in division (A)(34)(c) of section 4928.01 of the
Revised Code;
(3) "Advanced nuclear technology" as described in division (A)(34)(d) of section 4928.01 of
the Revised Code;
(4) "Cogeneration technology" as described in division (A)(34)(b) of section 4928.01 of the
Revised Code;
(5) Energy storage system.
(O) "Energy conversion equipment" means tangible personal property connected to a wind
turbine tower, connected to and behind solar radiation collector areas and designed to convert the
radiant energy of the sun into electricity or heat, or connected to any other property used to generate
or store and release electricity from an energy resource, through which electricity is transferred to
controls, transformers, or power electronics and to the transmission interconnection point.
"Energy conversion equipment" includes, but is not limited to, inverters, batteries, switch
gears, wiring, collection lines, substations, ancillary tangible personal property, or any lines and
associated tangible personal property located between substations and the transmission
interconnection point.

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
87
(P) "Energy facility" means one or more interconnected wind turbines, solar panels, energy
storage systems, or other tangible personal property used to generate or store and release electricity
from an energy resource owned by the same person, including:
(1) All interconnection equipment, devices, and related apparatus connected to such tangible
personal property;
(2) All cables, equipment, devices, and related apparatus that connect the generators to an
electricity grid or to a building or facility that directly consumes the electricity produced, that
facilitate the transmission of electrical energy from the generators to the grid, building, or facility,
and, where applicable, that transform voltage before ultimate delivery of electricity to the grid,
building, or facility.
"Energy facility" includes buildings, structures, improvements, or fixtures exclusively used
to house, support, or stabilize tangible personal property constituting the facility or that are
otherwise necessary for the operation of that property; and so much of the land on which such
tangible personal property is situated as is required for operation of the facility and is not devoted to
some other use, not to exceed, in the case of wind turbines, one-half acre for each wind turbine, and
regardless of whether the land is owned by the owner or lessee of the tangible personal property or
by another person.
(Q) "Nameplate capacity" means the original interconnected maximum rated alternating
current output of a generator or other electric production equipment under specific conditions
designated by the manufacturer, expressed in the number of kilowatts or megawatts.
(R) "Energy storage system" means tangible personal property that permits the storage of
energy for future use as electricity.
Sec. 5727.111. As used in this section, "convert" means to switch fuel input from one energy
source to another and "repower" means to replace enough of the original taxable production
equipment to make an original production facility equivalent to a new facility, such that at least
eighty per cent of the true value of the taxable production equipment is derived from new taxable
production equipment installed as part of the replacement project. The taxable property of each
public utility, except a railroad company, and of each interexchange telecommunications company
shall be assessed at the following percentages of true value:
(A) In the case of a rural electric company, one of the following fifty :
(1) Fifty per cent in the case of its taxable transmission and distribution property and its or
energy conversion equipment first subject to taxation in this state before tax year 2027;
(2) Seven per cent in the case of its taxable production or energy conversion equipment, and
twenty-five first subject to taxation in this state for tax year 2027 and thereafter or any other taxable
production equipment that is either converted or repowered;
(3) Twenty-five per cent for in the case of all its other taxable property;.
(B) In the case of a telephone or telegraph company, twenty-five per cent for taxable
property first subject to taxation in this state for tax year 1995 or thereafter for tax years before tax

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
88
year 2007, and pursuant to division (H) of section 5711.22 of the Revised Code for tax year 2007
and thereafter, and the following for all other taxable property:
(1) For tax years prior to 2005, eighty-eight per cent;
(2) For tax year 2005, sixty-seven per cent;
(3) For tax year 2006, forty-six per cent;
(4) For tax year 2007 and thereafter, pursuant to division (H) of section 5711.22 of the
Revised Code.
(C) Twenty-five per cent in the case of (1) a natural gas company or (2) a water-works
company for taxable property first subject to taxation in this state for tax year 2017 and thereafter;.
(D) Eighty-eight per cent in the case of a pipe-line company, a water-works company for
taxable property first subject to taxation in this state before tax year 2017, or a heating company;.
(E)(1) For tax year 2005, eighty-eight per cent in the case of the taxable transmission and
distribution property of an electric company, and twenty-five per cent for all its other taxable
property;
(2) For tax year 2006 and each tax year thereafter, in (E) In the case of an electric company,
eighty-five one of the following:
(1) Eighty-five per cent in the case of its taxable transmission and distribution property and
energy conversion equipment and its energy conversion equipment, first subject to taxation in this
state before tax year 2027;
(2) Twenty-five per cent in the case of its other taxable transmission and distribution
propertyand twenty-four ;
(3) Seven per cent in the case of its taxable production and energy conversion equipment
first subject to taxation in this state for tax year 2027 and thereafter or any other taxable production
equipment that is either converted or repowered;
(4) Twenty-four per cent for in the case of all its other taxable property.
(F)(1) Twenty-five per cent in the case of an interexchange telecommunications company for
tax years before tax year 2007;
(2) Pursuant to division (H) of section 5711.22 of the Revised Code for tax year 2007 and
thereafter.
(G) Twenty-five per cent in the case of a water transportation company;.
(H) For tax year 2011 and each tax year thereafter in In the case of an energy company,
twenty-four one of the following:
(1) Eighty-five per cent in the case of its taxable production equipment, transmission and
distribution property first subject to taxation in this state before tax year 2027;
(2) Twenty-five per cent in the case of its other taxable transmission and distribution
propertyand eighty-five ;
(3) Seven per cent in the case of its taxable production or energy conversion equipment first
subject to taxation in this state for tax year 2027 and thereafter or any other taxable production

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
89
equipment that is either converted or repowered;
(4) Twenty-four per cent in the case of its other taxable production equipment;
(5) Eighty-five per cent for in the case of all its other taxable property.
(I) In the case of a pipeline company, one of the following:
(1) Eighty-eight per cent of its taxable property first subject to taxation in this state before
tax year 2027;
(2) Twenty-five per cent in the case of all its other taxable property.
Sec. 5727.75. (A) For purposes of this section:
(1) "Qualified energy project" means an energy project certified by the director of
development pursuant to this section.
(2) "Energy project" means a project to provide electric power through the construction,
installation, and use of an energy facility.
(3) "Alternative energy zone" means a county declared as such by the board of county
commissioners under division (E)(1)(b) or (c) of this section.
(4) "Full-time equivalent employee" means the total number of employee-hours for which
compensation was paid to individuals employed at a qualified energy project for services performed
at the project during the calendar year divided by two thousand eighty hours. For the purpose of this
calculation, "performed at the project" includes only hours worked at the qualified energy project
and devoted to site preparation or protection, construction and installation, and the unloading and
distribution of materials at the project site, but does not include hours worked by superintendents,
owners, manufacturers' representatives, persons employed in a bona fide executive, management,
supervisory, or administrative capacity, or persons whose sole employment on the project is
transporting materials or persons to the project site.
(5) "Solar energy project" means an energy project composed of an energy facility using
solar panels to generate electricity.
(6) "Internet identifier of record" has the same meaning as in section 9.312 of the Revised
Code.
(7) "Applicable year" means the later of the following:
(a) The tax year in which the secretary of the treasury of the United States, or the secretary's
delegate, determines, in accordance with section 45Y of the Internal Revenue Code, that the annual
greenhouse gas emissions from the production of electricity in the United States are equal to or less
than twenty-five per cent of the annual greenhouse gas emissions from the production of electricity
in the United States for calendar year 2022;
(b) Tax year 2029.
(8) "Internal Revenue Code" means the Internal Revenue Code as of the effective date of this
amendment October 3, 2023.
(B)(1) Tangible personal property of a qualified energy project using renewable energy
resources is exempt from taxation for tax years 2011 through the applicable year if all of the

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
90
following conditions are satisfied:
(a) On or before the last day of the tax year preceding the applicable year, the owner or a
lessee pursuant to a sale and leaseback transaction of the project submits an application to the power
siting board for a certificate under section 4906.20 of the Revised Code, or if that section does not
apply, submits an application for any approval, consent, permit, or certificate or satisfies any
condition required by a public agency or political subdivision of this state for the construction or
initial operation of an energy project.
(b) Construction or installation of the energy facility begins on or after January 1, 2009, and
before the first day of the applicable year. For the purposes of this division, construction begins on
the earlier of the date of application for a certificate or other approval or permit described in division
(B)(1)(a) of this section, or the date the contract for the construction or installation of the energy
facility is entered into.
(c) For a qualified energy project with a nameplate capacity of twenty megawatts or greater,
a board of county commissioners of a county in which property of the project is located has adopted
a resolution under division (E)(1)(b) or (c) of this section to approve the application submitted under
division (E) of this section to exempt the property located in that county from taxation. A board's
adoption of a resolution rejecting an application or its failure to adopt a resolution approving the
application does not affect the tax-exempt status of the qualified energy project's property that is
located in another county.
(2) If tangible personal property of a qualified energy project using renewable energy
resources was exempt from taxation under this section beginning in any of tax years 2011 through
the applicable year, and the certification under division (E)(2) of this section has not been revoked,
the tangible personal property of the qualified energy project is exempt from taxation for the tax year
following the applicable year and all ensuing tax years if the property was placed into service before
the first day of the tax year following the applicable year, as certified in the construction progress
report required under division (F)(2) of this section. Tangible personal property that has not been
placed into service before that date is taxable property subject to taxation. An energy project for
which certification has been revoked is ineligible for further exemption under this section.
Revocation does not affect the tax-exempt status of the project's tangible personal property for the
tax year in which revocation occurs or any prior tax year.
(C) Tangible personal property of a qualified energy project using clean coal technology,
advanced nuclear technology, or cogeneration technology is exempt from taxation for the first tax
year that the property would be listed for taxation and all subsequent years if all of the following
circumstances are met:
(1) The property was placed into service before January 1, 2021. Tangible personal property
that has not been placed into service before that date is taxable property subject to taxation.
(2) For such a qualified energy project with a nameplate capacity of twenty megawatts or
greater, a board of county commissioners of a county in which property of the qualified energy

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
91
project is located has adopted a resolution under division (E)(1)(b) or (c) of this section to approve
the application submitted under division (E) of this section to exempt the property located in that
county from taxation. A board's adoption of a resolution rejecting the application or its failure to
adopt a resolution approving the application does not affect the tax-exempt status of the qualified
energy project's property that is located in another county.
(3) The certification for the qualified energy project issued under division (E)(2) of this
section has not been revoked. An energy project for which certification has been revoked is
ineligible for exemption under this section. Revocation does not affect the tax-exempt status of the
project's tangible personal property for the tax year in which revocation occurs or any prior tax year.
(D) Except as otherwise provided in this section, real property of a qualified energy project
is exempt from taxation for any tax year for which the tangible personal property of the qualified
energy project is exempted under this section.
(E)(1)(a) A person may apply to the director of development for certification of an energy
project as a qualified energy project on or before the following dates:
(i) The last day of the tax year preceding the applicable year, for an energy project using
renewable energy resources;
(ii) December 31, 2017, for an energy project using clean coal technology, advanced nuclear
technology, or cogeneration technology.
(b) The director shall forward a copy of each application for certification of an energy
project with a nameplate capacity of twenty megawatts or greater to the board of county
commissioners of each county in which the project is located and to each taxing unit with territory
located in each of the affected counties. Any board that receives from the director a copy of an
application submitted under this division shall adopt a resolution approving or rejecting the
application unless it has adopted a resolution under division (E)(1)(c) of this section. A resolution
adopted under division (E)(1)(b) or (c) of this section may require an annual service payment to be
made in addition to the service payment required under division (G) of this section. The sum of the
service payment required in the resolution and the service payment required under division (G) of
this section shall not exceed nine thousand dollars per megawatt of nameplate capacity located in the
county. The resolution shall specify the time and manner in which the payments required by the
resolution shall be paid to the county treasurer. The county treasurer shall deposit the payment to the
credit of the county's general fund to be used for any purpose for which money credited to that fund
may be used.
The board shall send copies of the resolution to the owner of the facility and the director by
certified mail or, if the board has record of an internet identifier of record associated with the owner
or director, by ordinary mail and by that internet identifier of record. The board shall send such
notice within thirty days after receipt of the application, or a longer period of time if authorized by
the director.
(c) A board of county commissioners may adopt a resolution declaring the county to be an

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
92
alternative energy zone and declaring all applications submitted to the director of development under
this division after the adoption of the resolution, and prior to its repeal, to be approved by the board.
All tangible personal property and real property of an energy project with a nameplate
capacity of twenty megawatts or greater is taxable if it is located in a county in which the board of
county commissioners adopted a resolution rejecting the application submitted under this division or
failed to adopt a resolution approving the application under division (E)(1)(b) or (c) of this section.
(2) The director shall certify an energy project if all of the following circumstances exist:
(a) The application was timely submitted.
(b) For an energy project with a nameplate capacity of twenty megawatts or greater, a board
of county commissioners of at least one county in which the project is located has adopted a
resolution approving the application under division (E)(1)(b) or (c) of this section.
(c) No portion of the project's facility was used to supply electricity before December 31,
2009.
(d) For construction or installation of a qualified energy project described in division (B)(1)
(b) of this section, that the project is subject to wage requirements described in section 45(b)(7)(A)
of the Internal Revenue Code and apprenticeship requirements described in section 45(b)(8)(A)(i) of
the Internal Revenue Code, provided both of the following apply:
(i) The person applies for such certificate after the effective date of this amendment October
3, 2023.
(ii) A board of commissioners of at least one county in which the project is located is
required to adopt a resolution approving the application under division (E)(1)(b) or (c) of this
section.
(3) The director shall deny a certification application if the director determines the person
has failed to comply with any requirement under this section. The director may revoke a certification
if the director determines the person, or subsequent owner or lessee pursuant to a sale and leaseback
transaction of the qualified energy project, has failed to comply with any requirement under this
section. Upon certification or revocation, the director shall notify the person, owner, or lessee, the
tax commissioner, and the county auditor of a county in which the project is located of the
certification or revocation. Notice shall be provided in a manner convenient to the director.
(F) The owner or a lessee pursuant to a sale and leaseback transaction of a qualified energy
project shall do each of the following:
(1) Comply with all applicable regulations;
(2) File with the director of development a certified construction progress report before the
first day of March of each year during the energy facility's construction or installation indicating the
percentage of the project completed, and the project's nameplate capacity, as of the preceding thirty-
first day of December. Unless otherwise instructed by the director of development, the owner or
lessee of an energy project shall file a report with the director on or before the first day of March
each year after completion of the energy facility's construction or installation indicating the project's

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
93
nameplate capacity as of the preceding thirty-first day of December. Not later than sixty days after
June 17, 2010, the owner or lessee of an energy project, the construction of which was completed
before June 17, 2010, shall file a certificate indicating the project's nameplate capacity.
(3) File with the director of development, in a manner prescribed by the director, a report of
the total number of full-time equivalent employees, and the total number of full-time equivalent
employees domiciled in Ohio, who are employed in the construction or installation of the energy
facility;
(4) For energy projects with a nameplate capacity of twenty megawatts or greater, repair all
roads, bridges, and culverts affected by construction as reasonably required to restore them to their
preconstruction condition, as determined by the county engineer in consultation with the local
jurisdiction responsible for the roads, bridges, and culverts. In the event that the county engineer
deems any road, bridge, or culvert to be inadequate to support the construction or decommissioning
of the energy facility, the road, bridge, or culvert shall be rebuilt or reinforced to the specifications
established by the county engineer prior to the construction or decommissioning of the facility. The
owner or lessee of the facility shall post a bond in an amount established by the county engineer and
to be held by the board of county commissioners to ensure funding for repairs of roads, bridges, and
culverts affected during the construction. The bond shall be released by the board not later than one
year after the date the repairs are completed. The energy facility owner or lessee pursuant to a sale
and leaseback transaction shall post a bond, as may be required by the Ohio power siting board in
the certificate authorizing commencement of construction issued pursuant to section 4906.10 of the
Revised Code, to ensure funding for repairs to roads, bridges, and culverts resulting from
decommissioning of the facility. The energy facility owner or lessee and the county engineer may
enter into an agreement regarding specific transportation plans, reinforcements, modifications, use
and repair of roads, financial security to be provided, and any other relevant issue.
(5) Provide or facilitate training for fire and emergency responders for response to
emergency situations related to the energy project and, for energy projects with a nameplate capacity
of twenty megawatts or greater, at the person's expense, equip the fire and emergency responders
with proper equipment as reasonably required to enable them to respond to such emergency
situations;
(6)(a) Except as otherwise provided in this division, for projects for which certification as a
qualified energy project was applied for, under division (E) of this section, before the effective date
of this amendment October 3, 2023, maintain a ratio of Ohio-domiciled full-time equivalent
employees employed in the construction or installation of the energy project to total full-time
equivalent employees employed in the construction or installation of the energy project of not less
than eighty per cent in the case of a solar energy project, and not less than fifty per cent in the case
of any other energy project. A person applying for such a qualified energy project may certify to the
director of development that the project will be voluntarily subject to the wage requirements
described in section 45(b)(7)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code and apprenticeship requirements

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
94
described in section 45(b)(8)(A)(i) of the Internal Revenue Code as authorized in division (F)(6)(b)
of this section. Upon receipt of that certification, the project shall comply with division (F)(6)(b) of
this section rather than division (F)(6)(a) of this section.
(b) For projects for which certification as a qualified energy project was applied for, under
division (E) of this section, on or after the effective date of this amendment October 3, 2023,
maintain a ratio of Ohio-domiciled full-time equivalent employees employed in the construction or
installation of the energy project to total full-time equivalent employees employed in the
construction or installation of the energy project of not less than seventy per cent in the case of a
solar energy project, and not less than fifty per cent in the case of any other energy project.
(c) For purposes of divisions (F)(6)(a) and (b) of this section, in the case of an energy project
for which certification from the power siting board is required under section 4906.20 of the Revised
Code, the number of full-time equivalent employees employed in the construction or installation of
the energy project equals the number actually employed or the number projected to be employed in
the certificate application, if such projection is required under regulations adopted pursuant to
section 4906.03 of the Revised Code, whichever is greater. For all other energy projects, the number
of full-time equivalent employees employed in the construction or installation of the energy project
equals the number actually employed or the number projected to be employed by the director of
development, whichever is greater. To estimate the number of employees to be employed in the
construction or installation of an energy project, the director shall use a generally accepted job-
estimating model in use for renewable energy projects, including but not limited to the job and
economic development impact model. The director may adjust an estimate produced by a model to
account for variables not accounted for by the model.
(7) For energy projects with a nameplate capacity in excess of twenty megawatts, establish a
relationship with any of the following to educate and train individuals for careers in the wind or
solar energy industry:
(a) A member of the university system of Ohio as defined in section 3345.011 of the Revised
Code;
(b) A person offering an apprenticeship program registered with the employment and
training administration within the United States department of labor or with the apprenticeship
council created by section 4139.02 of the Revised Code;
(c) A career-technical center, joint vocational school district, comprehensive career-technical
center, or compact career-technical center;
(d) A training center operated by a labor organization, or with a training center operated by a
for-profit or nonprofit organization.
The relationship may include endowments, cooperative programs, internships,
apprenticeships, research and development projects, and curriculum development.
(8) Offer to sell power or renewable energy credits from the energy project to electric
distribution utilities or electric service companies subject to renewable energy resource requirements

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
95
under section 4928.64 of the Revised Code that have issued requests for proposal for such power or
renewable energy credits. If no electric distribution utility or electric service company issues a
request for proposal on or before December 31, 2010, or accepts an offer for power or renewable
energy credits within forty-five days after the offer is submitted, power or renewable energy credits
from the energy project may be sold to other persons. Division (F)(8) of this section does not apply
if:
(a) The owner or lessee is a rural electric company or a municipal power agency as defined
in section 3734.058 of the Revised Code.
(b) The owner or lessee is a person that, before completion of the energy project, contracted
for the sale of power or renewable energy credits with a rural electric company or a municipal power
agency.
(c) The owner or lessee contracts for the sale of power or renewable energy credits from the
energy project before June 17, 2010.
(9) Make annual service payments as required by division (G) of this section and as may be
required in a resolution adopted by a board of county commissioners under division (E) of this
section.
(G) The owner or a lessee pursuant to a sale and leaseback transaction of a qualified energy
project shall make annual service payments in lieu of taxes to the county treasurer on or before the
final dates for payments of taxes on public utility personal property on the real and public utility
personal property tax list for each tax year for which property of the energy project is exempt from
taxation under this section. The county treasurer shall allocate the payment on the basis of the
project's physical location. Upon receipt of a payment, or if timely payment has not been received,
the county treasurer shall certify such receipt or non-receipt to the director of development and tax
commissioner in a form determined by the director and commissioner, respectively. Each payment
shall be in the following amount:
(1) In the case of a solar energy project, seven thousand dollars per megawatt of nameplate
capacity located in the county as of the thirty-first-day of December of the preceding tax year;
(2) In the case of any other energy project using renewable energy resources, the following:
(a) If the project maintains during the construction or installation of the energy facility a
ratio of Ohio-domiciled full-time equivalent employees to total full-time equivalent employees of
not less than seventy-five per cent, six thousand dollars per megawatt of nameplate capacity located
in the county as of the thirty-first day of December of the preceding tax year;
(b) If the project maintains during the construction or installation of the energy facility a
ratio of Ohio-domiciled full-time equivalent employees to total full-time equivalent employees of
less than seventy-five per cent but not less than sixty per cent, seven thousand dollars per megawatt
of nameplate capacity located in the county as of the thirty-first day of December of the preceding
tax year;
(c) If the project maintains during the construction or installation of the energy facility a

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
96
ratio of Ohio-domiciled full-time equivalent employees to total full-time equivalent employees of
less than sixty per cent but not less than fifty per cent, eight thousand dollars per megawatt of
nameplate capacity located in the county as of the thirty-first day of December of the preceding tax
year.
(3) In the case of an energy project using clean coal technology, advanced nuclear
technology, or cogeneration technology, the following:
(a) If the project maintains during the construction or installation of the energy facility a
ratio of Ohio-domiciled full-time equivalent employees to total full-time equivalent employees of
not less than seventy-five per cent, six thousand dollars per megawatt of nameplate capacity located
in the county as of the thirty-first day of December of the preceding tax year;
(b) If the project maintains during the construction or installation of the energy facility a
ratio of Ohio-domiciled full-time equivalent employees to total full-time equivalent employees of
less than seventy-five per cent but not less than sixty per cent, seven thousand dollars per megawatt
of nameplate capacity located in the county as of the thirty-first day of December of the preceding
tax year;
(c) If the project maintains during the construction or installation of the energy facility a
ratio of Ohio-domiciled full-time equivalent employees to total full-time equivalent employees of
less than sixty per cent but not less than fifty per cent, eight thousand dollars per megawatt of
nameplate capacity located in the county as of the thirty-first day of December of the preceding tax
year.
(H) The director of development in consultation with the tax commissioner shall adopt rules
pursuant to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to implement and enforce this section.
(I) This section and any payments in lieu of taxes made as required under this section
continue to apply and be required notwithstanding the enactment of H.B. 15 of the 136th general
assembly.
Sec. 5727.76. (A) As used in this section, "qualifying property" means tangible personal
property that is dedicated to transporting or transmitting electricity or natural gas and that is placed
into service in a priority investment area designated under section 122.161 of the Revised Code
during a time when that designation is in effect.
(B) Qualifying property shall be exempt from taxation for the tax year following the year in
which the property is placed into service and for the ensuing four tax years.
S 2. That existing sections 122.6511, 3313.372, 3313.373, 4905.03, 4906.01, 4906.03,
ECTION
4906.06, 4906.07, 4906.10, 4909.04, 4909.05, 4909.052, 4909.06, 4909.07, 4909.08, 4909.15,
4909.156, 4909.173, 4909.174, 4909.18, 4909.19, 4909.191, 4909.42, 4928.01, 4928.05, 4928.08,
4928.14, 4928.141, 4928.142, 4928.144, 4928.17, 4928.20, 4928.23, 4928.231, 4928.232, 4928.34,
4928.542, 4928.64, 4928.645, 4929.20, 4933.81, 4935.04, 5727.01, 5727.111, and 5727.75 of the
Revised Code are hereby repealed.

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
97
S 3. That sections 3706.40, 3706.41, 3706.43, 3706.431, 3706.45, 3706.46, 3706.49,
ECTION
3706.491, 3706.55, 3706.551, 3706.59, 3706.63, 3706.65, 4906.105, 4928.143, 4928.148, 4928.47,
and 4928.642 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed.
S 4. Beginning on the effective date of this section, no electric distribution utility shall
ECTION
collect from its retail customers in this state any charge that was authorized under section 4928.148
of the Revised Code prior to the repeal of that section by this act for retail recovery of prudently
incurred costs related to a legacy generation resource. Beginning on the effective date of this section,
the electric distribution utility shall not apply for, and the public utilities commission shall not
authorize, any rider or cost recovery mechanism for a legacy generation resource.
The public utilities commission shall continue any investigation commenced pursuant to
section 4928.148 of the Revised Code prior to the repeal of that section by this act for purposes of
determining the prudence and reasonableness of the actions of electric distribution utilities with
ownership interests in the legacy generation resource, including their decisions related to offering
the contractual commitment into the wholesale markets, and excluding from recovery those costs
that the commission determines imprudent and unreasonable.
S 5. (A) Beginning on the effective date of this section, no electric distribution utility
ECTION
shall collect from its retail customers in the state any charge that was authorized under section
3706.46 of the Revised Code to meet the revenue requirement for disbursements from the Solar
Generation Fund to owners or operators of qualifying solar resources that was required under section
3706.55 of the Revised Code before the repeal of these sections by this act.
(B) Except as provided for in division (C) of this section, beginning on the effective date of
this section, the Ohio Air Quality Development Authority is prohibited from directing the Treasurer
of State to remit, and the Treasurer is prohibited from remitting, any money from the Solar
Generation Fund to owners or operators of qualifying solar resources, which remittance was
permitted under section 3706.55 of the Revised Code prior to the repeal of that section by this act.
(C) Within forty-five days of the effective date of this section, the Authority shall do the
following:
(1) Forecast the future payments expected to be made under section 3706.55 of the Revised
Code, as that section existed prior to the effective date of its repeal by H.B. 15 of the 136th General
Assembly, to the owners or operators of qualifying solar resources that received one or more solar
energy credits in 2024 based on the resource's average production for the prior three years. For a
qualifying solar resource that has not generated electricity for a full year as of the effective date of
this section, the forecast shall be based on production to date, extrapolated for an annual average.
(2) Direct the Treasurer of State to calculate and remit the net present value of those
payments upfront to the owners or operators of the qualifying solar resources.
As soon as possible after remitting the net present value of those payments to the owners or

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
98
operators of the qualifying solar resources, the Treasurer of State shall transfer the cash balance of
amounts remaining in the solar generation fund to the school energy performance contracting loan
fund created in section 3313.378 of the Revised Code.
S 6. Sections 4909.193 and 4909.421 as enacted by this act and the amendments to
ECTION
sections 4909.19 and 4909.42 of the Revised Code by this act apply to applications filed under
section 4909.18 of the Revised Code on or after the effective date of this section.
S 7. (A) The Public Utilities Commission shall conduct a study to evaluate the
ECTION
potential use or deployment of advanced transmission technologies, as defined in section 4906.01 of
the Revised Code, by public utilities to enable public utilities to safely, reliably, efficiently, and cost-
effectively meet electric system demand and provide safe, reliable, and affordable electric utility
service to customers. In conducting the study, the Commission shall do the following:
(1) Evaluate the attributes, functions, costs, and benefits of various advanced transmission
technologies, including grid-enhancing technologies and advanced conductors;
(2) Evaluate the potential of each of the advanced transmission technologies studied to be
used or deployed by public utilities to provide safe, reliable, and affordable electric utility service to
customers, considering existing and planned transmission infrastructure and projected demand
growth;
(3) Identify the potential reductions in project costs and project completion timelines by
deploying advanced transmission technologies, as compared to traditional transmission
infrastructure;
(4) Evaluate potential ways to streamline the deployment of advanced transmission
technologies, including streamlined processes for permitting, maintenance, and upgrades;
(5) Evaluate other deregulated states' policies and laws relating to advanced transmission
technologies and provide recommendations in accordance with other states' policies and laws to
enable and encourage adoption of advanced transmission technologies in this state;
(6) Identify processes or ways that end-use customers, such as industrial or mercantile
customers, can invest and deploy advanced transmission technologies in partnership with their
respective utility to allow for the more rapid deployment of such technologies;
(7) Identify how the Commission can support and encourage the implementation of
advanced transmission technologies in Ohio through future rule-making or other Commission
activities;
(8) Evaluate any other aspect of advanced transmission technologies that the Commission
determines will assist policymakers, public utilities, ratepayers, and other stakeholders in
understanding the potential role of advanced transmission technologies in the transmission system
serving this state and the region;
(9) Identify opportunities for the Federal Energy Advocate, as employed under section

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
99
4928.24 of the Revised Code, to support and advocate for the implementation of advanced
transmission technologies at the regional transmission organization, Federal Energy Regulatory
Commission, and other relevant agencies, commissions or regulatory bodies.
(B) In conducting the study required by this section, the Commission shall consult with or
invite comments from stakeholders. The Commission shall hold a minimum of two public
workshops to review public comments from stakeholders. The Commission may incorporate any
information or comments received in its report required in division (C) of this section.
(C) Not later than March 1, 2026, the Commission shall submit a report that includes the
Commission's findings with respect to the topics outlined in this section. A copy of the report shall
be made available online and sent to all members of the General Assembly.
S 8. The amendment by this act of sections 5727.01 and 5727.111 of the Revised Code
ECTION
applies to tax year 2027 and every tax year thereafter.
S 9. Section 122.6511 of the Revised Code as presented in this act takes effect on the
ECTION
later of July 1, 2025, or the effective date of this section. July 1, 2025, is the effective date of an
earlier amendment to that section by H.B. 315 of the 135th General Assembly.
S 10. An agreement between an electric distribution utility and a mercantile customer
ECTION
or group of mercantile customers for the construction of a customer sited renewable energy resource
that is executed and filed with the public utilities commission prior to the effective date of H.B. 15
of the 136th General Assembly shall remain in effect according to the agreement's terms and be
governed by section 4928.47 of the Revised Code as that section existed prior to being repealed by
H.B. 15 of the 136th General Assembly.
S 11. Section 4928.01 of the Revised Code is presented in this act as a composite of
ECTION
the section as amended by both H.B. 308 and H.B. 315 of the 135th General Assembly. The General
Assembly, applying the principle stated in division (B) of section 1.52 of the Revised Code that
amendments are to be harmonized if reasonably capable of simultaneous operation, finds that the
composite is the resulting version of the section in effect prior to the effective date of the section as
presented in this act.

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
Speaker ___________________ of the House of Representatives.
President ___________________ of the Senate.
Passed ________________________, 20____
Approved ________________________, 20____
Governor.

Sub. H. B. No. 15 136th G.A.
The section numbering of law of a general and permanent nature is
complete and in conformity with the Revised Code.
Director, Legislative Service Commission.
Filed in the office of the Secretary of State at Columbus, Ohio, on the ____
day of ___________, A. D. 20____.
Secretary of State.
File No. _________ Effective Date ___________________